PREFACE.
The
Sketches and Stories here offered to
the public, have not entirely the attraction
of novelty to plead in their favourbut the
Author trusts that the sentiments inculcated,
and principles illustrated, are such as will
bear a reiteration.
It was her intention, while displaying,
accurately
,
various
traits
in the American
character
,
to furnish hints and examples which
might be beneficial to society. If an
impression
,
favourable to the cause of truth and
virtue, is left on the mind of the reader, the
Author will be satisfied, though the meed of
fame is not awarded her.
CONTENTS.
Page
The Lloyds,
9
The Catholic Convert,
51
The Silver Mine,
99
Political Parties,
113
A New-Year's Story,
129
Captain Glover's Daughter,
151
The Fate of a Favourite,
165
The Romance of Travelling,
187
The Thanksgiving of the Heart,
209
The Lottery Ticket,
227
An Old Maid,
247
Ladies' Fairs,
259
The Mode,
269
The Mysterious Box,
275
B
THE LLOYDS.
CHAPTER I.
To me what's greatness when content is wanting?
Or wealth, raked up together with much care,
To be kept with more, when the heart pines,
In being dispossessed of what it longs for
Beyond the Indian mines?
Massinger
.
Why
is it, inquired my friend, that you so
generally have chosen your heroes among the
parvenus
rather than the
distingues
of society? Have
the old rich families no characteristics worthy of
notice? Or are those Americanisms, which make
the peculiarities of our national habits and manners,
more easily discovered in country life and among
the middling classes?
That would undoubtedly be a good reason; for
the middling class is allowed, in every country, to
exhibit the most distinct and accurate pictures of
national peculiarities; but I cannot plead so
reasonably
.
I confess I have been chiefly influenced
by the wish of displaying the American character
in its fairest light; and I found the rising stars more
brilliant than the meridian ones, because the last
do not increase in brightness and magnitude in
proportion
to their height and distance. To speak
without metaphorthe engrossing pursuit of
Americans
is wealth. Now while there is a necessity
for this exertion in the circumstances of the
individual
,
the struggle ennobles his character, by
calling
forth the strongest energies of his mind and
action. It is not merely to be rich that he strives.
He usually has some beloved and dependent ones
to provide for, which exercises and strengthens his
tender and affectionate feelings. And then he is
indulging the hope of achieving great things
hereafter
,
and the world gives him credit for the good
intention. But when his fortune is made, and he
continues the pursuit of gain, mostly, as it seems,
from the habit of accumulating, all the generosity
and nobleness of his enterprises vanish. What in
the rising man was industry and economy, becomes
in the rich man parsimony and avarice. To avoid
these imputations the rich often display an
extravagance
in their style of living, which they do not
approve, and do not enjoy; only they feel it to be
necessary to silence the cavils of those who would
otherwise call them miserly, if they did not make
a show where they can so well afford it. I wish I
had models, such as I can imagine, of our republican
character, among the rich. How proud I should
be to make them heroes of the sketch and the
song!
Well, pray delineate such an one, said my
friend, if it be but a sketch of fancy.
And I willand should any rich man think the
character of the Lloyds fictitious, I wish he would,
before affirming such an opinion, to the injury of
my veracity, as a faithful delineator of American
traits, make an experiment of five years, at least, in
his own case, and see if these pictures cannot be
realized.
Arthur Lloyd was about twenty-two when, by
his father's death, he came into possession of
property
worth half a million. His father died
somewhat
suddenly, and the young man, who was then
in Paris, partly on business for his father, partly to
see the world, was summoned home by the cares
which such an inheritance naturally involved.
There are few scenes that more deeply try the
spirit
of a man than a return to a desolate home. The
mind can support the separations, which the
inevitable
current of human affairs renders inevitable,
without much suffering. One may even dwell in
the midst of strangers, and not feel lonely, if the
heart has a resting-place elsewhere. But when we
open the solitary apartments, where every thing we
see calls up associations of dear friends we can hope
to meet no more for ever, a blight falls on our path
of life, and we know that whatever of happiness
may await us, our enjoyments can never be as in
days past.
It was late on Saturday night when Arthur
Lloyd reached the elegant mansion in  street,
New York, of which he was now the sole
proprietor
.
The domestics had been expecting his arrival,
and every arrangement had been made, as far as
they knew his wishes and taste, to gratify him.
Wealth will command attention; but in this case
there was more devotion to the man than to his
money; for Arthur was beloved, and affection needs
no prompter.
How sorry I am that this pretty
mignonette
is
not in blossom, said Mrs. Ruth, the housekeeper;
you remember, Lydia, how young Mr. Lloyd
liked the
mignonette
.
Yes, I remember it wellbut I always thought
it was because Miss Ellen called it her flower, and
he wanted to please the pretty little girl.
That might make some difference, Lydia, for
he has such a kind heart. And now I think of it,
I wonder if Miss Ellen knows he is expected home
so soon.
B 2
She does, said Lydia, for I told her
yesterday
but
she did'nt seem to care; and I do not
think she likes him.
She is melancholy, poor child! and who can
blame her, when she has lost her best friend?
Why, Mrs. Ruth, cannot young Mr. Lloyd be
as good a friend as his father? I am sure he will
be as kind.
Yes, no doubt of that. But, Lydia, it will not
do for a young man to be so kind to a pretty girl.
Ellen is now quite a young lady,the world
would talk about it.
I wonder who would dare to speak a word
against Mr. Arthur?said Lydia, reddening with
indignation. When a man's household are his
friends, he hardly need care for the frowns of the
world; and even the gloom of sorrow was relieved
as Arthur shook hands with the old and favoured
domestics, whose familiar faces glowed with that
honest, hearty welcome, which no parasite can
counterfeit. But when he retired to his chamber,
the silence and solitude brought the memory of his
lost friends sadly and deeply on his mind. He felt
alone in the world. What did it avail that he had
wealth to purchase all which earth calls pleasures,
when the disposition to enjoy them could not be
purchased? The brevity of life seemed written on
every object around. All these things had
belonged
to his parents. And now they had no part in
all that was done beneath the sun.
And yet, thought Arthur, who knows that
their interest in earthly things is annihilated by
death? Why may not a good man receive much
of his heavenly felicity from witnessing the growth
of the good seed he has planted in living hearts?
Why may he not be gladdened, even when singing
the song of his own redemption, by seeing that the
plans he had devised for the improvement of his
fellow-beings are in progress, carried forward by
agents whom God has raised up to do their share of
the labour in fitting this world for the reign of the
just?Ifif my good parents are ever permitted
to look down upon the son they have trained so
carefully,God grant they may find he has not
departed
from the way their precepts and example
have alike made plain before him.
There is no opiate, excepting a good conscience,
like a good resolution. And Arthur slept soundly
that night, and passed the Sabbath in the
tranquillity
which a spirit resigned to the will of heaven,
and yet resolved to do all that earth demands of a
rational being, cannot but enjoy. But one thought
would intrude to harass him. His father's death
had occurred while Arthur was far away. He had
not heard the parting counsel, the dying
benediction
.
Perhaps his father had, in his last moments,
thought of some important suggestion or warning
for his son, but there was no ear, tuned by affection,
to vibrate at the trembling sound, and catch and
interpret the whispered and broken sentence, and
so the pale lips were mute.
With such impressions on his mind, Arthur was
prepared to read eagerly a letter, directed to
himself
,
which he found deposited in his father's desk,
purposely, as it appeared, to meet the notice of his
son, before beginning the inspection of those
papers
business would render necessary. I shall give
the entire letter, because the character of the father
must be understood in order to comprehend the
influences which had modelled that of his son.
It is on the very rich and the very poor that
domestic
example and instruction operate with the
most sure and abiding effect. We find the
children
of parents in the middling class, removed
from the temptation of arrogance on the one hand
and despair on the other, are those who admire and
endeavour to imitate the models of goodness and
greatness which history furnishes, or the world
presents. Such may become, what is termed,
self-educated
but
this process the very rich think
unnecessary
,
and the very poor impossible.
Therefore
,
when the early training of these two classes
has inclined them to evil, they rarely recover
themselves
from the contamination. But the letterit
ran thus:
My dear and only Son
.
I informed you in my last letter, that my health
was declining. I felt, even then, though I did not
express it, that I should never see you again in this
world; still I did not anticipate the rapid progress
which my disease has since made. However, I
have much cause for thankfulness. I endure little
pain, and my mind was never more calm and
collected
.
I have resolved, therefore, to arrange some
of my thoughts and reflections for your perusal,
knowing that you will prize them as the last
expression
of your father's love.
I have often endeavoured, in my hours of health,
to bring the final scene of departure from this
world vividly before my mind. I have thought
I had succeeded. But the near approach to the
borders of eternity, wonderfully alters the
appearance
of all earthly things. I often find myself
saying
`What
shadows we areand what shadows
we pursue!'
Shadows, indeed! But it would not be well
that the veil should be removed from the eyes of
those whose journey of life is, apparently, long
before
them. The duties which prepare us for
heaven
must be done on earth. It is this moral
responsibility
which makes the importance of every
action we perform. Considered in this light, the
example of every rational being is invested with a
mighty power for good or evil; and that good is
productive of happiness, and evil of misery, we
need not the award of the last judgment to
convince
us. The history of the world, our
observation
,
our conscience, and our reason, all prove that
to deal justly, to love mercy, and to walk humbly
before God, is the perfection of man's felicity. The
great error lies in mistaking our true interest. We
separate earth from heaven by an impassable gulf,
and in our labours for the body think the spirit's
work has no connexion. This false philosophy
makes us selfish while we are young, and
superstitious
when we are old, and of consequence
unhappy
through life. But these things may be
remedied
.
If the wise man spoke truth, there is a
way
in which we should go
, and we may be so
trained
as to walk in it when we are
young
, and prefer it
when
we
are
old
.
It has, my son, since you were given me, been
the great aim of my life to educate you in such
habits and principles as I believe will ensure your
present and final felicity. When I speak of what
I have done, it is with a humble acknowledgment
of the mercy and goodness of God, who has
supported
and blessed me; and I would impress it on
your heart, that heaven's blessing will descend on
every one who seeks it with patience and with
prayer. But I did not always have these views.
I was not educated as you have been; and it is for
the purpose of explaining to you the motives which
have governed my conduct towards you, that I shall
enter into a recital of some incidents, which you
may know as facts, but of their consequences you
are not aware.
My father, as you have often heard, left a
handsome
fortune to each of his ten children, but as he
acquired his property late in life, by lucky
speculations
,
we were none of us subjected to the
temptations
of luxury in our childhood. We were all
educated to be industrious and prudent, and an
uncommon
share of these virtues had, as the eldest,
been inculcated on me. So that when, in addition
to my well-won thrift, the share I received from
my father's estate made me a rich man, I felt no
disposition to enjoy it in any other mode than to
increase it. I did not mean to drudge always in
the service of mammon; but I thought I must wait
till I was somewhat advanced, before I could
retire
and live honourably without exertion; but, in
the meantime, I would heap pleasures on my
family
.
Your mother was a lovely, amiable woman,
whom I had married from affection, and raised to
affluence; and she thought, out of gratitude to me,
she must be happy as I chose. The only path of
felicity before us, seemed that of fashion; and so
we plunged into all the gaieties of our gay city;
and for eight or ten years we lived a life of
constant
bustle, excitement, show, and apparent mirth.
Yet, Arthur, I declare to you, I was never satisfied
with myself,never contented during the whole
time. I do not say I was wretchedthat would
be too strong an expressionbut I was restless.
The excitements of pleasure stimulate; they never
satisfy. And then there was a constant succession
of disagreements, rivalries, and slanders, arising
from trifling things; but those whose great business
it was to regulate fashionable society, contrived to
make great matters out of these mole-hills. Your
mother was a sweet-tempered woman, forbearing
and forgiving, as a true woman should be; but,
nevertheless, she used sometimes to be involved in
these bickerings, and then what scenes of
accusation
and explanation must be endured before the
matter could be finally settled, and harmony
restored
!
and what precious time was wasted on
questions of etiquette, which, after all, made no
individual
better, wiser, or happier.
We lived thus nearly ten years, and might have
dreamed away our lives in this round of trifling,
had not heaven awakened us by a stroke, severe
indeed, but I trust salutary. We had, as you know,
Arthur, three children, a son and two daughters.
Fashion had never absorbed our souls, so as to
overpower natural affection. We did love our
children most dearly, and every advantage money
could purchase had been lavished upon them. They
were fair flowers, but owing to the delicacy of their
rearing, very frail. One after the other sickened;
the croup was fatal to our little Mary; the measles
and the scarlet fever destroyed the others. In
six months they were all at peace.
Never, never can the feeling of desolation I then
experienced be effaced from my heart. A house
of mourning had no attraction for our fashionable
friends. They pitied, but deserted us; the thought
of our wealth only made us more miserable; the
splendour which surrounded, seemed to mock us.
`For what purpose,' I frequently asked myself,
`for what purpose had been all my labour? I
might heap up, but a stranger would inherit.' My
wife was more tranquil, but then her disposition
was to be resigned. Still she yielded, I saw, to
the gloom of grief, and I feared the consequences.
But her mind was differently employed from what
I had expected.
C
She asked me one day if there was no method
in which I could employ my wealth to benefit
others.
I inquired what she meant.
`I am weary,' said she, `of this pomp of wealth.
It is nothingness; or worse, it is a snare. I feel
that our children have been taken from the
temptations
of the world, which we were drawing
around them. There is surely, my husband, some
object more worthy the time and hearts of
Christians
than this pursuit of pleasure.'
These observations may seem only the
common-place
remarks of a saddened spirit; but to me they
were words fitly spoken. They opened a
communion
of sentiment between us, such as we had never
before enjoyed. I had often felt the vanity of our
fashionable life, but thought my wife was happier
for the display, and that it would be cruel for me
to deprive her of amusements I could so well
afford
,
and which she so gracefully adorned; and
I did not see what better use to make of my riches.
But the spell of the world was broken when we
began to reason together of its folly, and strengthen
each other to resist its enticements.
Man is
sovereign
of the world; but a virtuous
woman is the crown of her husbandand this
proverb
was doubtless intended to teach us that the
highest excellences of the human character, in
either sex, are attainable only by the aid of each
other.
I could fill a volume with our conversations on
these subjects; but the result is the most important:
we resolved to make the aim of doing good the
governing principle of our lives and conduct.
And these resolutions, by the blessing of God,
we were enabled in a measure to fulfil. Our
fashionable
friends ascribed the alteration in our habits
and manners to melancholy for the loss of our
children
;
but it was a course entered on with the firm
conviction of its superior advantages, both of
improvement
and happiness. We realized more than
we anticipated. There is a delight in the exertion
of our benevolent faculties which seems nearly
allied
to the joy of the angels in heavenfor these
are ministering spirits; and this felicity the rich
may command.
In a few years after we had entered on our new
mode of life, you, my son, were bestowed to crown
our blessings. We felt that the precious trust was
a trial of our faith. To have an heir to our fortune
was a temptation to selfishness; to have an heir to
our name was a chord to draw us again into the
vortex
of the world. But we did not look back. We
resolved to train you to enjoy active habits, and
benevolent
pleasures. It was for this purpose I used
to take you, when a little child, with me to visit the
poor, permitting you to give the money you had
earned of me by some feats of strength or
dexterity
,
to those you thought needed it. And when
you grew larger, you recollect, probably, how
steadily
you would work in the shop, with your little
tools, finishing tiny boxes, &c. that your mother or
I paid you for, at stated prices, which money you
appropriated to the support of the poor families in
street. By these means we gave you a
motive
for exertions which improved your health, and
made you happy; and we gave you, also, an
opportunity
of taking thought for others, and enjoying the
pleasure of relieving the destitute. The love for
our fellow-beings, like all other feelings, must be
formed by the wish, and improved by the habit of
doing them good. We never paid you for mental
efforts, or moral virtues, because we thought
these should find their reward in the pleasure
improvement communicated to your own heart
and mind, aided by our caresses and
commendations
,
which testified the pleasure your conduct
gave us.
Thus you see, my son, that in all the restrictions
we imposed, and indulgences we permitted, it was
our grand object to make you a good, intelligent,
useful and happy man. We endeavoured to make
wisdom's ways those of pleasantness to you; and I
feel confident that the course your parents have
marked, will be followed by you, so far as your
conscience and reason shall approve.
You will find yourself what the world calls rich.
To human calculation, had I rigidly sought my
own interest in all my business, I should have left
you a much larger fortune. But who knows that
the blessing which has crowned all my enterprises
would not have been withdrawn, had such selfish
policy governed me? I thank my Saviour that I
was inspired with a wish to serve my fellow men.
And my greatest regret now arises from the
reflection
,
that with such means I have done so little
good. Endeavour, my son, to exceed your father
in righteousness. The earth is the Lord's
consider
yourself only as the steward over the portion
he has assigned you. Enter into business, not to
add to your stores of wealth, but as the best means
of making that wealth useful to the cause of human
improvement. And let the honourable acquisition
and the generous distribution go on together. The
man, whose heart of marble must be smote by the
rod of death, before a stream of charity can gush
forth, deserves little respect from the living.
To
give what we can no longer enjoy
, is not charity
that heavenly virtue is only practised by those
who
enjoy what they give
.
I do not undervalue charitable bequests. These
may be of great public utility; and when they
harmonize
C 2
with the example of the testators, they
deserve
grateful acknowledgment and everlasting
remembrance
.
But I cannot commend, as a model,
the character of a man who has been exclusively
devoted all his life to amassing property, because
he acquires the means of leaving a large charitable
donation at his decease. This seems to be making
virtue a penance, rather than a pleasure.
I wish you, my son, to frame for yourself a
system
of conduct, founded on the rational as well as
religious principle, of doing to others as you would
they should do to you; and then your life, as well
as death, will be a public blessing. Another great
advantage will be, you can hold on your
consistent
,
christian course, to the end. You need never
retire from business, in order to enjoy yourself.
But I must shorten what I would wish to say, were
my own strength greater, or my confidence in your
character less firm. There is one other subject to
which I must refer.
Your dear mother, as you well know, adopted
Ellen Gray, and intended to educate the girl, in
every respect, like a child. After your mother's
death, I placed the child under the care of Mrs. C.,
where she has ever since remained. You know
but little of Ellen, for you entered college soon
after she came to our house, and have been mostly
absent since; but when you return, it will be
necessary
you should, as her guardian, and the only
friend she has a claim upon, become acquainted
with her. She is now at the winning age of
sixteen
a
very lovely being in person and
disposition
;
one that I should be proud to call
my
daughter
.
Her mother was the dear friend of your mother;
and that circumstance, which first induced us to take
the orphan, joined with her own sweetness and
affectionate gratitude, has deeply endeared her to
me. And now, when I am gone, she will feel her
loneliness, for she has no relative; you will have a
delicate part to act as the son of her benefactor, and
the person whom, in the singleness and simplicity
of her pure heart, she will think she has a right to
confide in, to preserve that just measure of kindness
and dignity which will satisfy her you are her
friend, and make the world understand you intend
never to be more. I have secured her an
independence
,
and provided that she shall remain, for
the present, with Mrs. C. May the Father of the
Orphan guard her and bless her! She loved your
mother, Arthur, and for that you must be to her a
brother.
And now, my sonfarewell! I feel my hour has
nearly come, and I am ready and willing to depart.
My last days have been, by the blessing of the
Almighty, made my best. I have
lived
to the last,
and been able to accomplish most of the plans which
lay nearest my heart. Do not grieve that I am at
rest; but arouse all your energies for the work that
is before you. In a country and age distinguished
by such mighty privileges, it requires warm hearts,
and strong minds, and liberal hands to devise, and
dare, and do. May God preserve, strengthen and
bless you.
Your affectionate father,
J.
Lloyd
.
I am glad, thought Arthur, as he wiped away his
tears, after reading the letter for the third time in
the course of the dayI am glad my father has left
me perfectly free respecting Ellen. Had he
expressed
a wish that I should marry her, it would
have been to me sacred as the laws of the Medes
and Persians. Yet I might have felt it a fetter on
my free willand so capricious is fancy, I should
not, probably, have loved the girl as I now hope to
love her, that is, if she will love meas a brother.
CHAPTER II.
Count that day lost, whose low descending sun
Views from thy hand no worthy action done.
It seems strange our children should be so
perverse
;
we have always given them good counsel,
said a lady, whose darling son had just been sent to
sea, as the last scheme parental anxiety could
devise
for his reformation.
Good counsel is a very good thing, doubtless; but
to make it effectual, we must convince our children
that goodness is pleasure. I once saw a lady
punishing
her little son for playing on the Sabbath.
The boy sat sobbing and sulky, and his mother,
whose heart melted at his tears, while her sense of
duty forbade her to indulge him, turned to me and
said: The Sabbath is a most trying day; I can
keep it myself, though it is dull; but my children
have nothing to occupy their minds, and they will
be in mischief. I am always glad when the
Sabbath
is over. The children looked up very
pleasantly
at this, and probably thought their mother
hated the Sabbath as truly as they did; and they
might reason it would be a pleasure to her if there
were no Sabbath.
The elder Mr. Lloyd managed things better.
He maintained that children were inclined to good,
or tempted to evil, by the influences of their
education
;
that the fear of losing a pleasure operated
more forcibly on their hearts than the fear of
incurring
a punishment; and, consequently, that we must
make the way in which we would have them go
seem so pleasant by our own gladness while
treading
it, that they may be inclined to follow, as from
choice. It is a poor compliment to virtue, if her
votaries must be always sad, he would say, and
the
peace and good will
, which the gospel was
given expressly to diffuse over the earth, should
make men gloomy and children miserable.
What he commended he practised. In forming
the character of Arthur, he was careful to make
him distinguish between the happiness which in
his own heart he enjoyed, and that which others
might flatter him with possessing.
The reason why so many are blind to their
best interests, Mr. Lloyd would say, is because
they will trust to their neighbours' eyes rather
than their own. I intend Arthur shall see for
himself. Had Bonaparte done what his own heart
approved, he would have preserved freedom and
the republic; but he wanted the world should
flatter
him, that posterity should honour him, and so
he violated his integrity of purpose, and grasped a
crown that proved but a shadow.
It would be very gratifying to me to describe
particularly the manner of Arthur Lloyd's
domestic
education, the means which were employed to
draw forth his powers, ascertain his peculiar
talents
,
and exercise and direct these as they were
developed. But it is now my purpose rather to
display
effects than trace causes. Yet one thing must
be notedhis father's great aim was to cultivate
the reason and judgment of his son. Mathematics,
and natural history, and philosophy, had been
made to occupy a prominent place in his studies.
The pleasures these pursuits confer, Mr. Lloyd
would wisely remark, cannot be enjoyed without
self-exertion. Any man who has money may
obtain
the reputation of taste by the mere purchasing
of works of art, while his own mind is as inert as the
canvas or statue on which he gazes with so much
seeming admiration. But he who would gain
credit
for understanding mathematical sciences, or
natural
philosophy, must deserve it by patient toil and
persevering industry. Now this thirst for
knowledge
,
which must be won by personal exertion, is
the talisman which will effectually secure the rich
man from the torment of ennui; and if with this
knowledge be united the disposition to make his
talents and means of doing good serviceable to the
world, his own happiness is secure as that derived
from earthly objects can be.
So thought the father, and so he trained his son
to think.
I did not expect to find you thus deeply at
work, said George Willet, a classmate, who had
called on Arthur shortly after he was settled in his
home. Why, the arrangement of all these
minerals
,
and shells, and insects, must be an endless
task? If I had as much money as you, I would
purchase my cabinets ready furnished.
So would I, if all I wanted was to exhibit
them, replied Arthur.
And what more important purpose do you
intend
these shall serve?
I intend they shall contribute to my own
gratification
and improvement, said Arthur. There
is hardly a specimen here but has its history,
which awakens some pleasant association of heart,
memory or mind. Some were presented by men
I honour, and some by friends I love. This
curious
shell was the gift of a lady, on my last
birthday
;
and the benignant wishes that accompanied,
made me, I trust, a better man; or, at least, they
inspired me with new resolutions to deserve her
commendations. These petrifactions and fossils
are a memento of many delightful hours I have
spent with some of the noble French naturalists
and philosophers. That
beetle
I could tell you a
long story about itthe time I spent in watching
its habits, the pains I took to assure myself it was
a nondescript, and the pleasure I enjoyed when
the great Cuvier complimented me for my
patience
and researchbut I fear you would think
this all nonsense.
It is not what I should go to Paris to learn,
returned the other. But then I must think of my
profession; a physician is the slave of the public.
You can use your time as you please, and are not
compelled to coin it into money in order to live.
No, but I have had as hard a lesson, perhaps; I
have had to learn that money will not buy
happiness
,
and that he who is not compelled to labour
for food, must labour for an appetite, which in the
end amounts to about the same thing.
You were always stoically inclined, Arthur;
but a young man, with half a million at command,
will find it rather difficult to act the philosopher.
The world has a powerful current, and fashion a
sweeping breeze.
They will not move me from my course,
George: that is fixed, and, with heaven's blessing,
I will hold on my way. My father's example is
my chart, and the Christian rule my compass.
You think so now. Well, we shall see. Your
D
father was a good man and a happy one, and that
is much in your favour. Had you witnessed, as I
have done, the weary, monotonous, heartless,
wretched life of many who call themselves good
undergo, and, what is worse, inflict on others, you
would not have much inclination for goodness.
Your remarks, George, are just. I have known
young gentlemen to plunge into dissipation
avowedly
to shake off the restraints of morality which
had been imposed in a manner so galling. And I
have known others hold business in abhorrence,
only because the selfish, slavish life their fathers
had led, made application seem a drudgery. I
trust I have more rational viewsthanks to my
good parents.
No man should say he will be always wise.
Who would guess that Arthur, so calm, rational,
and discriminating, would have fallen in love with
a coquette! But this he did, notwithstanding the
penchant
he intended to cultivate for the pretty
Ellen Gray. My lady readers probably thought
she was predestined to be his wife, and I should
have been glad to have described the tender and
tranquil loves of two beings who seemed so
congenial
.
But authors cannot control fate.
Arthur Lloyd was, to be sure, deeply interested
with Ellen's meek and innocent beauty; and he
was touched to the heart by the unaffected sorrow
which any allusion to his parents would excite in
her manner, even when she controlled the
expression
of her grief, which she could not always.
And he often thought nothing could be more
lovely
than her fair face, rather pale perhaps, but then
the predominance of the lily seemed to be the
effect of purity of mind, not languor of body, when
contrasted with the deep mourning habiliments,
which he knew were in truth the outward token
of that sadness of spirit which she was cherishing
for the loss of those who had also been the dearest
to him. Could they choose but sympathise? If
they did, it was very secretly and silently.
It might be that this necessity for communion
was the very cause which prevented Arthur from
feeling other than a brother's affection for the
sweet girl whose interests he was deputed to
defend
and
on her part there hardly seemed a
sister's
confidence yielded to her young guardian.
A guardian! who ever read of a lady falling in
love with her guardian? The impossibility of the
circumstance seemed fully understood and acted
upon by the belles of New York, who were
sedulous
to attract the attention of such a fine man as
Arthur Lloyd. But he was not disposed to
mingle
much in society, and during the winter which
succeeded his father's death, he was almost wholly
engrossed with his business, and various plans for
promoting public education, and elevating the
character
of our national literature. This was the
favourite object to which he resolved to devote his
energies and his resources. He was persuaded
that a republican people must derive their chief
happiness and their highest honours from
intellectual
pursuits, if they intend their institutions shall
be permanent. The glories of conquest and the
luxuries of wealth alike tend to make the few
masters, and the many slaves; but if the mild light
of science and literature be the guide of a people,
all will move onward together, for the impulse of
knowledge has an attractive force that elevates,
proportionally, every mind over which its
influence
can be extended.
Such were Arthur Lloyd's sentiments; and it
would have been strange if he had not felt a deep
respect for the character of the Puritans, and a
wish to cultivate an acquaintance with New
England
people, who, whatever be their faults, have
rarely sinned through ignorance.
So Arthur visited Boston during the summer of
18, and received, from the elevs of society, all
that courtesy and hospitality which a rich stranger
is sure to elicit. He could hardly be termed a
stranger, however, for his father had many
commercial
friends in Boston, and they cordially
transferred their favour to the son. Every thing
was calculated to make Arthur think highly of the
people; the tone of intelligent and liberal feeling
appeared the result of liberality, which had laid
the foundation of popular instruction, and young
Lloyd became every day more satisfied of the
truth of his favourite theorynamelyeducate
all the children and you will reform all the world.
A man is never more self satisfied than when he is
confirming a favourite theory.
Among the multitude of friends and flatterers
that surrounded Arthur, none charmed him so
completely as the Hon. Mr. Markley and family.
The gentleman was himself very eloquent, his
lady very elegant, and their daughters exceedingly
fascinating. They all exerted their talents to
please Arthur,it was no more than he merited
a stranger and a guest, and so handsome, and
intelligent
,
and agreeable! Who thought he was
worth half a million? not the Markleys, for they
were never heard to speak of a selfish sentiment
except to condemn it. Arthur thought he never
met with a more disinterested family.
Arabella Markley was a most captivating
creature
,
and she soon contrived to make Arthur
sensible
of it; and he found, to his mortification, that
he had not so fully and firmly the mastery of his
own mind as he had flattered himself with
possessing
.
D 2
Love exhibits much the same symptoms in
the wise as the weak; and Arthur, when beside
Arabella, forgot there was for him any higher
object
in this world than to please a woman. But
sometimes, in the solitude of his chamber, other
thoughts would arise; he could not but see that the
Markleys were devoted to fashion and gaiety,
though Arabella had assured him she did not
enjoy the bustle, but that excitement was
necessary
for her father's spirits and health.
If she makes this sacrifice for her father,
thought Arthur, how gladly will she conform to
my quiet domestic plan! Still there was
something
in the expression of her face, and more
in her manner, which denoted a fondness for
show and variety; and whenever Arthur wrote to
Ellen Gray, which he often did, as he had
promised
to give her the history of his tour, the
contrast
between her beauty and that of Arabella
always came over his mind. He described
Arabella
in one of his letters to Ellen, and concluded
with observing, If she had a little more of your
tenderness and placidity, in the expression of her
eyes, she would be a perfect model of female
loveliness
,
but that would make her too angelic; the
arch vivacity of her glance assures her to be
human
,
and susceptible of human sympathies.
Ellen Gray read that passage over and over, but
she never answered the letter, for Arthur
returned
to New York before she could arrange her
thoughts for a reply.
Arthur left Boston without any explanation, as
they say, though he had been several times on the
point of making the love speech. It seemed as if
some spell were restraining him, for Arabella had
given him opportunities of seeing her alone, and
Mr. and Mrs. Markley had evidently sought to
draw him to their parties. Perhaps this solicitude
had been one means of deferring the proposals.
Lloyd found himself so agreeably entertained, he
could hardly wish to be happier. Like the
Frenchman who would not marry the lady he
admired and visited constantly, because he should
have no place to pass his evenings, Arthur Lloyd
might have been fearful that
certainty
would
have made his visits, which were hailed as
favours
,
appear only events of course. Young
gentlemen
have thus reasoned.
Arabella was sadly disappointed, for she had
really acted her part most admirably, and she
expected
to succeed. She knew the power of her
charms, and, fond of flattery as she was, had
resolved
such unsubstantial coin should never gain
her hand. A coquette by nature and habit, she
had managed to draw many distinguished beaux in
her train, but none, till Arthur had appeared, had
been rich enough to satisfy her ambition.
However
,
he had agreed to correspond, and she knew
well how to draw an inference, or frame a remark
which would render it necessary for him to
explain
.
So they partedboth persuaded in their own
hearts that they should soon meet, though he did
not feel that the choice was one his parents would
entirely have approved. But her letters might
prove her excellence; he knew the fashionable
scenes in which he had chiefly beheld her were
not calculated to display the amiable traits of
character
in a female. And there were several
circumstances
which occurred to Arthur, as he
journeyed
homeward, that determined him to be
guarded in his letters, at least for a season. And
he determined also to consult Ellen Gray on the
subject, for he considered her as having a sister's
right to his confidence. But Ellen was very ill,
he found, and any allusion to the fair lady he had
seen in Boston seemed difficult to introduce to one
who looked so sad and serious. Nevertheless, he
ventured to name the subject once, and Ellen
listened calmly to all his praises of Arabella; and
to his reiterated request that his
sister
, as he called
Ellen, should give him her opinion. She advised
him to marry the lady if he loved her, and felt
assured she loved him. The last remark was
spoken in a low tone, and Mrs. C., the preceptress,
entering at that moment, thought Ellen was too
much fatigued for further conversation. And so
it proved, for she was seriously ill for several days
after, and it was weeks before she was able to see
Arthur again.
In the meantime the correspondence between
Mr. Lloyd and Arabella commenced with spirit;
on his part, rather intended to fathom her
principles
and taste, than her affections; and on hers,
under an appearance of careless vivacity, to
ascertain
his real intentions respecting her. There
is nothing like a little jealousy for expediting love
matters, many ladies believe; and Arabella held
the creed fully, as her third letter proved. It was
filled with the description and praises of an
emigrant
Frenchman, Count de Verger, who had
recently
arrived in Boston. His merits could be
equalled only by his misfortunes, which had been
manifold as those of Ulysses. His courage and
constancy had hitherto borne him up, but when he
arrived pennyless on the shore of the New World,
his mental sufferings were, as Arabella described
them, extreme. In Europe, a man was respected
for his birth and breeding, and, though he had lost
his property, his rank entitled him to
consideration
.
But in our republic, where men were
judged by their own merits, not by their father's
title, the unlucky Count de Verger feared that his
misfortunes might be imputed as crimes. He
would endure poverty, but not contempt. He
had once resolved to conceal his rank, and even
his name, but his abhorrence of falsehood and
hypocrisy
enabled him to overcome this false pride;
and so he was known for a nobleman, though he
modestly disclaimed all intention of endeavouring
to support his rank. If he could earn sufficient by
his talents and accomplishments to maintain
himself
,
he felt that he should be truly happy. Among
his accomplishments was that of playing the harp,
with a degree of skill surprising, when it was
considered
that he had only practised for his own
amusement. But he now thought it possible he
might make this knowledge of music available, if
any of the fair ladies of Boston should feel
disposed
to take lessons on the harp. His wonderful
condescension was no sooner known than there
appeared a competition among fashionable ladies
who should first secure the services of this amiable
and gifted nobleman. His tuition charges were
exorbitant, but he was a foreigner, and a Count,
and, besides, he had been unfortunate, and
republicans
must pay liberally for the graces which can
only be taught by those who have witnessed the
refinements of royal taste, and the magnificence of
courts.
These were the items of intelligence Arabella
dilated
upon, with touching pathos, in her letter to
Arthur Lloyd; she was in raptures with the Count
de Verger. Such an accomplished scholar! so
perfect
and gentlemanly. His mind was a
constellation
of all brilliant qualities; his manners the
embodied
essence of suavity and elegance! There
were but two objections the most fastidious critic
could make to his appearance. He squinted a
little
but
Arabella did not dislike a slight cast of
the eye, it rather gave a fascinating effect to a
handsome countenance. The other fault was, in
her opinion, a perfection. The Count wore
mustachios
,
and our smooth puritan-faced men of
business
disliked mustachios; but Arabella was glad
the ladies had more taste for the picturesque. For
her part she should, for the future, make it a
sine
qua non
with all gentlemen who aspired to her
friendship to cultivate mustachios. It was
needless
to say she was learning to play the harp; it
might more properly be called adoring it. She
was never before so engrossed with any pursuit;
and she only wished, to complete her felicity, that
Mr. Lloyd could become acquainted with her
tutor, and witness the proficiency she was making.
Fudge! said Arthur, giving audible
expression
to his thoughts, as he kicked a fallen brand
with the petulance of a poet, forgetting there was
poker, tongs, or servants in the world. Fudge!
wears mustachios and squintsI'll see the
fellow
.
Arthur felt disappointed; not so much that
Arabella
proved a coquette, as that his estimate of the
effect of education on the female mind should be
found false. He had drawn his conclusion
logically
:
thus, virtuous and intelligent women are
sincere
and reasonable. New-England ladies are
virtuous and intelligent: therefore they are sincere
and reasonable. And yet here was one who had
enjoyed every mental and moral advantage a lady
could require to perfect her character, acting the
part of an artful coquette; or otherwise she was a
silly dupe, for the story of the Count de Verger,
Arthur credited no more than the adventures of
Baron Munchausen.
He did not write to Arabella to announce his
intention of visiting her, fearing the Count might,
in that case, retire for a season, and he much
wished
to see him. So Arthur reached Boston and
astonished his friends, who could find no solution
for the sudden movement, but that he had learned
the danger there was that Miss Markley would be
won by the gallant Frenchman; and all the
inquiries
he made respecting the Count, he had the
mortification of finding were regarded as the
promptings of a jealous spirit seeking to find
matter
of accusation against a rival. Many of the
gentlemen whom he addressed on the subject,
declared
their belief that the professor of the harp
was a real count; his bearing and manner were
decidedly
noble, and there was a thorough-bred air
in his address which distinguished foreigners of
high rank, and which our richest and most eminent
men, who were always compelled to speak of
themselves as plain citizens, and only enjoying
equal privileges with the people, never could
display
.
I would give fifty thousand, said a young
mercantile gentleman, whose father had by careful
industry amassed a large fortune, if I could
appear
with the case and elegance of the Count de
Verger: I met him the other day at the dinner
party of Mr. , and I assure you he was the
lion of the day. It is no wonder the ladies
admire
him.
No, it is no wonder, thought Arthur, that
our ladies despise us for not possessing the
manners
of slaves, while we men so undervalue and
abuse our privilege of being free. If fashion and
etiquette are to be considered the most important
objects of pursuit among those who assume the
first place in our society, we shall always be
inferior
to the nations where the distinctions of rank
and descent of property are so established, that
E
fashion and etiquette can have trained subjects and
established laws. We republicans must have our
standard of respectability founded on moral worth,
usefulness and intelligence, or the discrepancy
between
our institutions and manners will make us
ridiculous in the eyes of other nations, and
contemptible
in that of our own. But I will see this
Count, and if he prove to be my old valet
compressing his lips as if to prevent the
expression
of a hasty resolve, he bent his steps to the
dwelling of Mr. Markley.
It was in the morning, and too early for a
fashionable
call, but Arthur had learned that the
Count de Verger gave lessons to Miss Markley at
half past ten; and that the young lady frequently
admitted her particular friends to congratulate her
respecting the astonishing progress she made on
the harp. Mr. Lloyd was known to the servants
as a favourite visitor, and found no difficulty in
being admitted, and ushered familiarly into the
parlour where Arabella was practising. There
were two ladies, her intimate friends, and one
gentleman present. Neither Arabella nor the
Count noticed the entrance of Mr. Lloyd, and he
stood for several minutes regarding them.
Arabella
was playing with enthusiasm; it was evident
she was charmed with her own performance; and
her noble teacher sat beside her, the music book
open in his hand, his small keen eyes cast partly
upward in admiration; but as his glance could rest
on the face of his fair pupil, it was not certain
whether her beauty or her music caused his
raptures
.
Martin, said Mr. Lloyd, in a deep,
commanding
tone.
The Count started to his feet, every nerve
agitated
,
as though he had received a shock from a
galvanic battery.
Jean Martinhow came you here?
continued
Lloyd, sternly.
II am not herethat is your mistakeI
am the Count de Verger. Lloyd walked closely
up to the imposter. Villain, let me hear no
more of your falsehoods; away, instantly, or you
shall answer for your crimes.
The accomplished nobleman obeyed the order
promptly as it was given, bolting from the
apartment
without the ceremony of a single bow. There
was blank silence for a moment, when Arabella
indignantly
inquired the reason of such a proceeding
in her father's house, and without her father's
knowledge.
Pardon me, Miss Markley, said Arthur; I
am aware my conduct requires explanation. That
fellow was my valet. I hired him in Paris;
shrewd, ingenious and attentive, he won my
confidence
,
and for many months I treated him more
like a friend than servant. He accompanied me
to Germany, and there found means to rob me of a
considerable sum of money, besides a casket of
jewellery I had in my charge, belonging to a banker
of Paris, and for which I was responsible. Martin
escaped, and I had no idea of ever meeting him
again, till your eloquent description of the Count
de Verger awakened my suspicions. I came here,
therefore, unceremoniously, for which I again beg
pardon, but trust you and your father will not
regret
the imposter is detected and exposed.
You must be mistaken, Mr. Lloyd. This
gentleman
is a real Count, I have seen his coat of arms,
and seals and rings.
Just then Mr. Markley entered; the whole affair
was detailed, and Lloyd produced an order which
had been granted by the Austrian government, for
the apprehension of Jean Martin for the robbery;
the paper contained a particular description of his
person, and all, except Arabella, were convinced of
the identity of the cidevant valet and the elegant
Count de Verger.
It is impossible a person so exquisitely skilled
in music, and every accomplishment, can be of
base extraction and character, sighed Arabella.
You fancied him noble, and invested him with
all rare qualities. It is true, he has some skill in
music, but he played vastly better for his title,
than though you had heard him as my valet.
The lady tossed her head scornfully, taking care
at the same time to wreathe her features in a very
sweet smilethe scorn was intended for Martin,
the smile for Lloyd; and then she requested the
latter to tell her all the particulars, saying that she
felt under the greatest obligations for the care he
had shown to detect an imposition which she could
never have suspected, and in which the whole
town participated. Arthur might have complied
with her request; he might even have forgiven her
taking lessons of his valet, and honouring him as a
nobleman, for he was aware that other ladies had
been deceived by Martin, and that his own sex had
favoured the imposter, because he pretended to a
title; but as she extended her hand in token of
amity, his eye caught a brilliant on her finger; he
knew it was one of the banker's jewels.
That was the gift of Martin, said he.
Of the Count de Verger, she stammered.
Arthur bade her good morning. The next day
he left Boston, but not before he had learned that
the Count had decamped, leaving his landlord's
bill, and sundry loans of money from honourable
men undischarged.
E 2
It will learn me wisdom, I hope, said one
gentleman. I will never again lend money to
the Count, when I would not trust it to the man.
Arthur Lloyd was blamed by some prudent
people
,
for the abruptness of his proceedings in the
affair, as it severely wounded the feelings of the
Markleys. Arabella did not recover from this
shock till after she learned that Mr. Lloyd had
wedded the pretty Ellen Gray, when she sent him
a congratulating letter, which ended their
correspondence
.
I wish I could describe the course Arthur Lloyd
is now pursuing, without incurring the charge of
personality. There are so few like him, that the
picture would be instantly recognized. But I can
repeat two of his favourite maxims.
The firstWe must educate our sons to
consider
the title of
Republican
a prouder boast than
the highest order of nobility that implies
subjection
,
and requires homage to a mortal.
SecondWe must train our daughters to
respect
talent in a man more than money, and a
character
for usefulness more than a showy exterior;
to consider their countrymen superior to the men
of every other nation in the world; and mental and
moral worth a passport to the best society.
THE CATHOLIC CONVERT.
Wilt thou then forget,
That on the banks of this delightful stream
We stood together?and that I, so long
A worshipper of Nature, worshipped thee
With warmer love?
Mr.
Theophilus Redfield
, and his wife
Susanna
,
were a couple that, judging by ordinary
occurrences
,
such as those in which steam and
enthusiasm
have no agency, seemed as unlikely to figure
on the pages of a book, as in the east room at
Washington. They were, in their own sphere, a
pattern couple: prudent, pious and prosperous,
gathering the maxims that guided their temporal
course from the economies of Franklin, and their
summary of religious faith from the Westminster
Catechism.
Let no one understand me as speaking lightly of
that Catechism. It was framed by good men, and
doubtless with the best intentions. But there can
be no perfect system of faith as expounded by
men; and there should be no creed which requires
the human mind to render its unqualified assent
before it has examined and reflected. The works
of Nature and the Book of Revelation should be
made familiar studies of the young, and they
should be encouraged to reason, from what is
revealed
to their senses and their consciences, of the
past, the present and the future; and to form a
standard of moral rectitude from the precepts of
the Saviour, which, as their own hearts have felt
its justice, they cannot violate without the remorse
of having done wrong. When men accept a theory
on trust, they always have the convenient salvo,
that it was not framed to suit their casethat
others, acknowledging its injunctions, often
disobey
them, and that a little extra strictness in one
point, will atone for laxity in another. In short,
that the creed was framed by those who have an
interest in supporting it; and if the evasion can be
so managed as to increase the interest, (otherwise
the pecuniary profit!) a dereliction will be quietly
acquiesced in, if not commended. Mr. Redfield
was, probably, under such an impression, when he
replied to the observation of a truly benevolent
gentleman, who was urging on him the importance
of introducing improvements in the schools,
libraries
,
and mental and moral pursuits of the
people
around himthat such things must take their
chance; that he paid his taxes punctually, which
was all that could justly be expected of him.
But, urged the gentleman, you are growing
rich every year; and we, who hold the faith which
teaches us that riches are of no acceptance in the
sight of God, but as they are employed in His
service
,
should consider how our charities may be
most beneficially dispensed.
That may be true, returned Mr. Redfield,
but I am persuaded that the most beneficial
charity
I can perform, is to pay a large tax for the
support of the Gospel, and this I cannot do without
a large estate to be taxed. Our clergyman told me
the other day, that he wished every man in his
parish was as able to pay as I was. Does that look
like undervaluing property?
Thus will selfishness always find an excuse,
when only governed by the opinions or examples
of men. And thus Mr. Redfield and his wife
persuaded themselves that, while they kept the
Sabbath day with pharisaical strictness, the other
six days were their own. They strove for earth
and sighed for heaven, and failed of enjoyment
in the pursuit of either. I said they were
pious
,
and it was not an ironical observation. I
believe
that they were Christians, that they did in
their hearts prize the favour of God above that of
the world; but somehow, they had oddly jumbled
ideas of heaven and earth, and never could think
of treasures, even in the former, meaning any
thing but money or movables; and for the latter,
why their pleasant farm was never considered by
them in reference to its beautiful situation and
scenery
,
but only as being worth so much cash.
Did you ever, reader mine, visit Brattleborough,
(Vermont)or see the View of Brattleborough,
a picture by Fisher? If you have done neither, you
can hardly conceive of the peculiar beauties of this
pretty little village, where our story will detain
you a full year. It is a most charming summer
residence; its romantically rural aspect, on the
banks of the soft-flowing Connecticut, which seems
breathing freshness and verdure on the undulating
hills around, and on the living green of the full
foliaged trees, till the landscape is a paradise of
dewy coolness, shady arbours, fountains, fragrance,
and all other felicities comprised in that expressive
word,
comfortable
in a burning summer's day.
And here, in this pleasant village, lived, or
rather did live, Mr. Theophilus Redfield. His
dwelling is still there, a neat white house, half
hidden
among the shrubbery that surrounds the whole
front of the buildings, obstructing the full view of
the river from the lower windows; but then, there
was a most glorious prospect from the second story!
Behind the house an upland of green fields stretches
far away, and seems to melt into a wild waving
wood, that looks as if it were the fitting haunt of
love and contemplation, but not of melancholy
musings
.
Melancholy has few temples in our young
country
.
Her worshippers must commune with the
fallen column, the ivied tower and the desolate
city: we happily have none of these. Certainly
Mr. Redfield and his industrious wife would have
been sorely offended had any person called their
domicile melancholybut after the occurrence I
am about to relate, they might have confessed it
was a little romantic, or at least that a strange
circumstance
had come to pass there.
It was in the month of October, 18, and about
nine o'clock in the evening; Mr. and Mrs. Redfield
were sitting
tte--tte
before a bright fire in their
winter parlour, for the autumn was a very cold
one, and in fact Mrs. Redfield considered winter as
already begun. She was busy with her needle,
preparing clothing for her household, for in all
the excellencies of industry she might have boldly
claimed the premium from Solomon, had he
instituted
prizes for such proofs of wisdom in ladies.
Nor did her work wholly engross her mind: she
was delivering a household harangue, which, in its
style, imitated very closely some of our
distinguished
poets, being, like their rhymes, diffusive
and digressive, a bundle of words concealing the
ideas, if any there were, as effectually as the
covering
of the cocoa-nut conceals the kernel. Mr.
Redfield
,
good man, was a silent if not attentive
auditor
,
as, reclining in his chair, he allowed his better
half to speak unmolested, till her lecture was
suddenly
brought to a close by a violent rapping, as
with a heavy stick, on the front door.
What's the matter nowsomebody dying!
ejaculated Mr. Redfield, as he hastily started to
open the door. It was not locked, nor did a thought
of robbers enter into the mind of the peaceful
farmer
;
for never had an outrage of any kind
disturbed
the people of that peaceful village since the
red men had passed away;but now, when, on
opening the door, he saw a tall man, a stranger,
habited in black, with a black handkerchief drawn
up nearly to his temples, his hat pulled over his
forehead, till nothing of his face was visible, save a
nose of such formidable dimensions as to bid
defiance
to concealment, and a pair of keen gray
eyes, deep set beneath coal-black heavy eyebrows,
he felt that kind of sensation, and gave that start,
which in a woman would have indicated fear, but
in a man could have been nothing but surprise.
Mr. Redfield had the light in his hand: he
stepped
back one step, probably to prevent it from
being
extinguished by the wind, that was at intervals
coming in hollow and sweeping gusts. The
stranger
had a heavy walking-cane in one hand; with
F
the other he put aside the handkerchief from his
mouth; but Mr. Redfield remarked that he kept his
face concealed by his hand, while the following
conversation was going on:
You are the owner of this estate, I presume,
said the stranger, speaking in an abrupt, harsh tone.
I call it mine.
If it is not yours in reality, I suppose you
reside
here.
Yes, yesI and my family.
And your name is?
Redfield, sirTheophilus Redfield.
Shall you reside here another twelvemonth?
Shall I?I guess sounless I sell the place,
and there is no sort of likelihood of that.
Well, sir, I wish to know if you will take a
boarder?
Why, as to that, sir, I cannot say. We never
have taken any but the schoolmaster, and one or
two young ministers, that is, students of divinity,
and whether my wifeThe stranger showed
his impatience by his gestures, and Mr. Redfield
hurried to the conclusion with a rapidity he never
before used in a colloquy where a bargain was
depending
,
and declined taking boarders.
At this juncture Mrs. Redfield appeared beside
her husband. She had heard the conversation, and
regretted the decision, as she thought, by taking
boarders, she might obtain the handling of more
money than fell to her lot in the general
management
of affairs out of the house; she came,
therefore
,
to make inquiries respecting terms, &c., hoping
that her husband would finally be persuaded to
accept
them, if favourablebut when she saw the
dark stranger, she was not in a hurry to address
him. She afterwards declared that there was
something
very frightful in his appearance, though she
did not exactly know what. But he felt no such
embarrassment at her presence. The female
character
usually inspires confidence in a petitioner,
and in this instance it operated irresistibly on the
stranger. He was turning haughtily away, when
Mr. Redfield concluded his refusal, as though he
despised entreaty; but now he addressed the lady,
and his voice was milder, as he inquired if she had
any objection to the taking of a young girl and a
little child into her family, for whose
accommodations
she should be richly paid.
A child! Pray, how old is it? she inquired.
About three years. And to obviate the need
of all further questions, I will state my wishes. I
want you should furnish two apartments, a parlour
and sleeping-roomboth on the second floorfor
the young lady and the child; you must serve their
meals in their own room; you must give them all
necessary attendance, such as you would bestow
were they your own children; and you must ask
them no questions; such as where they come from?
who they are? &c. &c., after the usual manner of
the Yankees;you must promise, on your hopes of
salvation, to do all that I have stated, and I will pay
you five hundred dollars for the year's board.
Pay it!when? eagerly demanded Mr.
Redfield
.
Nowto-nightas soon as you have agreed
to my proposal, and received the young lady into
your house.
The husband and wife looked at each other.
There was wonder, perplexity, and a shade of
distrust
on both their countenances; but it gradually
yielded to an expression of satisfaction, as the
thought of the money overpowered all other
feelings
.
They agreed to receive the boarders. The
stranger left them, saying he would return by
twelve, and that the apartments must then be
ready for the young lady.
Had I leisure and skill to be as minute in the
analization of motives, and the delineation of
feelings
,
as the author of Cloudesly, it would here
be an excellent opportunity to portray the
workings
of those universal passionscuriosity and
the love of gainwhich were agitating the bosoms
of the farmer and his wife, while preparing to
receive
their lodgers. Mr. Redfield said but little;
men are cautious of expressing their thoughts on a
doubtful subjectthey must reason and reflect
awhile; but women (thanks to their intuitive
genius
)
find no such process of ratiocination
necessary
.
Mrs. Redfield understood the whole matter.
The gentleman (gentleman she called him,
though she felt in her heart that he looked like a
ruffian; but then he was rich, or how could he
afford to pay so much for the board?) had
relinquished
house-keeping; probably he came from
New York or Boston, where board was expensive,
and probably he was himself going to Europe, and
these were his children, that he thought best to
leave in the country. It cannot be his wife,
said she, for he called her a girl; but when I see
her I can judge better what she is.
Twelve o'clock came, and punctual to the
moment
came the stranger, in a close carriage, and
alighting, and taking the child from the arms of
the female, he very assiduously helped her from
the carriage, and led her into the entry;pausing
there, he demanded, in no very pleasant tone, to
be shown up stairs.
Had you not better walk into the parlour, and
let the young lady warm herwe have the best
fire heresaid Mrs. Redfield.
She will be best in her own apartment, he
drily answered.
F 2
Mr. Redfield lighted them up stairs, and as
they entered the chamber, began some excuses
about the room, naming other articles of furniture
which they
calculated
to procure.
The stranger did not appear to heed him; but,
taking the light, very deliberately inspected the
chambers, and then told Mr. Redfield that he
would soon descend and settle the whole business.
Mr. Redfield had no reasons to offer why he
should stay longer, and so he complied with the
hint, though he felt quite curious to catch a
glimpse of the lady's face before he went; but this
he could not do, as she kept her veil closely drawn
about it.
It was a full hour before the stranger descended,
and that interim seemed to the good people almost
beyond endurance. For once in their lives they
were in that excited state of curiosity which
novel-readers
find so delightful; and, moreover, they
felt themselves actors in the scene. Never had
the god of sleep a more regular worshipper than
Mr. Redfield had always been; and to be wide
awake at one o'clock in the morning, was a
phenomenon
which had never before occurred since
his marriage. What power the mind, when
roused to activity, has over the senses!and what
a slothful life those live who are always fettered
by cares for the body!
When the stranger made his appearance, it was
only to pay the money, and present a list of such
articles as he deemed necessary to complete the
furnishing of the apartments. While Mr.
Redfield
was looking over the money and the list, his
wife sought to scrutinize the stranger; but his glance
met hers with so haughty and almost
contemptuous
an expression, that she, wishing to have an
excuse for leaving the room, inquired if the young
lady would want any thing. The answer was a
cold negative; and so she took up her
knitting-work
to hide the confusion she could not but feel
at the strange manners of her guest.
When Mr. Redfield had completed his
examination
,
he inquired if he should not write a
receipt
for the money, and also give a written
promise
of the manner in which it was to be
cancelled
.
No, replied the stranger, no. I have not
placed this confidence in your integrity without
closely inquiring your character. From all I can
gather, I believe you will be faithful to an
engagement
which appeals to your conscience, to
your good faith; yet should I take a bond, you
might, in the way of trade, consider it fair to take
every advantage possible. But now, when I treat
you with the confidence of a Christian, you will
not fail in doing as you would be done by. Take
good care of these childrenin one year you shall
hear from me again. Should either of them be
dangerously ill, this paper may be opened, but not
till the physician gives them over. Of course you
will employ the best physician, and he shall be
paid. He handed a sealed packet to Mr.
Redfield
,
and then turned to his wife, and spoke a
few words, earnestly commending the children to
her maternal protection; and she always declared
his voice was tender then, and she was quite
sure she saw a tear in his eye, and she felt
convinced
he might be a good man after all. So
certainly does the genuine appearance of
affectionate
feelings convince us that the heart which
cherishes
them cannot be all evil.
The stranger was leaving the room. One
question I must ask, said Mrs. Redfield; the
names
Mary and George, he hastily said,
anticipating
her inquiry. And now, madam, you
have all the knowledge necessary to this subject.
You have voluntarily and solemnly bound
yourselves
to the fulfilment of certain dutiesthese I
shall require of you; and you are also bound to
restrain
your curiosity; beware that you do not
violate
your promise.Farewell.
That was an eventful night to Mr. and Mrs.
Redfield; they had many strange thoughts, and
characteristic ones toothe man thinking of the
money, the woman of the mystery; he anxious
about the trust he had undertaken, and she
anxious
to see the children. It was a very long night
to them both, but morning came at last, and soon
found Mrs. Redfield in the apartments of her
charge. What she said to those young
adventurers
,
and how she examined every thing about
them, and how she endeavoured to find out
whether
the tears of Mary (which, in spite of her
efforts to restrain, were filling her large dark eyes,
till their expression was so full of mournful grief
that Mrs. Redfield said it made her heart ache to
look on the poor thing) were caused by the
sorrow
of parting from her friends, or by some deep
misfortunes, with many other particulars I cannot
stop to enumerate. She summed up her report to
her husband, which, it must be confessed, was as
rambling as any fashionable lecture need be that
comprises half the sciences and the whole of
modern
improvements, by declaring that the girl was
the most beautiful creature she had ever set her
eyes on, and that the boy was a little darling,
almost as handsome as their own Jem.
How old is the girl? inquired Mr. Redfield.
She cannot be more than sixteen. I should
not think she was so old as that, only she looks so
sober, and behaves so lady-like.
And what is the age of the boy?
O, about three years, I should guess.
Then she is not the mother of the child?
Oh! bless you! no, Mr. Redfield. They must
be brother and sisterthough they don't look
alike either, nor they don't look any like their
father.
Their father!Do you think the man who left
them here was their father!
Indeed I do. I saw the father's look in his
eye, when he spoke of their being sick. I didn't
see his face very plainly, to be sure, but I believe,
for all that, I should know him again.
You say these children do not resemble him?
Not in the leastand yet there is something
in the face of the young lady that might make one
think she is his daughter. Her hair is black as
a raven, and you know how black his eyebrows
were. He didn't take off his hat, so I cannot tell
how his forehead looked; but she has a beautiful
forehead, full, and white as alabaster, and when
her eyelids droop, it seems as if she was at prayer,
and she looks so angel-like that it made me feel a
little afraid to gaze upon hersomething as I felt
last night, when that strange man was talking to
us,and on the whole, I have no doubt but he
is her father.
And the father of the boy, too?
Why, yesthey are relations, I know. He
kept his arm around her neck all the time I was
there, and she kissed himand they seemed to
love each other just as our children do. He is a
dear pretty boy; his hair curls all over his head
light brown hair; his eyes are blue as the sky, and
his face fair as an apple. I hope he can talk plain.
This visit, I am sorry to say, was not strictly in
accordance with the principles of Christian
integrity
.
Mrs. Redfield did long to unravel the
mystery
,
and notwithstanding she had promised to ask
no questions, she considered herself at liberty to
listen to communications, and sincerely did she
hope that the prattle of the little boy would betray
the secrets of his family. Every lady who does
not read this story deliberately through, but turns
to the conclusion to learn the
denouement
, may
be pretty certain that she would, under like
circumstances
,
have indulged similar feelings with
this inquisitive lady.
However, Mrs. Redfield was grievously
disappointed
.
The boy could not speak a connected
sentence, and she often remarked on the disparity of
intellect between the sexes in childhood. Girls,
she would say, know as much at three years of
age, as boys do at five; and my little Lucy, who is
only fourteen months old, can talk better than
George, who is twice her age; and I don't see, for
my part, any reason the men have to think their
sex are ever superior in mind to us women. I
don't believe any such thing.
But notwithstanding this heresy, she was an
excellent
wife and mother, and most kindly did she
watch over the young strangers committed to her
care. It might be, that the indefatigable attention
she bestowed on them, was somewhat stimulated
by her ardent desire to find out their secret;
certain
it is, that few of their movements, and none
of their peculiarities, escaped her notice.
Mr. Redfield had enjoined it on his wife to be
entirely silent respecting the manner in which
their boarders had been introduced. Our
neighbours
may envy us, said he, and contrive some
way to injure us, if they find we are making
money
.
Keeping these children is a good chance to
us; and to secure the blessings of God, we must do
our duty to ourselves as well as to others; we must
take good care of the children, and take good care
to keep our own counsel.
Mrs. Redfield had thus a task to fulfil which
might have posed the patience of a Griselda,she
had to stifle her curiosity and restrain her loquacity.
But she found, as every lady will, that advantages
always result from those trials which are met
and borne in the path of our duty:she reflected
more during this time of her trials, than she ever
did before during her whole life. To discover
why and wherefore those children were placed
under her roof, cost her much study; and that she
failed at last, can no more be ascribed to her want
of ingenuity in framing her hypothesis, than it can
be said Archimedes failed in the construction of
his machinery, because he did not actually move
the world. The philosopher and the matron
both found the same difficulty, namely, in fixing
the
whereabout
to begin. But if Mrs. Redfield
was perplexed, she was not discouraged, and she
continued her observations till she had ascertained
one fact positively. Mary, the fair, innocent
Mary, was a papist!These were the proofs:
She would never attend meetings; she would not
eat meat on Fridays; she had a rosaryand
On her white breast a sparkling cross she wore.
And, moreover, though she had a choice collection of
books, sent her a few days after she came, probably
by her father, yet she spent most of her time
reading
a few volumes which she kept in a small trunk,
and which Mrs. Redfield ascertained she had brought
with her. The good lady contrived to get a peep
at these, and found a breviary and Legends of
the Saints, comprising the miracles of the most
eminent Catholic devotees of both sexes. There
were also sermons and homilies, and a volume of
G
pious poems, all having some allusion to the
Catholic
faith; besides a number of volumes in French
and Italian, which, as Mrs. Redfield could not
understand
a single word, she thought must be full
of all manner of evil things.
She is certainly a papist, poor thing! said the
matron, in a tone of deep commiseration, as she
recounted all these matters to her husband. She
is a papist. What can we do to convince her of
the dangers and falsehood of that religion?
You must persuade her to come down in the
evening and attend our family prayers; I will
select
such chapters in the Bible as explain the true
faith, and I need not say that I shall pray earnestly
that she may understand them aright. I suppose
she does not know any thing about the Bible, and
so her's is wholly the sin of ignorance.
Mrs. Redfield had full confidence in the
judgment
of her husband; but while she kept the end
in view which he recommended, she liked to
follow
her own fancy in the means of accomplishing
it. He had expressed his wish that Mary should
be persuaded to attend family duties. Mrs.
Redfield
did not think it politic to hint such a wish to
the lovely sinner; she only strove to coax little
George to play with her children, and soon
succeeded
in making him completely at home in every
part of the house; and then he became so found of
Jem Redfield, a boy about his own age, that Mary
requested as a favour, that Mrs. Redfield would
permit Jem to join George in the picture lessons
which she daily gave him. This request was
eagerly
complied with, and in a short time all the young
Redfields (there were five) became familiar
visitants
in Mary's apartment, and she instructed them
all, showing, to use a favourite expression of their
mother's, that the young lady knew every thing.
This teaching, with which Mary began to amuse
the children, and keep them from noisy plays while
in her apartment, soon appeared to interest her;
and Mrs. Redfield found she grew more cheerful,
and became sufficiently engrossed in the progress
of her pupils to speak of them and their
improvement
.
George she evidently doted on with an
elder sister's fondness; and when she found it
made him unhappy to be confined to her room,
she would frequently accompany him to the
parlour
,
if no one was there but Mrs. Redfield; and
the worthy woman contrived to be alone as much
as possible. She found a secret that she was
obliged to keep, detracted very much from the
pleasures of gossipping, and so she made the
pretext
of her boarders, the care they required, an
excuse for neglecting to visit her neighbours.
Thus living secluded, and treating the timid Mary
with all the tenderness that policy dictated as the
means of gratifying curiosity, and conscience
enforced
as the duty of a Christian, the young
strangers finally became like children, and Mr.
Redfield had the satisfaction of knowing that
Mary listened while he read the 13th and 14th
chapters of the Book of Revelation, and poured
forth a most animated anathema against the
scarlet-coloured
beast, and the great red dragon!
From that time he confidently predicted her
conversion. Mrs. Redfield was not quite so
sanguine
she
did not think a girl so young as Mary
would be much influenced by the reasonableness
of a proposition; she must be led by gentle
persuasions
,
and by those tender appeals that would
move her feelings, and thus induce her to examine
the grounds of her faith. Mrs. Redfield was
conscious
of her own incompetence for such a delicate
task; and though she acknowledged the
superiority
of her husband's talents, she could not but
see that he was better qualified to make property
than proselytes. So to remedy all deficiencies, she
concluded to call in an allyand the tact of the
woman was manifest in her choice. This was no
other than a young gentleman, Alexander Watson
by name, a student of divinity with the
clergyman
of Brattleborough. Mr. Watson had boarded
with Mrs. Redfield, and she thought him, what in
truth he was, one of the excellent of the earth.
He had been absent from the village during the
winter, but was expected to spend the summer
there, and complete his studies. Mrs. Redfield
determined to receive him again as a boarder, and
by making him a confidant of her fears for the
faith of Mary, engage him to use his oratorical
powers, which the good woman thought would
convince or confound the Pope himself.
There might have been objections to this
scheme, had Mrs. Redfield thought proper to have
investigated them. But in her great anxiety for
the soul of Mary, she forgot there would be any
danger from placing her heart, or that of the
student
,
in jeopardy. Yet, as our extremest caution
cannot obviate all evil, nor secure all good, it is
undoubtedly the best policy, even in a worldly
point of view, to have faith that our pure and
righteous intentions will be crowned with success.
Mrs. Redfield had the consciousness of meaning to
do good, and so went forward and onward with
the enthusiasm of a reformer and a woman. The
result was, that Mr. Alexander Watson became
one of the family of the Redfields, and so well
cooperated
in the plan, that Mary, in a few weeks,
seemed to consider him as a brother; and if not
her spiritual director, he was the director of her
studies, and shared the rambles which she was at
first persuaded to take on the account of little
G 2
George, but which she soon seemed to enjoy as
much as any of the children.
It was wonderful, Mrs. Redfield said, to see
how Mary improved. When she first came, she
was beautiful to be sure
A violet, by a mossy stone,
Half hidden from the eye!
but it was the pale unanimated beauty of a statue,
rather than the loveliness of youth, health, and
innocent happiness. For several weeks after her
arrival, she was never seen to smile; and
throughout
the winter, she would evidently have
preferred
the deepest solitude; even the care she had
bestowed on George had seemed often more an
effort of duty than the impulse of inclination.
But now she was changed. Spring had come, the
scenery was delightful, the children were eager to
go abroad, and Mr. Watson was familiar with the
pleasant walks, and moreover, was always at
leisure
,
as it seemed to Mary, and ready, and happy
to accompany her and the children; and never
were the banks and braes around
Brattleborough
more thoroughly examined than during that
season. Who could be moping or miserable while
thus conversing, as it were, with Nature in her
most lovely forms! It was no wonder, though
Mrs. Redfield considered it so, that the rose
deepened
on Mary's cheek, and her eyes were filled
with the humid light of joy, and her whole
countenance
seemed radiant with happiness. She was
living in a new world.
How beautiful are the works of nature! said
Mary, as she sat on a green bank, arranging the
wild flowers which the children had gathered.
How lovely! how perfect! All the skill of man
could not avail to tint this little flowerand then
to think these plants spring from dry seeds, from
dead roots. Oh! it fills my heart with love and
gratitude to the good Creator, to look on these
lovely flowers!
Yes, God is good, replied Mr. Watson, his
mild eyes lighting up with a glow of rapture, as
he glanced alternately at Mary and her flowers
(herself the fairest flower). God is good, and
how great are the blessings he bestows on us, in
not only giving us this lovely work of his creation
in which to study his goodness and mercy, but this
dearer, this more precious gift of his Holy Word!
and he drew from his bosom a small and
beautifully
bound edition of the Scriptures, which he
had intended as a gift for Mary. He had carried
it several days, watching for a favourable moment
to present it, fearing it would be rejected, both as
being prohibited to her by her faith, and as offered
by himself. A deep glow overspread his face as
he put the sacred volume into her hand. She held
it a few moments, mechanically, as it werethen
turning it to examine the binding, it opened at the
first page, and she saw her own name written, and
underneath it, The gift of a true friendA. W.
She was evidently touched, and Mr. Watson
thought, as she bent her head over the page, that
he saw a tear fallbut in a moment she overcame
her emotion, and looking up with a half smile,
said
I have not so many friends as to be indifferent
to the mementos offered by any oneespecially
by you, Mr. Watson. Yet you must excuse me
I cannot take thisand she held the book
towards
him.
Mary, it is not on my own account that I
beseech
your acceptance of this giftit is for its own
precious truths, which your heart is so formed to
appreciate and love. Keep it, Mary. O! do not
distress me by rejecting it. The same God who
decks the lily of the field for our instruction, has
given us this holy book, that we may learn our
own nature and destiny, and His character, and the
duties we owe to Him.
But God has appointed us teachers, said
Mary, timidlyand should we not be encroaching
on their province, if we presumed to read this
blessed book, and judge it by our own weak and
dark minds?
Not if the words of our Saviour be true, Mary.
He commands all his followers to `Search the
Scriptures;' see John v. (and he turned to the
chapter and pointed to the verse). And then here,
in this fourteenth chapter, he says, `If ye love me,
keep my commandments.' Then how can it be
wrong for any one who loves and honours the
Saviour
,
to read his words?
Butbut we may not understand his words
rightly, said Mary, in a low, troubled voice.
Then we will pray to the Saviour to enlighten
us, my dear friend; and surely He who died that
we might live, who has promised that whatsoever
we ask in faith shall be granted, will enlighten us.
Mary, I will pray that the Saviour may bless your
studies of His wordand if there be a sin, let it
rest on my head.
O, no! no! said Mary, quickly. If it is sin,
the Saviour will surely forgive itand I have so
longed to read the BibleShe paused, and
blushedand after a few more entreaties from
Watson, consented to keep the volume.
How rejoiced was this young Christian hero at
the victory he had obtained! He might truly be
called a hero, for he had conquered the selfishness
of his nature, and thought of his talents and
acquirements
as being valuable only while employed
in doing good to others. A fine-looking,
frank-hearted
young man he was, just entering the world,
with ardent dreams of making the world better
and noble blood never elevates the mind like
benevolent
feelings.
Such is my herothen for the heroine, there is
the fair, gentle Mary, as artless as a child, and as
pure minded as a seraph, with the romantic
advantage
of being surrounded by a mystery. And these
young people are daily together, in scenes as
beautiful
as ever the pen of St. Pierre portrayed. And
who would not weave for them the destiny to
live and love. Yet over such a vale of sunny
felicity there must arise the cloud of
disappointment
;
for the summer soon passes, and Mary is
expecting a letter that may summon her far away.
It was not till this time that the student
comprehended
the full danger he had incurred in yielding
to Mrs. Redfield's wishes, and becoming an
inmate
in her family. He found himself too deeply
interested in the fate of Mary for his own peace.
He felt that she had been happier for their
intercourse
;
that he had enlightened her judgment and
improved her taste, and, he hoped, awakened her
conscience to the perception of the important truths
of the Christian doctrines; at least, he felt assured
that she loved the pure precepts of the Gospel,
which they had so often read together; and that her
spirit had emerged from the moral darkness in
which the superstitions and the mummeries of the
Catholic faith had enveloped it. He believed, too,
that she felt a sincere gratitude for his attentions;
nor did he doubt that she would regret to part with
him. But he had never talked of love to herhe
had not ventured to give, in any manner,
expression
to his own feelingsand he did not dare to
hope she loved him. From all that he had
observed
,
he concluded her family was rich; he was
poorhe had appeared to her in the character of
an instructor, and he thought it probable she
considered
him in the same light she would her father
confessor.
After such thoughts had once been admitted, it
was impossible for Watson to shake them off; but
the more he reflected, the more hopeless appeared
his love, and he determined to obtain the mastery
over his own feelings, that he might not betray
them when obliged to part with Mary. For this
purpose he concluded to take a journey, and fixed
on the White Hills as the object of his tour. He
was an enthusiastic admirer of mountain scenery,
and he hoped the grandeur of the mighty hills
would lift his heart and thoughts to a nearer and
more sublime communion with Him who had
ordained
all things in wisdom. He did not
communicate
his intended journey, for he felt as though
Mrs. Redfield hardly deserved his confidence, she
had been so much the cause of his present
wretchedness
and
to tell Mary he must leave her was
impossible.
The evening before his intended departure, the
family were all gathered in the parlour, admiring
the brightness of the full harvest moon; and
seldom
does it reveal a richer landscape of ripening
corn and delicious fruits, than it now shone on
around them, when a letter was handed to Mr.
Redfield; it contained one for Maryand she
must be prepared to leave Brattleborough in three
weeks. Had the announcement been her
banishment
to Siberia, she could hardly have appeared
more terrified and distressed. She looked at
Watson
;
then turned hastily to Mrs. Redfield, and
endeavoured
to say something of regret at being so
hastily called awaybut she could not end the
sentence, and bursting into tears, she rose to leave
the room. The student rose, too, and as he opened
the door for her to pass, he almost unconsciously
ejaculated, Dear Mary! She raised her tearful
eyes to his!and that was all the scene.
Who but true lovers could have interpreted the
meaning of that word and glance? It was only to
the heart they spake; but Mr. Watson never
thought again of his journey to the White Hills.
In due time the stranger came again. His
appearance
was wholly different from his former one.
He now travelled in an elegant carriage, attended
by two black servants, and his dress and
deportment
left Mrs. Redfield no longer in doubt as to
his honesty or gentility.
What a ready passport wealth gives its
possessor
to the good opinions of this world! And
what a mercy that it is not as essential for the
world that is to come! These reflections were
made by the poor student, as he lay on his
sleepless
bed, the night after the arrival of the stranger.
Watson had not seen him; he had passed the
evening
in his daughter's apartment, and in a private
conference with Mr. Redfield and his wife.
The next morning Watson entered the
breakfast-room
with a beating heart, hoping, yet almost
fearing
,
to meet Mary. She was not there, but the
stranger was; he still preserved his incognito, and
so no introduction could take place; but he bowed
to Watson as he took his seat opposite. Few
words were spoken during the meal; Mrs. Redfield
never once attempting to draw a compliment from
the stranger, by apologizing for the poor
breakfast
;
H
while the only puzzle was how to choose
among the variety of good things she had served
upshe was evidently in awe of her guest. As
they rose from the table, the stranger requested
that Mr. Watson would accompany him in a walk
to the Connecticut, which river he professed to
admire
extremely. Watson complied, but not with
very pleasant feelings, as he thought the stranger
had regarded him with a cold and yet scrutinizing
survey, during the whole time they had been
together
.
But he went. In about two hours Mrs.
Redfield saw them returning, and such a change in
Watson's countenance!He looked, she said,
as if he had been made a governor! She was a
true republican, and would never use a kingly
comparison
.
Well, my good friends, said the stranger, as
he seated himself in the parlour, I am happy to
say that it is now in my power to deal frankly with
you, and I suppose you would like to know the
reasons for what you must have thought my very
singular proceedings.
Yes, indeed we should! hastily replied Mrs.
Redfield, before her husband could speakand
we should like to know your name, too.
And the place where you live, said Mr.
Redfield
.
And whether these children are yours? said
his wife.
The stranger smiled. You shall know all, if
you will permit me to tell my story.
This was the moment Mrs. Redfield had often
anticipated, with the yearning of unappeased
curiosity
.
She had never been able to penetrate the
mystery which surrounded her charge; and it is
not strange that, in the contracted circle of her
thoughts and wishes, she considered the
development
about to take place, as important as any event
which had occurred in the annals of the human
race, since the Declaration of American
Independence
.
How limited is the world in which an
individual
moves! and what a magnifying power
self
possesses! A solar microscope, that can make a
beetle's wing appear as large as the mainsail of a
ship, is poor and small, compared with the
importance
objects assume by coming home to one's own
business and bosom. If you wish to make a
man your friend, praise what belongs to him, or
only speak of yourself as it were for his
gratification
,
as the stranger told his story.
I will begin, continued he, with my name;
which is Marshall.
What is your given name, if I may be so
bold? inquired Mrs. Redfield.
George, madam.
Ah! then the boy is yours.
Certainlythey are both my children.
The impatience of Mrs. Redfield's curiosity was
now gratified, and she listened with decent
composure
while Mr. Marshall continued
These children are both mine; but they had
different mothers. The mother of Mary died when
the infant was but three days old, conjuring me,
with her last breath, to place the babe under the
care of a particular female friend of her own. I
was not myself acquainted with the lady to whom
my daughter was to be consigned, but believing
my wife was the best judge of the manner in which
the child should be reared, and anxious to gratify
the last wishes of my beloved Mary, I promised.
The arrangement was a wrong one, and I have
since bitterly regretted that I did not beseech my
dying wife not to deprive me of the dear pledge of
our love. I would have taken every careI would
have devoted myself to her educationand then
but no matterlet me tell what did occur, not
what might have been accomplished.
O, never mind how long the story is, we shall
be so happy to hear it all, cried Mrs. Redfield.
But we should want another day, which I
cannot
now well spare, returned the gentleman.
So allow me to abridge what is not material. I
placed my daughter with the lady my wife
recommended
that
lady was a bigotted Catholic, and
completely did she succeed in instilling her tenets
into the heart and soul of my child. In the
meantime
,
to divert that painful sense of deep loneliness
which weighed down my spirits, I went to Europe,
and travelled on the continent for several years.
Soon after my return I married again, and with
shame and sorrow I confess that, till my second
wife was taken from me, I never paid much
attention
to the manner in which my daughter had been
educated.
That is the way with you men, said Mrs.
Redfield, with a little severity in her countenance,
which did not at all improve the expression;
now, a mother never forgets her children.
True; your affections are more disinterested
than ours, said Mr. Marshall; but you will not
censure me harshly when you learn how my
thoughtlessness was punished. The lady who had
the care of my daughter belonged to a very
respectable
family; she was herself highly educated,
and I felt satisfied that all womanly duties and
lady-like accomplishments would be taught my
little Mary. Nor, though I knew them to be
Catholics, had I felt any fears for her moral
training
;
the lady always appeared so amiable, and in
deeds of charity and good works she excelled; and
H 2
I then thought that a creed was of very little
consequence
.
On the decease of my second wife, I
resolved to take Mary home. I had suffered too
severely in the loss of beloved ones, to wish for
another of those ties which, in my case, seemed
only formed to be broken. Mary was fifteen, and
I took her home to be mistress of my house.
Was the lady who brought her up willing to
part with her? inquired Mrs. Redfield.
She was not, madam, entirely willing; yet she
seemed to pity my sorrows; and, on the whole, to
think the plan I had formed a judicious one; and
she persuaded Mary to accompany me home. I
now believe it was done, by the advice of a
Catholic
priest, to undermine my faith. They probably
calculated that the pious example of my child
would influence me; and the priest would have
easy access to my house, and might exercise his
ghostly care over the education of my infant son.
O, these Jesuits! did they employ half the zeal to
gain heaven that they do to gain proselytes, what
saints they would be! I soon found my daughter
was a Catholica devoteefor she was by nature
all artlessness; and though she had lessons enough
in the science of religious
convenance
, and had
been taught that all means by which the true faith
(the Catholic) could be advanced, were justifiable,
yet her pure heart could not be contaminated by
that worst leaven of wickedness which corrupts
human naturehypocrisy. I learned from her
own lips and her manner, enough to alarm, almost
overwhelm me. Would you believe it possible
my own child had been taught to regard me with
horror, as a heretic? and she thought, that to love
me was a sin which required absolution; and even
trembled and wept with horror and grief,
whenever
any parental tenderness, on my part, had
called
forth a return of affectionate confidence on her's.
Believe me, my friends, there is nothing which so
checks and chills the purest, warmest, holiest
emotions
of our nature, as religious bigotry and
fanaticism
;
it binds the soul in chains, which rust and
canker, till a moral paralysis ensues, and all the
natural and innocent feelings of the heart are
turned
to vile and cruel purposes. If I am severe
against bigotry and fanaticism, remember, I speak
from experience, from suffering.
Oh! you need make no apologies here; we
know all you say is truth, solemnly responded
Mr. Redfield.
And yet we ought to be very forbearing
towards
those who are educated in this faith, said
Mr. Marshall. At least we should not blame
the Catholic laity. The people are held in
delusions
the
priests are the deceivers; towards them,
I own, I can feel little charity. Had my daughter,
when she first came to me, been wholly separated
from the influence of these priests, I think she
would soon have been won to love and trust me
as her father and friend; and then her mode of
worship might not have been attended with any
dangerous consequences; but, notwithstanding all
my vigilance, I could not prevent her confessor
from seeing and advising her; and he used his
power over her to frighten and intimidate, till she
resolved to enter a convent, and even endeavoured
to escape clandestinely from home for that
purpose
.
I did every thing in my power to divert
her from this purpose. I persuaded, reasoned,
entreated
all
was vain. I could not convince her
the sacrifice was not her duty. At last I adopted
a new expedient. I told her if she would take
care of her little brother one year, in the manner I
should direct, (as I had business in France, and
must be absent all that time,) she should then be
at liberty to enter a convent, if she still continued
to wish it. After consulting with her spiritual
guide, she consented to do what I had proposed.
The priest no doubt calculated on being able to
keep up his communication with herbut I had
determined it should be otherwise.
Pray, how came you to think of bringing her
here? asked Mrs. Redfield.
I must answer that question in your own way:
by asking another. Do you recollect a Mr.
Burroughs, who was nearly killed by the
overturning
of the stage in this village, about eighteen
months since?
Do we remember it? said Mr. RedfieldI
guess we do, sir. Why, Mr. Burroughs was
brought into this very room, and never went out
of the house
For three months and three days, eagerly
chimed in Mrs. Redfield.
I know all the circumstances, said Mr.
Marshall
.
This Burroughs was my most intimate
friend, and he did justice to your kindness and
hospitality; and the kindness, too, of Mr.
Watson
.
I could do but little to alleviate his
sufferings
,
observed Watson, while his cheek
crimsoned
with evident delight at the praise of Mr.
Marshall
.
Oh, but you did a great deal, said Mrs.
Redfield
,
nodding, and smiling significantly. She had
already penetrated the secret, and felt she could
not do a more politic thing than bear testimony in
favour of Watson; and, for once, inclination and
interest, truth and tact, alike prompted the eulogy
to living merit; and praise, that apparently simple,
and yet most difficult and delicate affair on earth
to manage discreetly, not excepting advice, was
breathed from the heart, as well as bestowed by
the judgment of the good lady, who continued,
with an increasing elevation of voice, as she
observed
the satisfaction of Mr. MarshallYes,
Mr. Watson did every thing for the poor wounded
gentleman, staying night and day by his bed-side;
and I often thought it was more owing to Mr.
Watson's care than the doctor's skill, that he
recovered
at last.
Mr. Burroughs is fully aware of these
obligations
,
madam; and to convince you how highly he
appreciates the kindness he received, and the
goodness of heart and mind that prompted such
ready and judicious benevolence, I need only
say, that it was entirely from his report I was
induced to place my children here. I could tell a
long storybut it is of no consequence to unveil
all my motives. Suffice it to say, that I wished
Mary to reside where there was not one breath of
popery, and also to be in an entirely new scene,
where she would have to reason for herself, and
where she might see the world under a different
aspect from what it had been presented to her
mind. She was bound by a solemn promise not
to write to the priest, or her friends, or to
communicate
in any manner to any person, aught
respecting
herself or family. You were likewise bound
not to ask any questions.
I do not wonder you made her promise not to
write to the priest; but why was there any need of
being so secret with us? You did not think we
would encourage her in the Catholic faith? said
Mr. Redfield.
Quite the reverse, sir, said Mr. Marshall,
smiling. I feared you would be too zealous a
reformer. You would probably have thought it
your duty to argue with Mary on the subject of
religion, and I did not think it best to have her
young, sensitive mind, filled with the bitterness of
controversial theology. Her creed was that of
feeling
;
she had been educated a Catholic; and it
requires
something more powerful than arguments
or advice to overcome the prepossessions of our
childhood. I knew, in short, that her feelings
must, by some means, become interested for
Protestants
;
that she must become attached to
individuals
of this religion, and see that they were true
worshippers of her God and Saviour, before she
would ever allow it possible that they might be
Christians. I made it for your interest to treat
her kindly; and I trusted, from the representations
of Mr. Burroughs, (and, indeed, I know it to be
the character of New Englanders,) that when no
pecuniary temptation operated to check your good
feelings, or warp your principles from the straight
line of duty, that there would be no lack of those
tender, domestic attentions, which my children so
particularly needed.
But why did you appear so mysterious, if I
may be so bold? inquired Mrs. Redfield.
Because I could more forcibly appeal to your
consciences. Pardon me, madam, when I say I
would rather trust to your sense of religious duty,
or to your charity, than to yourhonesty in
fulfilling a bargain. Our maxims of trade are
dangerous
clogs on morality. I once heard it gravely
asserted, by a professor of your faith, that men
should have a business conscience and a religious
conscience; and I know that good men are very
prone to do and say that,
in the way of trade
,
which, were they not accustomed to think all is
fair which is not discovered to be a cheat, they
would revolt from as a heinous sin. Instead of
doing as they would be done by, Christians, even
high-toned Christians, adhere to the maxim, that,
in the
way of trade
, every man must take care of
himself. So you see, he continued, with a smile,
that in the way of trade, or by bargain only, I
should not have felt easy to have intrusted my
children so entirely in your power; but, connected
with the solemn associations of a promise which
appealed to your conscience, as well as a mystery
to your imagination, I felt satisfied you would be
faithful. I had no pretext for endeavouring to
interest your benevolence, or I doubt not I should
have found you as kind-hearted and generous as
my friend Burroughs described.
The last compliment effectually soothed the
mortification which the worthy couple could not
help feeling, while they listened to the
observations
on trade. Mr. Redfield, long afterwards,
confessed to Mr. Watson, that he never
attempted
to make a good bargain without thinking of
Mr. Marshall's remarks; and the thought does
me good, too, said he, for it makes me more
solicitous to do right, to do as I would be done
by, lest I should bring a reproach on my
religion
.
I have seen much of the world, continued Mr.
Marshall, and I am convinced that, to make men
wiser, happier and better, we must cultivate the
benevolent and social affections. This can only
be done by kindness and persuasion. You might
as easily melt wax by the contact of ice, as
harmonize
the heart by severity. It has, hitherto,
been the grand object of civilization to awaken the
sagacity of men to their pecuniary interests, and
their physical comforts; and they have, in
consequence
,
grown selfish and sinful, generally in
proportion
to their boasted refinement of character.
Knowledge has been power, and has been used for
oppression as much as physical force; and the
Catholic
I
priesthood is not the only combination
professing
godliness, which has used its influence to
disseminate error, and gained its ends by fostering
the evil passions of the multitude.
You speak of Catholics, said Mrs. Redfield.
Have you no fears that the priest will again
obtain
an influence over your daughter's mind, and
persuade her to enter a convent?
Mrs. Redfield laughed outright, as she turned
her eyes on Watson, who coloured like a girl of
fifteen, though he did not look very miserable
under her suspicious glance. Mr. Redfield, for
the first time, was a little enlightened, and the
reply
of Mr. Marshall did not utterly astound him,
as his wife expected it would do. Indeed, the
farmer always maintained, that the idea had come
into his head a good many times, only he had not
thought it prudent to mention the thing. It is
very seldom that a Yankee will own he was
wholly unprepared for any occurrence.
My daugther, said the stranger, smiling,
will, I hope, be, for the future, under clerical
influence
,
but not Catholic. My friend, Mr. Watson,
has asked and obtained my consent to watch over
her faith in the spirit of love, which is the only
human means that can really and permanently
change the heart and the opinions.
The congratulations that followed this
announcement
may be easier imagined than repeated. Mrs.
Redfield was clamorous in her approbation of the
plan. She thought the only way to prevent all
fears for the faith of Mary, was to have the
wedding
take place before she left Brattleborough.
Let her only be married, said the good wife,
and she will hate the name of a convent. I am
sure I do. It may be a fit place for ugly, cross old
maids; but to make a beautiful young lady go into
one, and take a vow to stay there all her days, is
an awful sin.
Mr. Redfield agreed to all this; but still he could
not help expressing a wish that he had known the
exact state of Mary's mind when she first came to
his house; as he really believed he would have
convinced her, from the Bible, that the Catholic
religion was very wrong, as well as dangerous and
wicked.
I do not doubt your ability to argue these
points, my good friend, said Mr. Marshall; and
I know that arguments may silence, perhaps
sometimes
convince; but it is only
love
which can lead
us in the way we should go, especially when we
are young. Mary's heart was in favour of the
Catholics
;
it was her affections, not her reason and
judgment, that were perverted. We Protestants
have gained the victory, because we have gained
her love. She is convinced of your goodness, for
she has experienced your kindness and Christian
care; and all the proofs you could have brought
from Holy Writ in favour of your tenets, would
have weighed as nothing in her mind, compared
with the proofs of your pious benevolence, which
she has felt was daily watching over and doing
good to her and her little brother. She now feels
that there are Christians out of the Catholic
communion
.
This was what I hoped when placing her
here. I was certain that she would not mingle in
the gaieties of the world; and had I boarded her in
a gay family, where amusements were the chief
pursuit, her melancholy would have been increased
by the contrast, and she would, probably, have
made her seclusion as perfect as though she had
been in a convent. But in this quiet place, and
with such sober people, Mary naturally thought
she had no temptations to guard against. It could
not be wrong to contemplate and admire the
beautiful
works of her Creator; and thus she was drawn
abroad, and has imbibed a taste and love for
natural
scenery, and that feeling of healthy, innocent
enjoyment, while gratifying her curiosity, which
the monastic ritual would find it difficult to
overcome
.
The best weapon to combat superstition is,
in my opinion, to awaken the religion of the heart
(not the spirit of controversy), and this may most
effectually be done by leading the mind to
contemplate
the goodness of God, while experiencing
kindness
from man. The soul seems then prepared to
adore God and love its neighbour; and the serene
happiness which such hallowed emotions sheds
around us, cannot be forgotten. Never yet was a
human heart won to worship, acceptably, the true
God through fear. I do not say the threatenings
of the law are not necessary, and sometimes
effectual
,
to deter from crime, and keep the bad from
open villanies; but it is only the Gospel of the
Saviour
,
breathing `peace on earth, and good will to
the children of men,' that can make Christians.
I do not know whether Mr. Redfield ever
exactly
coincided with these sentiments of his guest;
but the compliments paid to the conduct of himself
and spouse, effectually reconciled him to the
practice
of charity in this case. He acknowledged the
scheme had been good, because it had succeeded.
How few have any other criterion of merit when
judging the conduct, opinions or plans of others,
than their success!
Mrs. Redfield was perfectly satisfied after she
found Mr. Marshall intended the wedding should
be solemnized at her house. Such a glorious
bustle
I 2
as she enjoyed had never before fallen to her
mortal lot; for, though the wedding was private,
she had the satisfaction of telling the strange story,
as original news, to every body in the village.
And moreover, she received several valuable
presents
from Mr. Marshall and Mary; and she
became
,
from that time forth, quite a lady in her
dress and deportmentthat is, she displayed taste
as well as neatness in her apparel; and her
manners
were gentle (for she tried in all things to
imitate Mary), her voice soft and low, and the
spirit
of kindness and contentment seemed to have
made its home in her heart, and keep its sweet
smile always ready for her lip. And her influence
(for she became a very fashionable woman, having
been so connected with a mystery and a love match),
has doubtless had an effect on the ladies of
Brattleborough
,
as every person who visits there will find
that they all partake of the spirit and display the
characteristics I have described as distinguishing
Mrs. Redfield.
Mary, the sweet nun, returned to the south, the
happy wife of the Rev. Alexander Watson. The
Catholic priest excommunicated her from his
heaven
;
but she had learned to go to God as her
Father
,
and ask forgiveness of her sins for the sake of
Christ, her Saviour; and her dependence on priests
and penances was over. The Bible was to her
truly the Book of books; perhaps she prized it
more from having been so many years deprived of
the privilege of reading it. And she never forgot
that it was first presented to her by her beloved
husband.
THE SILVER MINE.
Coming events cast their shadows before.
Now
I always had a penchant for fairy lore,
and well do I remember the pleasure with which I
used to listen to the story of Cinderella and her
little glass slipperwhat a friend her good fairy
proved! And there was Gracioso, toohow could
her tasks have ever been performed but through the
aid of the kind fairy? Thus I thought, when a child;
and even now it seems quite a poetic grievance
that not a single fairy ring has been discovered, or
any tradition preserved, that the gay elves ever
set foot in our land. When Robin Goodfellow
exclaimed
I'll put a girdle round about the earth
In forty minutes,
he did not probably include America, any more
than do the British reviewers, when they boast of
the wondrous achievements of the human mind,
and the progress of intellect. Indeed, we are as
poor in traditionary superstitions as in titles of
nobility; we are as rational as republican; and
Captain Hall would doubtless have proved, had he
argued the matter with his usual sagacity, that
this skepticism to the marvellous was caused by
the lack of imagination, and consequently that
Americans never had, would or could excel in
works of genius. Certain it is that our literature,
if we ever have a national literature, must differ in
character from that of the old world. But let that
pass for the present. I am intending to tell a
marvellous story, but one I heard for truth (bating
a few trifling circumstances I have introduced by
way of embellishment), and from those who
reverenced
truth. I am aware of the risk I run, and
that I may be called superstitious;no matterso
I give the impression I wish, the effect will be
beneficial to my readers.
Among the first settlers of the town of
Newport
(N. H.), was deacon Bascom. I intend for
the future to give truly the names of places, and of
persons, as far as I can, without offending the
living. Why should our writers, while relating a
story, be so careful to conceal the whereabouts?
and always say the town of ? Why not speak
out? We want the locality of all interesting
adventures
,
whether real or fictitious, fixed. We
should read stories of our own times and people
with more interest, and look on the scenes
described
with the familiarity of remembered places.
Well, deacon Bascom lived in Newport, (a very
pretty village you will find there nowthen it
was a wilderness,) and a good honest man he was,
as Connecticut ever sent forth, to build up the wild
places of our country. I should like to sketch his
characterand yet it is not necessary. The
incident
will show the man; that is, it would, if I
could tell, in his own words and manner, as
described
to me, how he was beset by the temptation
to become
rich
. To be sure, New Englanders are
generally beset by a like temptation; but the
deacon's
was in quite an original way.
Deacon Bascom, like all his countrymen fifty
years ago, held the true paradisaical doctrine, that
it was not good for man to be alone. A wife
was then considered indispensable to the
prosperity
as well as happiness of every one who wrote
himself man; and children were blessingsreal
treasures. Alack! what a change half a century
has produced. Now our gentlemen are wholly
engrossed with caring for their own dear selves;
marriage is slavery, and a family a bill of cost.
Our fine young men, who should be the glory and
strength of New England, go to find their graves
in the marshes of the south, or the prairies of the
west; and our fair girls gointo the cotton
factories
!
Well-a-day, it is better to spin than to sigh:
factories are more useful than convents;the girl
who lives in the bustle and buzz of forty thousand
spindles, will not be very likely to pine in thought,
or grow sentimental; and she cannot scold. It is
an excellent place for those who never intend to
marry, and whose system of enjoyment centres in
procuring meat, fire and clothes. But for
opportunities
of improving the mind, or gaining
household knowledge, a young girl might as well
be placed before the mast, or behind the drum:
and a man might as reasonably expect a
spinning-jenny
to make a good wife, as a Jenny brought up
in a factory.
Now deacon Bascom had a good wife, and, for
those days, an intelligent one; and it was thinking
over her many estimable womanly qualities, and
the training requisite to make women what they
ought to be, what they are capable of becoming,
that brought the factory Spectre, blasting this fair
world with the love of gold, before my eyes. My
speculations on this subject have no reference to
questions on political economy, or no farther than
connected with the moral and mental
improvement
and happiness of my own dear land. Some
time I may write them, but not now; my story is
to be told.
Suppose yourself, my friend, in a room of
tolerable
size, but in height hardly exceeding eight feet;
the ceiling is pine boards, and the bare beams are
seen above, seemingly ready to enforce on any
high-headed wight the practical application of that
pithy sentenceStoop as you go through the
world, and you will miss many hard thumps;
a stone fire-place, rudely constructed, must occupy
almost one whole side of the square apartment,
and you may place any quantity of wood you
please (that does not exceed your powers of
computation
in square feet) therein, and set it blazing!
By the bright light you may easily examine my
hero. There he sits, deacon Bascom, a reverend
looking man, though not with years; he has not
probably numbered more than forty-five, but men
were then deacons in gravity at forty-fivenow
they are dandies in taste.
There he sits in his arm-chair, a huge
high-backed
chair; he sits a little inclined forward, his
hands joined together, and resting on his knee, and
his gaze fixed intently and thoughtfully on the
blazing hearth; and there is something in his
countenance
which reveals that unwonted and strange
fancies are passing in his mind His good wife is
plying her knitting-needles briskly, but her eyes
are anxiously rivetted on the face of her husband,
as if she would not only read his thoughts, but
transfuse their spirit into her own heart. She
knows he is thinking of his dream. It was a
singular
dream, far beyond her powers of
interpretation
,
and so she had simply given it as her opinion
that it meant nothing at all. But from the deacon's
mind the impression was not easily dismissed.
He had, a few nights before, dreamed that a man
clothed in black appeared to him, and asked him if
he wished to be rich. The deacon, as most deacons
it is to be feared would, even in these enlightened
days, answered in the affirmative. The man in
black then told him, that if he, the deacon, would
go alone to a particular place, describing the same,
on Sunapee mountain, and raise a stone which he
would find beneath a blasted tree, he would then
and there discover a silver mine, that would enrich
him and his children. What made the dream more
remarkable, it was repeated three times; and
deacon
Bascom, though a man of strong powers of
mind, had some faith in dreams. But this he could
not interpret any better than his wife. Yet he
lacked something of her contented philosophy, and
could scarcely believe it meant nothing at all. This
question he was now pondering, whether it were
better to commence the search for the mine, or
reject
the dream as a temptation from the great
adversary
of souls. He was a pious man, and had he
known it was a temptation to love the world
unduly
,
K
his faith would have triumphed. But he did
not know thisit might be, that the means of
doing
good were to be entrusted to him, and he ought
not to reject the stewardship. However, the
tremendous
March storm, which was then raging
without, and the reflection that it was almost
impracticable
to penetrate to the mountain, and
certainly
impossible for him to go alone at that season,
on such an adventure, with any prospect of success,
and as he did not quite believe the miraculous,
though the marvellous had made an impression on
his mind, he finally came to the conclusion, the
only part of his cogitation, by the way, he
communicated
to his better half (how seldom do men,
even the best and most indulgent of husbands,
appreciate
the deep sympathy and
soul-companionship
of which women are capable!) that he should
delay exploring for the mine till he was more
confirmed
on the course of his duty respecting it. And
so they retired to rest in peace.
Six months passed away, and the dream, if
remembered
by either of the good people, had never
been mentionedwhen the very same vision again
appeared to the deacon. He saw the man in black,
who appeared importunately to urge that the mine
should be sought. Deacon Bascom could no longer
excuse himself on account of the bad weather; and,
finally, persuaded that it was only with the hope of
doing good by means of the treasure, if he found
it, that he was actuated, he took his gun and axe,
and a luncheon of bread and cheese, and followed
by the prayers of his wife, set out to find the silver
mine.
Sunapee mountain is about four miles from
Newport
.
You must never measure distance merely
by miles. Think of travelling four miles on a
M`Adamized turnpike'tis only a pleasant jaunt;
but imagine you are to force your toiling march
four miles through a thick wilderness, and 'tis a
prodigious journey! Deacon Bascom had explored
the route once before, in pursuit of a bear; and
besides
,
being a tolerable surveyor, and having that
keen perception and recollection of local
appearances
,
which seems acquired almost as by instinct,
when such knowledge is necessary, he had no fears
of being lost in the woods. Sunapee mountain;
you, good reader, probably know nothing about it,
and care less. Well, I presume you are acquainted
with the names and legends of the mountains of
Scotland and Wales; and you are familiar, too,
with the Appenines and Pyreneesand what a
hum-drum amusement it is to come home here, to
our own wild mountains and unpoetic world, for
the scenes of story or song! If the rail-road
projected
from Boston to Ogdensburg, by the way of
Concord, N. H., and Windsor, Vt., is ever
completed
,
it will pass close along by the base of
Sunapee
mountain; the lofty, wooded hill, heaving
up its proud head, on one hand, like a giant, to
guard the fair lake that stretches away in the
distance
on the other.
All the fashionable world will then make the
tour of the rail-road; and then the mountain will be
known and talked of as a grand and picturesque
view, as affording rich themes for the romantic, if
not rich silver mines.
The morning deacon Bascom started on his
mine-exploring
tour was a beautiful one, the sun shining
with the brilliancy of a summer noon; and the soft
shadowy vapour that, during our fine autumn days,
floats like a white transparent veil over all the
horizon
,
seemed only, by excluding the heat and
glare, to increase the light and beauty of the scene.
What the deacon thought of the fine day, is
immaterial
to my story. Those who are in the hot
pursuit
of wealth, seldom pause to worship the God of
Nature; and rarely do the places where gold and
silver abound, have any attractions for the lovers of
the romantic and sequestered. The person who
gives up his soul to the love of money, must never
expect to see the beauties in the world of nature.
He has palsied the chord that responded to the
harmonies of his Creator's works. The miser
would calculate the worth of all he sees in money.
Let it be remembered, God receives no tribute but
from the heart; and to those who refuse him that,
He never unlocks his treasures. But don't think
my hero is to prove a miser.
It is true he had not so many temptations to the
sin of avarice as beset men now-a-days. Display
was not then considered necessary to respectability;
and he had not an extravagant wife. Mrs. Bascom
how I wish I had a few pages to allow you for the
record of your domestic virtues!A woman she
was, it must be confessed after all, and had a deep
curiosity to know whether her husband's dream
was really true; but then it was mostly for the
credit of dreams, in general, she wished it might
prove true. Of the riches it promised, she had
very vague and unfashionable ideas. No fine dresses
and gay parties floated in perspective before her;
the winter clothing for her family she had prepared
with her own hands; her house she thought
comfortable
;
it was as good as her neighbour's houses,
and why should she be anxious to outshine them?
She looked round on her neat and nicely
arranged
furniture,there was not an article she
wished displaced, either for better or finer, because
her things were all so convenient, and all connected
with associations of the friends who had purchased,
or presented, or praised them. She liked all she
had, and thought she had enoughand the
treasures
K 2
of Solomon could offer no more. But was
she perfectly satisfied? How I wish I could boldly
answer in the affirmative!
Man never is, but always to be blest.
Her beautiful delft punch-bowl had been cracked
on the last thanksgiving festival, and she thought,
if her husband found the silver mine, she would
have a new punch-bowl; and then her best
blocktin
tea-pot, just as bright as a silver one, and she
thought quite as handsome, had a small spot melted
on the nose (the carelessness of a
help
that proved
herself a harm)and Mrs. Bascom, who had that
refined economical taste which revolts from every
appearance of carelessness and waste, had been
mortified at the appearance of her tea-pot. So she
calculated on a new punch-bowl and tea-pot, as she
anxiously looked from hour to hour for the arrival
of her husband. At length, late in the afternoon,
he appeared, and his wife, as she met his smile and
welcomed him, and arranged the dinner she had
kept warm for him, and saw the children all
pressing
round him, for the kiss or kind word, felt
herself
a happy woman, even with a cracked
punch-bowl
,
and melted tea-pot, and a thought of the
silver
mine scarcely occurred; nor was the subject
named by her till after the children were all in
bed. Then, in his great arm-chair, the Bible on
the table before him, deacon Bascom informed his
wife thathe had relinquished all thoughts of the
silver mine!
I followed, said he solemnly, the directions
given me by the man in black, and I found the
rock he had described; and there stood the blasted
tree; and I have no doubt but there is a silver
mine. But I had been doubting, every step I took,
whether I was in the way of my duty. I
determined
to pray for light to guide me. I knelt down,
and saw, in my own mind, how vain was gold and
silver; and I felt that should my children be
corrupted
by the riches I there sought, how terrible
would be my guilt, and the accusations of my
conscience
!
I thought I had enoughI had health and
strength, and, with the blessing of God, I could
support you and our children. And I prayed, as
our Saviour directed`Lead us not into
temptation
;'
and left the stone, and am determined that
never mortal man shall from me learn where it is
to be found.
His wife agreed in all his opinions, and thought
he had acted a very wise part. I will, said she,
boil the punch-bowl in skim milk, and it will be
as strong and handsome as ever; (had she lived in
these temperance times she would have dispensed
with it entirely;) and for the tea-potwhy I don't
care a fig about the little melted spot.
The children of that good couple were excellent
men and women, and their descendants are worthy
and respectable people.
POLITICAL PARTIES.
Miss Thankful Pope
lived and died an old
maid, in consequence of a difference in political
sentiment
between herself and lover; and she always
declared (after she and her lover separated) that
party spirit was the bane of all social intercourse,
and would, sooner or later, prove the destruction
of our liberties. Why she should make the last
remark, I never exactly understood, as she
certainly
retained
her
liberty, in consequence of party
disputes. Her own account of the matter,
however
,
is the best explanation of her creed, and so I
shall give her history, just as she related it to her
two nieces, the two Misses Wilton.
These two young ladies were visiting at the
house of their grandfather, and one forenoon of a
summer day they accompanied aunt Thankful on
a ramble. After proceeding some way along the
high road, which was skirted on the left by a
wood, aunt Thankful suddenly struck into a
by-path
leading directly into the forest. She pursued
its apparently untrodden windings, followed by
her nieces, till they came to the banks of a
considerable
stream. The young ladies concluded their
walk in that direction was terminated, till their
aunt remarked there was a log across the river, at
a little distance, over which they might pass
and there is a spot on the other side I should
like to have you visit, said she.
So they proceeded up the stream, and soon
reached the rude bridge; Helen, the youngest girl,
began to tremble, and fear her head might swim;
but there being no cavalier at hand, to whom her
timidity might have been interesting, she finally
listened to her aunt's sensible assurances, that
there was no sort of danger if she would only
look straight before her, and not frighten herself
by her own screams. She followed this rational
advice (which, in a like emergency, I recommend
to all young ladies), and went over as safely as
though the bridge had been made of iron, with a
railing reaching to the moon. Aunt Thankful
proceeded
onward, for half a mile or more, the path
still winding amid trees and shrubs; yet the growth
of bushes and briars had evidently sprung up after
the land had once been, in the phrase of the
country
,
cleared
, till they came suddenly out on more
open space, where a family had once dwelt.
There were no buildings; but broken bricks, half
buried in the ground, scattered stones, and a cavity
in the earth, which had been a cellar, indicated the
spot where the house had stood. The garden, too,
might be traced, by the proximity of shrubs and
plants, never indigenous in the same locality; and
many flowers still blossomed there, in spite of the
rank weeds and tall grass, that seemed to grudge
them a place for display.
The north side of the ground, which the garden
had occupied, might be traced by a double row of
lofty elms, most of them still standing, and
forming
,
as they threw abroad their luxuriant branches,
in a variety of graceful curves and inclinations, an
avenue, grand and beautiful. At the termination
of this shaded walk, was an enormous tree of the
evergreen species, called, as aunt Thankful
affirmed
,
the balsam-tree; at a little distance, on one
side of this, had formerly been a summer-house, as
was apparent from the lilac and rose bushes, and
other flowering shrubs, clustered together; all
over-run
,
and nearly choked, by a luxuriant woodbine,
that had been trained over the building. Further
on, a fine clear spring bubbled up by the side of a
rock; the water had once been collected in a
reservoir
this
was now filled with rubbish, and the
stream ran off in a channel, concealed by tall
brakes and flags, till its course was lost in a thicket,
formerly a nursery of fruit trees, on the south.
Beneath the balsam-tree was a turf-seat, whether
natural or artificial, the ladies could not decide;
wood-sorrel, with its pretty, yellow blossoms,
mingled
with the moss that grew near the roots of the
tree, and little nameless flowers were peeping up
amid the thick green grass which spread around,
wearing that cool, moist look, which is so
charming
to the eye, during the hot, sultry hours of a
summer day.
The ladies sat down on the turf-seat, while
Helen
,
who had been, with her usual quickness,
taking
note of all, exclaimed hurriedly
Who did live here, aunt? What could they
mean by leaving such a sweet spot? They had no
taste, I am sure, thus to allow this pretty place to
become a ruin!
Oh, yes!and I thought there were no ruins
in our country, and that that was the reason why
our writers could not contrive a good novel. But
here, I am sure, is a ruin, said Catharine.
Nature will soon repair it, though, said aunt
Thankful. Nature is still the empress of our
land, and it will be many years yet,
notwithstanding
all our industry, before we shall sufficiently
conquer her domain, to have works of art, as in
Europe, more attractive of observation than the
wonders and luxuriance of nature.
What a dear, romantic spot this must have
been, observed Helen. See, yonder was the
L
orchard, on the side of that hill, to the south; and
how grand the forest appears, stretching away in
the distance, till it blends with the blue mists of
yonder mountains. Oh! we live in a lovely
land!
And in a
free
country, said Catharine,
proudly
.
I do love to think, and repeat, that I live in
a land of
freedom
.
We are not free, said aunt Thankful.
Not free!exclaimed both of the young
ladies.
Nonot free;had we been so, this pleasant
place would not have been abandoned, nor should
I. Aunt Thankful paused, and Helen, who was
steadfastly looking at her, saw she blushed. Now
Helen had a confused recollection that her mother
had told her something respecting a
disappointment
aunt Thankful had suffered in her youth, and
it occurred to the young lady that the affair might
somehow be connected with the scene before them.
She felt a
little
curiosity (quite natural for a young
girl) to know the particulars; and she contrived to
frame her questions so adroitly, that her aunt could
not well avoid relating the whole story; and to say
the truth, she was pleased with the opportunity of
telling ita sure sign that her heart no longer
endured pain from the retrospect, though her
reason
might regret the termination of the affair. It
was a long story, as she related it, occupying full
three hours; but thus the abridgement may be told:
I remember, she began, when this place,
then a wild wood, was sold by my father to a Mr.
Kendall, an Englishman by birth. He had resided
in Philadelphia several years, and there married
his wife; but, finally, ill health induced him to
remove
and establish himself at the north. He was
a man of more taste than calculation, as our people
thought, for he preserved many of the fine old
trees when his land was cleared, and he built
himself
a neat little cottage instead of a two story
house, and laid out a large garden, spending much
of his time in embellishing it with rare plants and
curious flowers, and was never once heard to boast
of his large corn or early potatoes. However, he
was quite popular, notwithstanding, for he was
industrious, and was reported to be worth a
handsome
fortune; and moreover, he was very
hospitable
,
and his wife made a pudding which was
unequalled
;
though our good wives all believed her
husband taught her the recipe.
Mr. Kendall had a daughter about my own age
(I was then a child), and a son several years older;
George was a very studious, steady boy, and his
discreet behaviour soon made him a favourite in
our sober society; and hearing his name so often
quoted as a pattern for our youths, it is no wonder
I learned to consider him a paragon of excellence.
I was intimate with his sister; and finally, George
and I became attached to each other. I was called
very handsome in those days. You need not smile,
Helen; I know that, usually, every antiquated
damsel claims to have been a belle in her youth,
and they generally claim, too, the honour of having
rejected several lovers; not an old maid breathes
but imagines she might have been married, had she
chosen it. Such pretensions sound very ridiculous,
when urged by the spinster of three-score; I shall
say no such thing; but I do say, and it is not
boasting, that, when of your age, I was as
handsome
as either of you.
Well, George and I were engaged, and happy
days we past. When he came home, at the college
vacations, he and his sister Mary and Ihow
often have we all sat here, beneath this very tree;
George playing on his flute, or reading, Mary and
I busied in making some article of clothing for
him, or netting him a purse, or cutting
watch-papers
.
Oh, that was a sunny time of life to me!
The voice of aunt Thankful trembled as she
dwelt on the recollections of her youthshe
paused and wiped her eyes. Helen was a gay
girl, and her aunt felt somewhat fearful of her
mirth; but she need not. There is a sacredness
in the exhibition of the deeper emotions of the
soul, which will check the levity of every person
of delicacy or feeling; and Helen, even before she
was aware, was wiping her own eyes in sympathy
with her aunt's grief. After a pause of a few
minutes, aunt Thankful resumed her story.
George closed his academic career with honour,
and immediately commenced the study of the law,
in which it was expected, by his friends, he would
become eminent, as he had many natural
qualifications
for a public speaker. I need not say how
happy his success made me, nor how proud I was
of his talents, till an incident occurred which
destroyed
all my complacency in his merits. Like
all our young men who are intending to figure in the
world, he soon turned his attention to politics. He
was educated a federalist; but whether he wished
to show he was entirely
free
in the selection of his
political creed, or whether he was a sincere
convert
to the cause he espoused, or that his course
was dictated by whim, I cannot saybut to the
honour of our whole community, we learned he
had been writing articles (and very spirited ones
they were, too) for a democratic newspaper. This
was during the winter of '98 and '99, when party
spirit raged so bitterly. Oh, I shall never forget
my astonishment when I found George was what
L 2
we termed a jacobin. Strange as it may seem to
youstrange as it now seems to meI did then
believe that if the democratic party succeeded in
electing their candidate, our liberty, laws and
religion, would all be sacrificed, and that we should
experience all the horrors here, which we read
were perpetrated in France. I had no reasons for
my opinion; it was adopted solely from education
and feeling; yet I made the sentiments of my
party the standard of rectitude; and had George
committed a murder, I should hardly have been
more shocked than when he declared himself a
republican. The first time I heard it from his
own lips, was at a large party, whither he had
come to seek me, when he found I was not at
home. I had not seen him for five months, yet
the first thought that entered my mind when he
addressed me was, that I would ridicule him for
his political heresies till I made him deny, before
the whole company, that he had written the
obnoxious articles, or else he should apologize,
and disclaim all intention of being serious in his
new opinions. But he would do neither; and finally
I was so mortified, (for I had often declared I knew
he never would acknowledge his principles before
me,) that I burst into tears and determined to go
home. He followed, and offered, in a very mild
tone, to attend me; this somewhat soothed me, and
I accepted his arm. During our walk, which was
a silent one, I concluded that if we talked the
matter
over at home, my father would join me, and
we should convince George he was wrong.
Accordingly
,
as soon as we were seated in our parlour,
I introduced the subject, by telling my father what
George had said. It is impossible to describe the
scene that ensued. My father was a native of the
`land of steady habits,' and he would have held
himself eternally disgraced, had he yielded one
word of his sound principles as fallible. George
was naturally calm in his manner, but he had a
bold spirit when it was aroused, and a persevering
temper; and he prided himself on being able to
chop logic with any one. I cannot tell which had
the best of the argument; I only know that the
longer they disputed, the firmer each grew in his
own opinion; and such I believe is usually the
case in political controversies. The reason is now
evident to me. They are never entered into with
any wish to gain knowledge, but only a triumph
for a party.
Well, my father at last grew terribly irritated,
and he rose up, and told George, while he held
such disorganizing sentiments, he never wished to
see him enter his doors again.
George looked at me. I sat unmoved as a
statue, and returned his appealing glance with a
glance of scorn. He bade us good night, and I
never saw him again.
What did become of him? Did he commit
suicide? I hope it was not here, exclaimed Helen,
looking eagerly round, as if she expected to see
his grave close at hand.
No, no, said aunt Thankful, pettishly, there
is no fear that a politician will die for love. Politics
have some good tendencies; the ambition of their
votaries, and the continual excitement in which
they live, prevents the excessive indulgence of any
single passion; or, in other words, the politician
who would succeed, must practice self-command.
The proud man is often obliged to humble
himself
;
the indolent is aroused to activity; the rash
man becomes circumspect; the narrow-minded
display generosity; in short, there is an influence
in a republican government, calculated to call forth
and strengthen the noblest powers of men, reason
and judgment; and it would always do this, were
it not counteracted by the prejudices of party spirit,
fostered by the selfish and designing. Strange, we
should think prejudice confined to
one
particular
party, when it is the vice of all. I am now
sensible
it was only my prejudices that condemned
George.
And I am sure it was quite natural that you
should think the young man wrong when he
differed
from your father and all your other friends,
said Catharine, and he ought not to have been
offended. Did he not explain and apologize
afterwards
?
I expected he would write me the next day,
but I determined to return his letter, unless it
contained
a recantation of his opinions; however, he
never troubled me with any application, and that
leads me to think he was honest in his principles,
and that he calculated time would show me he had
not been a traitor to his religion or his country.
He soon left the town, and shortly after I heard
he had gone to Savannah, and taken charge of a
paper devoted to his party. I believe I was not
a thorough politician, for I wept at the thought of
his danger from the sickly climate, when I ought
to have rejoiced at the prospect of his sickness or
death, if that would have been of any advantage to
our cause. You shudder, but it is certainly true
that party spirit, when indulged to enthusiasm,
withers every kindly emotion of the heart towards
those it counts as political enemies.
It was soon rumoured that Mr. Kendall was
inclining
towards the opinions of his son, and he and
his daughter were immediately treated with, what
we thought, merited contempt. I believe no one
went further in this unchristian conduct than
myself
.
The truth was, I was very unhappy; I had
lost my lover, and I endeavoured to persuade
myself
that all I suffered was owing to the horrid
principles of democracy, which were constantly
gaining ground.
Poor Mary! I used her cruelly, and never once
reflected that she was following the same course
with myself; that is, imbibing as her own, the
sentiments
of her nearest friends. Many do this, but
such should never claim any merit for the
correctness
of their opinions, nor indeed claim to hold
correct principles at all. How do they know the
path in which they have been guided is the best,
when they have never examined any other? You
are aware how that contested election terminated.
I was absolutely amazed, and expected the
judgments
of heaven would follow our nation, because
of the wickedness of its rulers. I had still so
much confidence in the integrity of George
Kendall
,
that I thought, when he discovered what a
party he had joined, he would recede. But I
learned he was appointed to some office, and I
treated Mary worse than ever. But at last she
escaped from my insolence. The house of Mr.
Kendall took fire one night, and was consumed,
with all its contents. He could not rebuild it
without accepting assistance from his neighbours,
which, as they had treated him like an enemy, he
would not do; and so he and Mary went on a visit
to George; and there they have since resided.
Did George never return here? asked Helen.
Never, said her aunt. Yet he cruelly
retained
this property. I say cruelly, because it led
me to believe he intended to return. Many
persons
wrote to him, offering to purchase it; but he
replied, that it was not to be sold. I therefore
concluded
that he was conscious he was in the wrong,
and only waited a favourable moment to come and
throw himself at my feet, and retract his political
errors. But months and years passed on, and the
next election found him still a republican. Indeed,
as those political excitements began to subside, I
saw that neither party could claim to be infallible,
and I felt more reconciled to the course George
had pursued, and if he had returned I should have
welcomed him. But I could not think of
beginning
the correspondence either with him or Mary,
and seeking a reconciliation, because I feared they
would think I was making advances to himand
if he rejected themoh! it would be too
humiliating
,
notwithstanding I knew I had been to blame.
They probably thought me inexorableand so six
years rolled away; then I heard George was
married
.
Both young ladies signed at this
denouement
Catharine felt afflicted at the disappointment of her
aunt, and Helen regretted the affair had proved so
common-place. Aunt Thankful, after a few
moment's
silence, thus proceeded to draw her moral:
I have told you this story, that you may be
warned against indulging the rancour of party
feelings
.
I do not say that ladies should abstain from
all political reading or conversation; that they
should take no interest in the character or
condition
of their country. I cannot think, in a land so
favoured as ours, such indifference and ignorance is
excusable in a rational being. But their influence
should be expected to allay, not to excite
animosities
:
their concern should be for their whole
country
not
for a party. In their own little circle
they may, in a quiet manner, do much to calm the
irritations which public excitements would
otherwise
mingle with social life; to do this requires
some knowledge, and much goodness and
prudence
.
But you said we were not
free
, said Helen.
None are free who become the slaves of a
party, replied aunt Thankful; nor will they
tolerate freedom of sentiment in others. My
meaning was, that if George Kendall had been
permitted, without persecution, to enjoy his
political
principles here, he would never have gone to
the south. We shall never be
free
in spirit, while
bigotry and intolerance are cherished among us.
M
A NEW-YEAR'S STORY.
CHAPTER I.
THE BREAKFAST.
I think
we should always be cheerful on
New-Year's
day, said Mrs. Morey.
Why on that day in particular? inquired Mr.
Danvers.
Indeed, I can give you no reason, returned
Mrs. Morey. It is one of those cases in which,
I think, feeling should predominate.
Perhaps you consider it ominous.
Perhaps I do, though your smile would
proclaim
it ridiculous. But you will acknowledge
that these cheerful hopes and fancies, which we
can by our own efforts obtain, make us happier for
the day, at least.
It may be very well for people who have few
substantial comforts, said Mrs. Danvers, in a very
bland tone; but there was a laughing sneer in her
eyeYet I confess such fanciful happiness is
not to my taste. I wish to enjoy present
happiness
.
I once heard a good man observe, that pleasure
might be in the present tense, but that happiness
was always in the future, said Miss Lamson.
He was an oracle, I suppose, returned Mrs.
Danvers; I hate oracles.
Well, but you would not maintain that, to those
who, for thirty-five or forty years, have constantly
moved in the round of the fashionable world, there
are any new pleasures to be found in the same
circle
?
said Miss Lamson.
No matter whether they are new, if they are
substantial pleasures, said Mr. Danvers, replying
for his wife; who, he saw, was pale with anger. The
allusion, as she thought, to her age, had highly
offended her. She only owned to
thirty-three
(subtracting ten from Time's callendar)and she
was horrified at the hint included in the term
forty.
There are few pleasures substantial, observed
Mr. Morey, with a sigh.
But many, very many sources of happiness,
my dear, if we only improve the share allotted
us, said Mrs. Morey, kindly. Is it not a very
happy circumstance that we all meet in good health
this morning, with good appetites, and have a very
good breakfast, too; (she smiled)but our cook,
who is a good Catholic, told me last night, that
she should do her best for the New-Year's
breakfast
.
All these are matters of course, said Mrs.
Danvers;I never count a good breakfast among
my pleasures. Give me novelty. Such as we
shall enjoy to-night at the party of Mrs. A. I
believe(she turned towards Mrs. Morey) that
you used, formerly, to attend her parties: were
they not charming?
Very gay and pleasant, certainly; but I did not
enjoy so much happiness as I now do in my
evenings
at home.
Oh, yesdomestic happiness,you have such
fine
children, no wonder you are happy. (Louisa
Morey blushed, and the two little boys laughed
outright at this fine compliment), but then you
have nothing new.
We will be happy then in the good old way,
returned Mrs. Morey; have a New-Year's cake,
and games, and stories. Perhaps Mr. Lassar will
join us.
With pleasure, madam; with all my heart
and Mr. Lassar's dark eye flashed with a look of
exultation, as it glanced from Mrs. Morey to Mrs.
Danvers.
Mrs. Danvers felt, she hardly knew why,
greatly
offended. What should she, a rich, fashionable
lady, care about the opinion of a strange,
misanthropic
man, whom nobody knew. And yet she
was angry that he seemed to rejoice at the idea of
joining Mrs. Morey's social circle.
You can doubtless tell them some
new
stories,
Mr. Lassar, said Mrs. Danvers.
I will tell them my
own
, said he.
The lady's face was red as a piony.
M 2
CHAPTER II.
FAMILY MATTERS.
Allow me to introduce my dramatis person,
severally and generally.
Mr. Morey was one of those characters, almost
peculiar to our republic, who have been every
thing by turns and nothing long, and done every
thing, and found nothing that would do.
He had been liberally educated, that is, so far as
a profuse expenditure of money in college, and a
parchment diploma when he left it, would give
him a right to the boast. He came on the stage of
the great world, in the character of a wit and an
exquisitehe soon fell in love, really, truly,
worthily
so
far as the character of the lady was
concerned
,
and this love changed him to a poet and a
man of sentiment. He educated the young lady
he was intending to wed in the most elegant and
expensive manner. They were married, and
began
life in style.
But a married man, in our country, cannot kill
time without business of some kind. Young
Morey
was too rich to make business a necessary
occupationso he declined entering any of the
learned professions; they were too laborious; but
polities was no labourit was a short and glorious
career to immortality, and he became a politician.
In order to increase his influence, and prevent the
odium of aristocracy from attaching to him as a
merely rich man, living on the patrimony his
father had left him, Morey engaged in trade; he
furnished money, and his partner mindat the
end of ten years the stock of both was expended.
About the same time, the political party which
Morey had assumed to lead, vanished like a shower
of shooting stars; and their light was absorbed or
lost in the rising sun of a more fortunate rival.
Morey was completely down.
But Morey had resources; he thought he had,
for he had often been told so, a great genius; he
would exercise it, he would now become a
political
writer, an editor, and make his talents feared,
and his name respected. His enemies should feel
that neither the loss of office or wealth had power
to crush him.
In truth, they did not crush him; it was the
petty vexations of his craft, the small, but
everpressing
,
every-day cares of common life that
wore him out. He felt that he could, in the
defence
of his family, have grappled with a lion; but
though they perished, he would not stand and be
stung by a host of mosquitos. So he soon
abandoned
his editorship. He then tried several other
departments of business, but all in vain; and from
his last, that of clerk in the  Bank, he was
released
by a severe pulmonary attack. He
recovered
;
but when, after a long year's confinement, he
was able to go abroad, he found his friends all
dead to him.
Mrs. Morey was just such a woman as Solomon
must have had in his mind when he said, the
heart of her husband doth safely trust in her.
She had been indebted to him for her education.
Her father had once been a great man on change,
but when the last change came to him, as he left no
money to his widow and children, no part of his
greatness descended to them. The eldest son went
out to India, where he was soon carried off by the
cholera; the second died at home of a fever, and
the poor mother, broken-hearted and discouraged,
soon followed him to the grave, leaving the
beautiful
Isabel, a child of thirteen, to the mercy of a
heartless world.
It was in the deep weeds of mourning that the
lovely child first caught the eye of the gay Richard
Morey. She looked so fair, so pure, so like a
new-made
star, just trembling through the clouds of
earth's foul atmosphere, that every soft and
exalting
sentiment which female beauty and innocence
is capable of inspiring in the heart of a young man,
was kindled in that of Morey. Had the spirit of
chivalry dictated his course, it could not have been
more romantically refined. He adopted her as a
sister, placed her under the guardianship of his
aunt, provided for her every advantage of
education
,
and every enjoyment suited to her age, which
money could command. Till she was sixteen he
never hinted to her his partiality, or endeavoured
to gain her heart. But he had secured it long
before
;
and at seventeen she became his wife.
It was not for his wealth, station, education,
appearance
not
for any or all of these, that Isabel
Erskine loved Richard Morey. It was his
tenderness
and truth to her, his kindness that had
sustained the orphan, his generosity that had, by
affording her the means of an education, opened
in her mind and heart such rich sources of
intellectual
and moral enjoyment; it was these
recollections
which bound her soul to his, as it were,
absorbing her whole earthly being in his
happiness
,
and making the aim of her life to contribute
to the exaltation of his character.
How vividly she had enjoyed his prosperity, and
how deeply she felt his misfortunes, no language
could describe! Their reverses were never thought
of as affecting her own comfortsshe would
cheerfully
have
Fed on pulse,
Drank the clear stream, and nothing worn but frieze,
if by that means her husband might have been
sustained in his place and fortune.
This sentiment it was which called forth the
energies
of her character. She met, with cheerful
alacrity, every change of situation his decreasing
finances made necessary. She parted with her
splendid furniture without a sigh; gave up her
fashionable circle; even rejoiced when some of
these heartless beings affected to
cut her
, that she
was effectually freed from their intrusion, and had
her time to devote to domestic avocations, and to
the instruction of her young daughter, whom she
had taken from the expensive school where they
could no longer afford to keep her. When the
heart-corroding trouble of Mr. Morey had broken
his constitution, and brought on his long disease, it
was his affectionate wife that was, like a guardian
angel, about his bed. No fatigue seemed to depress,
no watching to weary her. Her gentle tones
always
encouraged him to hope in the mercy of that
God who does not willingly afflict His children,
and to be resigned to His will. And when their
prayers were answered, and Mr. Morey went from
his sick chamber, a sadder but a wiser man, and
found the world all occupied, and no spot to call
his own, his devoted wife had provided him a
home.
It was her hardest trial to persuade and reconcile
him to the idea of her opening a boarding-house!
That his wife, his lovely and accomplished Isabel,
who had been the cynosure of all eyes, whose
grace and beauty had been the admiration of princes
and lords in the courts of Europe; that she should
be reduced to a mere housekeeper, a poor
dependent
on the caprice of those who had money to pay
for their boardthat such should sit at his table,
and subject
her
to the necessity of domestic cares
and toilsthis was the bitterness of his lot!
It is nothing, nothing, my dear Richard, in
comparison with what many of my sex have
endured
for those they love, said Mrs. Morey.
Think of the trials and sufferings of Lady
Russell
!O,
how trivial to her would have appeared
the mere exertion to obtain a living, if the life of
her husband might have been spared. And how
often, during your illness, in my prayers for your
recovery, did I feel that, if you might be spared, I
never could be otherwise than happy.
CHAPTER III.
THE BOARDERS.
The first who engaged lodgings was Miss
Mehitabel
Lamson, a moderately endowed and invalid
spinster. How came that class of females, called
old maids, to be vilified and held up to contempt!
The majority of those I have known have been
most worthy of praise; and Miss Lamson was an
example of goodness. She became acquainted with
the Moreys soon after their misfortunes, assisted
Mrs. Morey during the sickness of her husband,
and now came to give her countenance to their
establishment
.
She took the small parlour that opened
out of the dining-room, because she was too feeble
to walk up and down stairs.
The whole of the second floor was taken by Mr.
Danvers. He broke up his expensive
establishment
,
as his wife said, purposely, out of friendship
for Mr. Morey; he wished to encourage this effort
at independence. They offered a high price for
the suit of rooms, more than the Moreys had
intended
to ask. Mr. Morey would have refused it
and them, if his gentle wife had not plead, almost
with tears, that the sacrifice might be made.
They only come to insult us, said Mr. Morey,
speaking through his set teeth. There has been
a time when Danvers would have thought himself
honoured for life by the privilege of sitting at my
tableand now he talks of encouraging me!
Mr. Morey wronged him. Danvers had no wish
either to insult or encourage the fallen man. The
plan of the boarding was entirely managed by Mrs.
Danvers. She had in her youth cherished a feeling
of love, or admiration rather, for the dashing
Richard
Morey,she had manuvred to gain his
attention
,
and hoped to win him, when the fair orphan
destroyed all her plans. Mrs. Danvers had hated
Isabel Erskineshe had envied Mrs. Morey, and
now the opportunity of exultation over her fallen
rival promised her most exquisite gratification.
The third floor was, at first, occupied by two
young gentlemen, friends of the Danvers';one
soon after sailed for Europe, and the very day of
his departure, Mr. Lassar presented himself. He
was a stranger, but of what country he did not say.
He brought a letter of recommendation from the
Portuguese consul at Washington, and he had a
Portuguese servant; these appearances seemed to
warrant him of that country. Then his appearance
N
was decidedly foreign. His dark eye, sallow
complexion
,
and huge mustachios, were a
never-exhausted
topic of comment for Mrs. Danvers. She
admired poetry and the picturesque. How could
she avoid admiring a man whose appearance was so
beautifully Byronian? He was a walking edition
of the Corsair and Giaour. She never saw him
appear
without a thrill of awe and curiosity.
Who was Mr. Lassar? Nobody could tell. He
evidently had plenty of money
.
A few weeks after his arrival, the young
gentleman
who occupied the contiguous chamber, gave
Mrs. Morey warning that he should leave her. He
said that he must board nearer his store. The truth
was, the young shopkeeper felt annoyed by the
presence of the dark stranger, who, he had
ascertained
,
kept his percussion pistols always loaded.
Mrs. Morey told her husband that Mr.  was
going, and the vacant apartment might be let.
I will take it, said Mr. Lassar. How much
did Mr.  pay? She told him.
My servant will settle for a quarter's rent in
advance, said Lassar.
How very odd! said Mrs. Danvers. What
can he want of two such apartments? Who is he?
CHAPTER IV.
CONVERSATION.
'Tis a lovely face, said Mr. Lassar. He was
leaning against the mantel-piece, and fixedly
contemplating
an engraving of Lady Russell.
Mrs. Morey startedshe did not know that he
had lingered after the breakfast-things were
removed
.
She had not yet risen, but as her custom
was, remained to wash the cups, and take note that
every thing was arranged in its proper place.
Mr. Morey calls that picture my guardian
saint, said she, faintly smiling. Indeed, the
feelings which it often awakens in my heart are
comforting and elevating. It reminds me of the
strength of mind affection may impartof the
fortitude
with which feeble woman may support the
deepest afflictions. I never look at it without
feeling
a conviction of the wonderful moral influence
with which my sex are endowed, and of the
responsibility
which that endowment imposes. Is it
not strange, Mr. Lassar, that we should be such
triflers?
No, I think not, while so much importance is
attached to trifles. Your sex are, excuse me,
madam, for the plainness of my remark, very fond
of influencepower, some call it; and while the
chief object of their education is to qualify them
for display, and the voice of society makes that
display the standard of rank and fashion, the
majority
will be triflers.
How can this be corrected?
There are two methods. The most speedy
and noble one might be effected by the rich and
talented. If they would lend their aid only to
objects
of real importance, and always sustain persons
of real worth of character, whatever might be their
worldly circumstances, they could soon make the
standard of fashion that of elevated moral goodness
and mental acquirements. The other method is,
that the people, the great mass, shall give the tone
to public opinion, and proscribe every thing which
is not useful in itself, and equally accessible to all.
The first method has for its object the improvement
of the poor; the other, that of putting down the
rich.
You do not think the last likely to prevail!
Judging from present appearances, it may;
though I cannot give up my darling hope, that the
rich will be instructed by the signs of the times,
and use their advantages more wisely. And yet,
how can I hope, when I have daily before my eyes
their abuse of power. What has shut the door of
Mrs. A against you, madam, but the want of
wealth, or its appearance? What has opened it to
Mrs. Danvers but the appearance of wealth? Had
Mrs. A acted on Christian principles, her
attentions
would have increased with your
misfortunes
.
Had she acted on rational principles, she
would not have abandoned you under a reverse to
which the richest are liable, and which, when
sustained
with patience, magnanimity, and
self-exertion
,
entitles the sufferer to added respect and
consideration
.
I should not have attended her party, had I
been invited, observed Mrs. Morey, calmly;
because
I could not have afforded the expense of time
and dress.
Very well, madam; I presume you would not.
But then you would have made your own election,
and in deciding that now, the duties of life, rather
than its amusements, were the most proper pursuit,
you would have felt a pleasure in their
performance
,
which, while the contempt of the fashionable
world is thus poured upon them, no woman's
feelings
can fully appreciate.
Oh! it is not for myself that I ever regard a
slight, said Mrs. Morey, tears rushing to her
eyes. But my poor husband, he is so distressed
when he sees that his loss of property has subjected
N 2
me to these insults, that he is quite unmanned. If
I could only persuade him to regard it as lightly
as I do, I should be perfectly contented and
happy.
You devote yourself entirely to your husband,
I see, returned Mr. Lassar, approaching her. I
have often read in novels this disinterestedness of
the female heart, but never before saw it
exemplified
.
He deserves itmy husband deserves it all.
You cannot judge by his present appearance what
he was, when he adopted me, a poor, friendless
orphan, as his sister. You smile; wellperhaps
he intended I should be more. But he was father,
brother, guardian to me then, and he has since
been
all
. The world may say he has been unwise
but he has always been just to others and to me.
Oh! I shall never overpay his kindnesses.
I can sympathize in your desolate feelings,
arising from want of kindred, observed Mr.
Lassar
,
tenderly. I have for many, many years,
been a desolate being, separated from my country
and friends; even my native language was a strange
sound to my ears.
Mr. Lassar seemed fairly launched into his own
history, and how far he might have forestalled his
promised evening communication, it is impossible
to say. He was cut short by the appearance of
Mrs. Danvers; she stared most inquisitively on the
tte--tte
then returning, with stately
politeness
,
Mr. Lassar's cold bow, as he passed out of
the apartment, she informed Mrs. Morey that she
came to tell her, Mr. Danvers and lady had an
invitation to take a New-Year's dinner with the
Hon. Judge P. And, continued she, we
shall go, though the time is short; no fault of Mrs.
P. She sent the card a week since, but it
was lost. The servant deserves a prison.
Pardon my troubling you, Mrs. Morey. I
just wished to have your opinion respecting my
jewellery. Which shall I wear, the topaz, or these
emeralds set in pearls? said Mrs. Danvers.
The emeralds and pearls would be my choice.
They are beautiful.
Mr. Danvers insisted that I should have a set
of diamondsbut I thought them too extravagant.
He said so much, that I was obliged to take this
ring. Do you not think the stone a rich one?
Very. Yes, it is a real diamond, and elegantly
set.
I am glad it suits your taste, because Mr.
Danvers
thinks so highly of your judgment. He says,
that when you wore ornaments, they were always
superb. I should think you would sometimes
wear them now.
I sold my ornaments during my husband's
long illness, said Mrs. Morey, in a quiet tone.
Dear meI forgot. Well, you are so good
that you do not need such flimsy things. But my
husband is never happy unless I make a show.
And really, this dinner party is a formidable affair;
and then we must attend the
soire
at Mrs. A's.
It is too much. I am half inclined not to go this
evening; you must know I have a
penchant
to
learn who Mr. Lassar is; and this evening he
promised
his history, or perhaps he told it you this
morning?
Mrs. Morey had so long and strictly governed
her own feelings, that neither the evident intention
of mortifying and vexing her, exhibited by Mrs.
Danvers, while displaying her jewellery, nor the
last ill-bred remark, had any effect on her mild
face, except that of raising a half smile.
Well, continued Mrs. Danvers, who is
he?
He has not yet told me; I expect that pleasure
this evening.
It will be a pleasure. Why, he must be some
nobleman. And he cannot be an exile, for they
are always poor. And you know he has always
dressed like a lord; and then, his rooms are so
richly furnished. He must be either a baron or a
bandit, as I often tell my husband; and so fond as
he is of your childrenI should have thought you
would have found out who he was six months ago.
How I wish I knew!
I have never felt any solicitude on the subject.
He came highly recommended! he has ever
sustained
the character given him; and morehe has
been a friend as well as a boarder.
Do you know he is soon going away?
I had no thought of the kind. When?
Where?
I was told to-dayit is a great secretbut
I was told that he had purchased that splendid
house in  street, next door to Mrs. A's.
Is he intending to occupy it?
I guess sothough perhaps not. He said he
purchased it for his
sister
but who can she be?
Have you ever heard him name her?
NoI thought he had no relations.
I presume he has not. It was only a
ruse
and he will live there himself. Mrs. A sent
him a card for her partyshe is dying to be
acquainted
with him; but it seems he does not intend
to go. Ah! you and Louisa are the magnets for
him. I should'nt wonder if he was intending to
propose for Louisa this evening, and so, as a
preparatory
,
will tell you who he is. How I wish I
knew!
In the parlour of the Moreys, though it was
only half-past nine, there reigned the hush of
midnight
.
The tea-things had long been removed.
The little boys, Richard and Edward, had had
their games and sports, in which Mr. Lassar had
participated, with all the glee of a child; Louisa
had sung and played her father's favourite songs,
and, accompanied by Mr. Lassar's flute, performed
the plaintive airs her mother loved best;the little
boys had retired; the piano was shut; and gathered
closely around the centre table, the remaining
members of the family group were waiting, in the
hush of mute attention, the expected history of
Mr. Lassar. Hark!ring! ring!bustle! bustle!
Who can it be?Who but Mr. and Mrs.
Danvers
.
You see we are returned to spend the evening
with you, my dear Mrs. Morey, said the lady, as
she uncloaked, unbonnetted, and threw herself
languidly
on the sofa. I told Mr. Danvers that one
party at a time was as much as my nerves would
bear. Don't let us interrupt you, Mr. Lassar. I
assure you we shall esteem it the greatest of
favours
to hear you communication. Mrs. Morey
could not feel more interested in the events of
your life than I do.
The events of my life, madam, said Mr.
Lassar
,
have been so varied, that a long story might
be told; but, to gratify you, I will come to the
result
at once. Let me just run over the index. At
twenty, I was, by my father's death, and the
insolvency
of his estate, thrown on the worldwent to
India to seek my fortuneafter many hardships,
sufferings and struggles, became interpreter and
factor to a Persian merchantand finally, at his
death, succeeded to his business and property.
But your sister; said Mrs. Danvers, eagerly.
All in good time. Mrs. Morey, had you ever
a brother in India? His voice trembled.
Yes; EdwardEdward Erskine. What do
you know of him?
Isabel, dear IsabelI am Edward Erskine!
They will cut Mrs. A, that is certain, said
Mrs. Danvers to her husband.
They'll cut us, too, my dear.
But I am sure I have always esteemed Mrs.
Moreyand how could I know she was Mr.
Lassar's
sister?
True; how could you know she would ever be
able to give another party? Well, money is much
more
fashionable
than meritthey will now have
friends enough.
And they will live in that splendid house, and
Miss Lamson is to reside with them. How
strangely things happen! It has been a happy
New-Year to the Moreys.
CAPTAIN GLOVER'S DAUGHTER.
Sunday
, especially in the country, is the true
holiday of a Yankee. In saying this, I do not
mean that it is considered as a day of recreation
no, indeed!there are very few native-born and
native-dwelling Yankees but would revolt at the
idea of finding their own amusements on the
Lord's day. They intend to keep the day holy,
but they wish to appear respectable in so doing,
and they like to enjoy themselves. What better
method to obtain these objects than regular
attendance
at church, dressed in their best; where they
can see and be seen?the elderly people having
an opportunity for cordial greetings and
disquisitions
on the weather, either when they meet on
the road, or around the church door; and the
young ones exchanging smiles, glances, or warm
pressures of the hand, which, between those of
the same sex, indicate friendship. Ladies only
indulge
in friendshipbut when the eye of a young
man is habitually and continually directed across
the gallery, or into a neighbouring pew of fair
damsels, we may not wrong him by imputing to
him a sentiment which he does not call friendship.
At least one half our rural beaux fall in love at
church.
Pray, who was that handsome girl who sat in
the pew on the left of the pulpit, said young
Albert
Eaton to his cousin James Rowe.
On the left of the pulpit?Oh, that was
Captain
Glover's daughter, replied James, who was
turning over a volume of Percival's Poem;
here is her picture:
From her eye's melting azure there sparkles a flame
That kindles the young blood to ecstacy's glow;
She speaksand the tones of her voice are the same,
As would once, like the wind-harp, in melody flow.
But I forgot you had not yet heard her speak,
Albert
.
She is the finest girl I saw in your church,
James. Does her father live in the village?
Oh! nohe lives down by the mill.
Not in that small house by the bridge?
Yes, by the bridgein that little hutand
James cast a glance of keen inquiry on his cousin,
and it might be there was some derision in his
smile.
Albert Eaton's father was a man who had
gathered much substance, and waxed rich in
speculations
,
and he now lived like a rich man,
engrossed
O
with the cares of adding to his possessions, or
harassed with the fears of losing his property.
Riches never bring content; at least, they never
bring it to a worldly man. Albert happened,
unfortunately
,
to be an only child, and as all the
estate
would finally descend to him(and sorely did
it grieve the elder Mr. Eaton when the idea
crossed
him that he must die and
leave his property
)
he had been lectured on the necessity of economy,
good calculation, and taking care of his money, till
he had often wished there was no such thing as
money in the world. He particularly hated
half-cents
.
Always remember and save the half-cent
in your bargains, his father would say. Albert
was a good-natured soul, but he never heard his
father say, save the half-cent, without a frown,
and he never would save it. As well be a
beggar
at once as practice such beggarly economy,
Albert thought. And truly, what is the benefit of
possessing property, when we only note its
increase
by increasing anxiety!
It will probably be surmised, by the reader, that
Albert would not regard the poverty of a lovely
girl as an insuperable bar to his addresses. Neither
would he have so regarded it had that poverty only
exhibited itself in the lack of money; but, to lack
a decent house to live in, placed the indigence of
Captain Glover's daughter in a mortifying point of
view to Albert Eaton.
Few people form their own opinions of what is
really excellent in character from reasoning. We
are the slaves of circumstance, education, fashion.
Albert had always lived in an elegant dwelling
all his particular friends resided in fine houses, and
he fancied those persons worthy of his admiration
must be found in fine houses. He saw and felt the
meanness of being devoted exclusively to the love
of money; but he did not dream that the undue
value placed on those luxuries which money
commanded
,
was a passion just as sordid and selfish.
The only difference is, that the latter error may
more easily be corrected. And it was not many
days, before Albert acknowledged that virtue,
intelligence
and refinement, as well as beauty, might
be found in a humble dwelling.
Captain Glover was a man of considerable talent,
and in his youth, extraordinary good-looking. His
father gave him a farm, and assisted him to build
a house, and he married a pretty, amiable girl: thus
beginning the world with bright prospects for a
farmer; every body prophesied he would do well,
and so he would have done, but for one single
failing
.
He was indolent. The sluggard is not so
criminal as the drunkard; but he is far from being
innocent. Yet there are but few men, notoriously
lazy, who would have maintained so respectable a
standing among the stirring generation of Yankees
as did Captain Glover. His temper was as
unmovable
as his frame, and he would sit the live
long day in his elbow-chair, chatting and
laughing
,
without once being disturbed from his
imperturbable
good humour by the advice, or even
reproaches
of his wife (she did scold sometimes, and
nobody blamed her for scolding), or the noise of
his children. Toil on his farm he would notand
he really felt relieved when the sheriff attached
and sold it to satisfy executions which had been
renewed to the utmost limit of time allowed by
the law. His creditors were loath to distress such
a good-natured fellow, till he urged the sale of the
farm, alleging that the fences were going to ruin,
and the sooner it was disposed of, the better.
Relying
on the old saying, that the lame and the lazy
are always provided for, Glover gave himself no
uneasiness about his future residence, or business,
till a brother of his wife, out of pity to her and
her children, offered him the employment of
tending
an old mill. Glover accepted the situation,
and very contentedly established himself, as he
hoped, for life.
There seemed indeed little prospect that any one,
though differing in politics, would covet his
place
.
The mill was on a small stream, which divided
the town of B from the village of L;
consequently, like a neutral between two parties,
was not much patronized by the inhabitants of
either. The stream was scanty, and usually dry
six weeks every summer; and the ice and other
accidents obstructed the operations of the mill
about as long every winter. Here then was a
glorious
situation for an idle man. Three months
in each year perfectly at liberty to enjoy himself,
without a twinge of conscience to upbraid him.
He did enjoy himself, notwithstanding his house
looked little better than an Indian wigwam, or an
Irish cabin. But his wife, poor woman, was never
contented, and finally she fell into a consumption,
and died. Mrs. Glover had always been
considered
the main-stay of the house, and it was now
confidently
prophesied that the family must be broken
up. And so it would inevitably have been, but for
the eldest girl, a child of eleven years old.
Margaret
Glover was a shy, modest little creature, and
during her mother's life, renowned for nothing but
the despatch with which she performed an errand;
and furthermore, she had been praised, by Miss
Molly Griffin, for being always careful to make
her courtesy and shut the door after hertwo
observances
from which the thoughtful spinster
augured that Margaret would make an
accomplished
and useful young lady. And so it proved, for
O 2
immediately on her mother's death she took charge
of the children, five younger than herself
managing
them and the household affairs with the
diligence
and discretion of a woman.
The inside of their humble dwelling was in
reality more comfortable than the outward
appearance
would have indicated. The larger room was
ceiled around and plastered over-head, and always
kept as neat as a fairy would have prescribed. It
was a pleasant sight to look on the bright row of
pewter plates and porringers in the open cupboard,
with the white milk-pail and wooden bowl on the
bottom shelfall arranged in the best order for
display. It was innocent and useful vanity,
however
(if vanity ever deserves to be so considered),
for the praise bestowed on Margaret's industry and
neatness never made her proud, only more anxious
to deserve such commendation. Neither were her
thoughts all engrossed by her housewifery, as is too
often the case with your notables. The necessity
she felt of instructing her younger sisters and
brother
,
aroused her to improve her own mind, and she
soon excelled in her taste for reading, and
judgment
of books. Nothing like self-instruction for
strengthening the mind. One twelvemonth's
determined
attention to our own progress in
literature
,
is worth years lounged away in the schools.
In the latter case, we are too often satisfied if our
instructors know what we should learnin the
former, we learn for ourselves.
There are but very few people among us reduced
to such poverty as to place their children at
service
,
or put them from their care while young.
Even Captain Glover, indifferent as he was to the
opinion of the world, would have felt disgraced
had he not maintained his children. It was a
wonder to many how he did itbut who ever
knew a miller to starve! Notwithstanding the
few customers to his mill, his children were fair
and fat, and his pig throve, and his cow (or rather
his brother's) always looked sleek. These things
were set down, not to the captain's credit, but his
daughter's, and she became the heroine of her own
immediate neighbourhood, and her praise even
reached the extremities of the two contiguous
townsquite a miracle for the fame of a woman.
She had many heroine accomplishments to be sure:
was fair as the fairest are described, sung sweetly,
and cut bread and butter for her little sisters and
brother, as gracefully as Werter's Charlotte; and
all before she was seventeen.
Such was the girl who had captivated Albert
Eaton, a graduate from Harvard, with all the pride
of the college in his head, and the hope of
eminence
in the profession he had chosen, the law, in
his imagination. Could he marry a poor miller's
daughter, who lived in a house resembling a
salt-box
?
He probably never would have married
her but for one lucky circumstance in the
constitution
of our lawsthe militia system was all that
gave him any hope of reconciling his parents to
his choice of a wife.
Americans have two ardent passions; the love
of liberty, and love of distinction. These passions
mutually stimulate and increase each other; the
enjoyment of equal rights, as citizens, giving every
man a chance of becoming eminent, and that
eminence
being derived from living under a free
government
,
the Americans are thus necessarily as
ambitious of fame as they are tenacious of freedom.
We have been often stigmatized as a money-loving
race, and, I regret to say, the reproach is too true;
but it is not to indulge in luxuries, that wealth is
sought with such avidity. It is for the
consequence
which attaches to the possession of riches.
Our people care little for their own comfort, in
comparison with the estimation in which their
means of comfort are held by others. To be
convinced
of this, travel through the country, and look
at the style of building houses, and managing
appearances
.
Every thing is conducted to make an
impression on the beholder. Instead of neat, snug
cottages, thoroughly finished, and sheltered by
trees and shrubs, we meet, continually, great
shingle palaces, standing plump in the highway,
perhaps; and whether the interior be finished, is a
matter of small consequence, provided a coat of
white paint has been daubed on the outside, to
catch the eye of the passing traveller. The man
who inhabits it has the name of being
rich
, and
that satisfies him he is comfortable. It is just the
same with regard to public employments. Few
individuals enter into public life, who would not
be wealthier and happier as private citizensbut
then they would not be known, would not see
their names in the newspaper, except for raising a
curious calf, or a mammoth cabbage; and so they
sacrifice their ease, and often their estate, to be
distinguished
.
Every office, from petit juryman to
president of the United States, has its attractions
for our ambitious citizens.
Captain Glover had been chosen an officer, partly
for his good looks, but more for his good nature.
He made a very popular captain, never troubling
his company with much military manuvring, and
always treating well. Indeed, he had the honour
of expending a considerable part of his small estate
in the service, and never offered to retire till he
had neither money nor credit to support the
expense
of his office. His patriotism was rewarded
by bearing the title of
Captain
into his retreat;
and, truly, those who would sneer at that warlike
prefix to a miller's name, have small reason to
boast of their philanthrophy or gallantry. That title
was the inheritance of Captain Glover's children.
The fair Margaret, notwithstanding her attractions
of mind and person, never would have been
received
into the rich and proud family of Mr.
Eaton, had it not been for her father's title; or, at
least, if Albert had married her, his parents would
scarcely have forgiven him and acknowledged
her. But, aided by the distinction of being
Captain
Glover's daughter, the young man found
means to introduce Margaret to a Mrs. Carlton, a
particular friend of his mother's, who resided
about twenty miles from the mill. Mrs. Carlton
soon became exceedingly attached to this amiable
girl; the worthy old lady, to be sure, was quite a
stickler for respectabilitybut then she did not
make wealth the criterion of merit. She kept
Margaret as her companion, for a few months, and
then took her to the city, and presented her as her
peculiar favourite, to Mr. and Mrs. Eaton.
Mrs. Carlton had previously hinted of their
son's attachment to a young lady under her care,
and the parents had felt, that if she approved the
match, it would be quite suitable. Of course, Mr.
Eaton thought the young woman must be
possessed
of cash, or she would not be a
lady
and when
he saw her, her appearance and manners so
charmed
him, that he willingly gave his consent to the
union.
To whom did you say that your son was
engaged
?
inquired Miss Perkins, as she called the
morning after the affair had been made public.
Oh! to Captain Glover's daughter; a lovely,
accomplished young creature, replied Mrs. Eaton,
with an exulting smile.
And a great fortune, I presume.
No, not a great fortunebut I always told
Albert I did not care about the fortune of the lady
he married. I only insisted she should belong to
a respectable family, said Mrs. Eaton.
She must have been carefully educated, and
that I consider a fortune, said Mr. Eaton, senior.
He had been charmed by her reading (she read
beautifully), and by her industry at her needle.
Margaret did appear well, for her judgment was
matured by reflection, and the fine powers of her
mind developed by that species of self-training
which expands the heart and affections to the
performance
of duty.
Good sense and native ease made her appear to
advantage in the splendid circles to which she
was introduced, and Captain Glover's daughter
was considered a model of propriety in manners
as well as character.
There is nothing will make young women so
lovely and beloved as the strict performance of
every duty devolving on them, in whatsoever
station
they are placed.
Had Margaret, depending on her personal
beauty
,
set up for the fine lady, she would probably
have been only the village coquette, and married
at last some poor man; for though Albert was
certainly
fascinated first by her appearance, yet had
he not found her mind so cultivated as to give him
assurance she would appear well as his wife, his
pride would have conquered his first fancy,
especially
when he had to seek her in such a house.
P
THE FATE OF A FAVOURITE.
This, this is
he
softly awhile
Let us not break in upon him:
Oh! change beyond report, thought, or belief.
Sampson Agonistes
.
Lewis Merton
was a rich man's only child,
and often pronounced, by all who visited at his
father's
,
the finest boy in Boston. In personal
appearance
he was a fine child, and would have been
an intelligent one, had he not been injured by the
indulgence of his appetites. There is small danger
of being starved in our land of plenty; but the
danger of being stuffed is imminent, and yet hardly
a thought is bestowed on the subject by those who
direct the public sentiment. You may indulge any
childish propensity with less injury to the intellect
than that of gluttony.
Eating to excess constantly will deaden or
destroy
the energies of the mind, while those of the
animal are increased, till the immortal becomes
perfectly swinish; and yet many tender, delicate
mothers, seem to think that to make their children
eat
, is all that is requisite to make them
great
.
But eating to excess was not the only temptation
to which Lewis Merton was exposed. He was
always
allowed to come to the table, because he was
an only child; and of course he could not fail to
hear his father's eulogies on the good effect of a
glass of brandy and water after dinner. Mrs.
Merton
eschewed brandy as a lady would do, but she
took a little wine, for fashion's sake. Miss
Temperance
Merton was a maiden lady, with a pale,
consumptive cheek, and her constitution could not
endure either brandy or wine. She only sipped
anniseed or clover-water. Lewis tasted of all. And
in addition to these indulgences, his nurse always
gave him gin and molasses for a cold; and his good
grandmother insisted that the juice of wormwood,
infused in rum, was the sovereignest thing on
earth for worms. But, in justice to his taste, I
must say that he never approved of her medicine.
Now, with all these temptations, is it strange
Lewis became intemperate? or that he was, in
consequence of being intoxicated, suspended for
the term of six months, during his second year at
Yale? His parents were bowed down to the dust
with grief and mortification, but their sorrows
made but little impression on their son. He had,
by the indulgence of his appetites, been rendered
that most revolting spectaclea cold-hearted,
selfish
,
sottish being, in the season of life when the
warm and generous impulses of soul and fancy
should have been predominant. These impulses
may run riot, and may produce evil consequences;
but we feel even then that
The light which led astray,
Was light from heaven.
Mr. Merton endeavoured, by every means he
could devisesome harsh onesto correct the bad
habits of his son; and his gentle mother wept over
her dear Lewis; and while she told him repeatedly
that he was her only hope, besought him not to
break her heart by destroying himself. Had she
only conducted his early training judiciously, all
this sorrow and fear would have been spared her.
Why are not mothers more careful?
The six months of disgrace were ended, and Mr.
Merton ordered Lewis to return to Yale. He was
furnished with money for his expenses on the road,
his father determining he should have no more at
command than necessary. But Mrs. Merton made
her son a parting giftshe little dreamed it was to
be a final parting. Lewis bade them farewell with
perfect nonchalance; but instead of going to New
Haven proceeded to Hartford, from there to New
York, and then to Philadelphia. His father could
never trace him farther: though a rumour that a
young man answering to the description of Lewis
Merton was killed in a duel at Savannah, sent the
almost distracted parent to that city. But the
murdered
youth proved to be the son of another, and
so Mr. Merton felt some hope that Lewis might
return. But two or three years passed without
tidings
,
and he relinquished the hope. Mrs. Merton
would not yet despair, though her trouble was fast
wearing away her life. The only pleasure she
seemed to enjoy was in acts of charity; and she
was accordingly applied to often on behalf of the
distressed. One case occurred during the spring of
1811, which interested her much, and for a time
seemed to steal her from the contemplation of her
own sorrows.
Application had been made to several benevolent
individuals in Boston, on behalf of a lady who, it
was stated, had come from New Orleans, expecting
to find her husband in this city; but had learned
here that he was dead, and in consequence she, too,
was near dying.
There was a degree of mystery connected with
her story, or all that could be learned, which
excited
much curiosity. Moreover, she was young
and very beautiful, and the men who had seen her
were vastly interested in her favour. The ladies
were not so much dazzled by her charms; perhaps
they reflect more carefully than do the menhow
very fleeting are such advantages;at any rate, the
P 2
personal beauty of one of their own sex never
blinds their judgment to defects in character, and
they were suspicious of the fair stranger. But,
finally, Mrs. Merton, and a few benevolent ladies,
who valued the life of a fellow-being more than the
pleasure of pitying a maniac, exerted themselves so
effectually, that the stranger was provided with a
comfortable apartment, at a decent boarding-house
in  street. The landlady, Miss Bruce, was a
worldly woman, shrewd, and somewhat shrewish,
but she was not absolutely hard-hearted. She
professed
to pity the poor lady sincerely, and to be
ready to oblige her in every way; she was glad
she had an apartment she could spare for her
accommodation
and
she was glad, though she did
not say it, that for the expenses of the first quarter
she had ample security.
Mrs. Marie L. was the name by which the
stranger
was known. She would give no other name;
nor would she give the address of any person at
the South as her agent or acquaintance.
The story she told was simply this: she had
parted with her husband about six months before,
when he sailed for Boston, she agreeing to follow
him after a certain time, which she accordingly
did. That when she arrived here she went to the
house where she had been directed, and was told
her husband had never been there, but that a
package
directed to Mrs. L. had been deposited there
some weeks, left by a man who appeared to be a
sailor. On opening the package, Mrs. L. found it
contained her husband's apparel, his watch and
miniature, and a letter from a person signing
himself
Job Short, and stating that J. L. died on board
the vessel in which he sailed from New Orleans,
and that with his dying breath he had conjured
him, Job Short, to convey the intelligence to Mrs.
L., who would be found in Boston. Who this man
was, or to what vessel he belonged, Mrs. L. did not
know. These were some of the mysteries of the
matters, and they gave rise to a variety of
conjectures
.
It was thought strange Mrs. L. did not
investigate
the subject more thoroughly. Some
people
surmised her husband might have left money,
which the sailor had appropriated to himself; and
some pronounced the whole affair a hoax. But
these last had never seen Mrs. L.certainly they
had never seen her weeping over her husband's
picture, and holding his watch hour after hour,
with her eyes rivetted on the movement of the
hands, as if she were numbering the minutes that
must intervene before she should meet him in
eternity.
The affair awakened more interest at the time
than we should now think it possible a friendless,
pennyless wanderer could excite; but then it must
be borne in mind there was a mystery in the case.
Who does not know the power of the mysterious
to create the magnificent? There is nothing
contemptible
connected with a secret.
But weeks and months passed, and Mrs. L.'s
story began to lose its novelty. No one, it is true,
had discovered any thing amiss in her deportment,
or indeed had discovered any more than her first
appearance indicated, namely, that she was a
beautiful
,
but broken-hearted young creature. Many
were dissatisfied with her silence and mystery.
They called her ungrateful for refusing to repose
confidence in her friends; distrusted the purity of
her motivestill, finally, she was neglected, and as
more fashionable charities presented themselves,
forgotten. All but Mrs. Merton and one more
withdrew their names as contributors to her
support
at the expiration of the first quarter. These
two continued their aid till the babe to which Mrs.
L. had given birth, a few weeks after her
establishment
at her lodgings in  street, was ten months
old; they then informed their protegee that their
duty to others rendered it impossible they could
support her longer; recommended her to try what
she could do with her needlepromised to assist
her in the sale of her work, and bade her good
morning.
It was one of those beautiful mornings in June,
that rise on the earth with calmness, after a long,
dreary, easterly storm; to the sick or desponding,
the smile of an angel could hardly be more
welcome
than such a bright day, following a week of
gloom. Marie sat by her open window, which
commanded a view of the harbour, and she was
gazing intently on the sparkling waters, watching
the vapours as they melted away, or rose upward
like the curtain of a theatre, showing the green
islands in all their variety of forms, with a
distinctness
of outline never observed after the sun has
passed the meridian. Such a revealing of the
beauties
of nature, as the shadows of night and storms
are rolled away from the earth, communicates a
serenity to the mind; and rarely is a heart so
abandoned
to grief, as not to feel its soothing influence.
The mind of Mrs. L. was probably buoyed up by
the hope which the bland scene before her inspired,
for she listened, without any apparent emotion, to
the declaration of the ladies that they could assist
her no longer; and she saw them depart, yet gave
no symptom of feeling, except it might have been
thought, that the fond caress she bestowed on her
infant boy was prompted by the instinctive impulse
with which the desolate-hearted cling to their last
comfort.
I declare I think we have done enough for that
woman, said Miss Perry, one of the ladies. How
cold and indifferent, even ungrateful, she appears,
Mrs. Merton.
I am not yet quite satisfied with myself,
replied
Mrs. Merton. I know Mrs. L. does not
appear so deeply affected by kindness as some do;
but it is not always those who say `thank you,' the
most eagerly, that are really the most grateful for
an obligation. Mrs. L. has doubtless enjoyed
prosperity
and the hope of a proud fortune, and to such
there is a feeling of mortification attending the
reception
of charity, which often makes them shrink
from the open acknowledgment of favours. But
their hearts bless you. She added, after a long
pause, I wish I knew the history of Mrs. L.; if
she is only unfortunate, I am half inclined to offer
her a home in my own house, if it were only for
the sake of her lovely babe.
He is a fine child, said the other.
O, yeshe reminds me often of my own; and
he may now be an object of charitypoor Lewis!
How tenderly he was reared! Ah! we mothers,
when watching our little ones, and gratifying their
every want, little think what hardships and
sufferings
they may be fated to endure. Poor Lewis!
he never had a wish unattended to. I used to
indulge
him in every thing. And now, perhaps, he
is in want of all things.
She was endeavouring to dry the tears, that
always
gushed forth when she named her son, as
Miss Bruce made her appearance.
We have concluded we can do no more for
your lodger, said Miss Perry.
What in mercy will become of her, then? she
can do nothing for herself, said the landlady.
O, she must try, replied Miss Perry. And,
at the worst, she will not starve, you know, as
there is provision made for all paupers.
Miss Bruce knew that well enough; but her
pride and interest made it important that Mrs. L.
should be supported at her house by the ladies, as
she was thereby a gainer in money, as well as the
credit of benevolence, in keeping the poor
unfortunate
stranger. So she determined to make an effort
to interest Mrs. Merton still further in behalf of
the sufferer.
Poor soul! her heart will break if she is sent to
the alms-house; for the other day, when I named
there was a place where the poor and strangers
were sent and taken care of, she shrieked, and said
she would rather die in the street than go there.
And when I urged her to tell the reason of her
horror of the place, she said she had lately
dreamed
,
three several times, of being in a large
building
,
which they told her was a hospital; and that a
lady, who resembled Mrs. Morton, came and took
her babe away from her, and she thought she was
never to have it again. And she is so superstitious
as to believe in dreams; indeed, she is just like a
child herself; and how can she be otherwisepoor
thing, only seventeen. And, she says herself, she
has never done any thing, and does not understand
any thing, only to play a little on the harp and
work embroidery. I am really afraid she will die
if she has to leave my house, for I have always been
kind to her, and she feels quite at home with me.
It seems unchristian to turn her away, yet I do
not see how I can support her wholly at my own
expense. There is her babe, too; and she cannot
part with thatit would break her heart, for she
loves her child as well as a rich mother would.
She must keep her child; and if I was only rich,
she should keep it.
Mrs. Merton was rich; she professed to be a
Christian; she had been a mother, and the appeal
came home to her heart. She beckoned Mrs.
Bruce to her, and putting a fifty dollar note in her
hand, said in a whisper, take care of the
unfortunate
lady, and I will pay you.
One of the most distinguishing and beautiful
features
in the Christian religion, is its sympathy
with human sufferings. It is throughout a system
of charity, which would seem to imply that such a
spirit will always, on earth, find exercise for its
benevolence; and, therefore, that a perfect
equality
of condition is never to be expected among men.
Nor, unless human nature could be differently
modified
,
is it probable such equality (if practicable)
would make the world better or happier. The
purest virtues and the noblest powers of mind are
called into exercise by causes and emergencies
which could not occur were there none poor, or
weak, or dependent among mankind. Certain it
is that, till the perfection of the social system
shall make all evil but a name, the world must
prize highly those charities that alleviate misery,
even though they may not all be performed from
the single motive of doing good to others. We
must not expect people will be wholly
disinterested
.
The individual who does a kind action, has
a right to expect, at least, such a recompense as the
approbation of his own conscience will bestow,
and this he cannot enjoy unless his generosity has
been judiciously exerted. The charities thus
performed
are twice blestthey bind the rich and
poor in fellowship: the poor is saved from despair,
for he knows, should his own exertions fail, he
has a resource in the compassion of his brother:
the rich is prevented from glorying in the wealth
of which he feels he is but the steward. And this
divine philosophy of doing good, and being
content
,
is taught by Christianity.
If those who profess to obey its laws only acted
Q
consistently with such professions, a Christian
would soon be the highest style of man. The
fault is not in the system, but in its followers, that
there is any cavil respecting the beneficial
influence
of Christianity in the character of men. The
religion of the Bible is so truly republican in its
spirit, that our people should prize its truths as the
basis of their happy government. Christianity
does not, it is true, enjoin a perfect equality in
temporal wealth, but it enforces the charity which
provides for the wants of all; it represses pride,
exalts the humble, and opens the gates of heaven
to the poor as widely as to the rich.
These truths Mrs. Merton felt as she walked
homeward; and they silenced all boastings. I
shall carry none of my wealth to the narrow house,
said she. This desolate young creature we have
just left, will there be as rich as I.
You are gloomy to-day, said Miss Perry.
No, not gloomy, but rational. I am thinking
of the disappointments of life; and how foolish
it is to set our affections on the world. My poor
boy! how I did build my hopes on him. I trust
my heart is not all selfish, and yet so deeply am I
affected by whatever reminds me of the
wretchedness
he may be suffering, that I never relieve a
fellow-being without something like a prayer that
my wanderer, too, may find mercy. It seems but
yesterday since he was in my arms; just such a fair
boy as Mrs. L. now calls her's. She must love
him, for he is her all; and she shall keep him with
her. I have directed Miss Bruce to take care of
them.
Miss Bruce did take care of them; but it was
in that managing style which makes profit and the
pretence of charity go hand in hand. She
reasoned
with herself, that if she informed Mrs. L. funds
were to be furnished for her support, she might
grow difficult to please; whereas, if she kept the
money in her own hands, and provided for her
lodger as if she were a dependant, no such
difficulties
would occur. And so she kept the money,
and permitted Marie to think she owed her
support
entirely to the charity of her landlady. And
the timid young creature became so fearful of
offending Miss Bruce, lest she should lose the
favour
of her only friend, that she did not complain,
though the servants frequently treated her with
neglect and indignity; and she even refrained from
eating enough to satisfy her appetite, because Miss
Bruce so often repined at the expenses of her
household. And when the gentle girl felt her
strength daily wasting, she bore her pain and
sorrows
in silence, lest, if it were known she was
indisposed, she should be sent to the hospital.
Miss Bruce had all the advantage she could desire
to practice an imposition, for Mrs. Merton was
absent; she had accompanied her husband to the
South, and thence to Washington, where they were
detained till the following February.
It was a few days after the arrival of the
Constitution
from her successful cruise in the Pacific,
where her brave commander and crew had won
such honours for their country's flag, that Mr.
Merton and his lady returned to Boston. They
found the people in the city in a tumult of
congratulations
and joy. Though the war was not in all
parts of the republic equally popular, there was not
an American heart but throbbed exultingly, when
the gallant deeds of our naval heroes were the
subject
of discussion. Mrs. Merton heard the praises
bestowed on the young officers with a feeling allied
to envy. With Lady Randolph, she might have
exclaimed
At every happy mother, I repine:
And there were moments when her excited fancy
would fashion strange visions. Might not her
Lewis be engaged in defending his country, and
striving by some noble act to wipe off the blot
from his character? And might he not be
successful
,
and finally return, covered with laurels? Sad
and subdued as was her spirit, she caught the
enthusiasm
which hailed our navy as the defence and
glory of the country, and every thing connected
with the navy became interesting to her feelings.
The United States' Marine Hospital had been for
a number of years established at Charlestown; but
so little importance had been attached to the
institution
,
that it was hardly known, except to its
immediate
officers and managers. The propensity
of the Americans, the Bostonians in particular, to
be ardent in their zeal, is proverbial; their most
inveterate foe would never accuse them of
lukewarmness
.
They are always either hot or cold;
and, in relation to the navy, the excitement was
many degrees above fever heat. Among other
plans to express the high esteem entertained
towards
the brave men who had so successfully met
the enemy, it was named, in a party of ladies, that,
if the war continued, it would be a good thing to
have an association like the
Sur de Charit
in
Paris, to visit the hospitals and attend the wounded.
The idea was particularly grateful to Mrs. Merton;
she found her most tranquil hours were those
devoted
to doing good, and, while she envied
mothers
who had worthy sons, she felt a deep
commiseration
for those who had unfortunate or
miserable
ones.
They tell me there has been about a dozen poor
fellows removed from the Constitution to the
Marine
Hospital, said she to her husbandand
Q 2
that they are nearly all of them young men. I
should like to go and see them; and perhaps we
may do something to alleviate their sufferings.
We can, at least, show that we pity their
misfortune
and honour their courage. Perhaps they all
have mothers; and if I could, by assisting the son,
save the heart of the parent from desolation
She did not finish her remarks; but her husband
knew all that was in her mind, and he consented to
go. They found several of the sailors suffering
under terrible wounds, but their courage bore them
stiffly uptheir exulting boasts of the actions
they had fought, and their eulogies on
Old Iron
Sides
, as their attendants said, were the chief
subjects
of conversation, and that they hardly made a
complaint of the pain of their wounds; it was only
the confinement from duty that they cared for.
Mrs. Merton was conversing with the attending
physician, as she slowly traversed the gallery to
visit the room of the last invalid, when the doctor
remarked that the patient she was about to see was
dying with the consumption, brought on by
intemperance
.
Whether the word awoke associations
connected with her own son in her mind, or
whether
the instinct of the mother's heart whispered
that it was he, we cannot know. Nature speaks
often in a mysterious manner; it spoke to her, for,
in the sunken, wasted, cadaverous, death-struck
features before her, there was no likeness to the
handsome and almost haughty countenance, in
young manhood's first glow, which she had
engraven
on her memory as the image of her child.
Mr. Merton stood near the pallet, and was gazing
compassionately on the poor wretch; he did not
recognize his sonbut the moment the eyes of
Mrs. Merton met those of the invalid, she sent
forth a shriek that thrilled through the nerves of
all around, and rushing to the bed, she sunk on her
knees, murmuring, Lewis, dear Lewis, my son.
My mother, he pronounced with difficulty,
hiccoughing as he spoke.
You forgive me then all the sorrow I have
caused you, my parents, said the poor dying man,
after he had taken a restorative. There is
another
I would ask to forgive me. I have sinned
deeply. I have betrayed innocence that trusted
meI have abandoned my wife!
Your wife! Lewis?
Yes; I stole a beautiful girl from her guardian,
and married her against his consent, by which she
forfeited her fortune. I soon grew tired of the
restraint her presence imposedI cared for nobody
but myself; and I contrived a plausible story to
persuade her to allow me to sail for Boston and
obtain the forgiveness of my parents for my hasty
marriage, before she should arrive. I had no
intention
of going to Boston. I would not subject
myself to any fear of restraint or advice in the
career I was pursuing. I sailed for South America
but I sent a package, which, if my wife did
proceed
to Boston, would convince her I was dead.
And what did you think would become of
her?
I did not think about it, nor care much. She
promised not to reveal the marriage without my
consent, and she only knew me by the name of
Lewis. I hoped the charitable people would
provide
for her; and if I was suspected of being the
man she called her husband, her story would only
confirm what I wished my friends to believethat
I was dead.
Why should you wish to torture us with that
fear?
Mother, said the dying young man
mother
,
I would spare your feelingsperhaps I only
am to blame. But since I have been confined by
this sickness, and have been debarred from
intemperance
,
I have reflected much on the causes that
ruined me. And I felt that if you had not
indulged
my appetites so completely in my
childhood
,
I should never have been so selfishly
abandoned
.
And if my father had not checked me so
sternly, when I only obeyed the impulses he had
given to my inclinations, I should not have left
you. I was angry with you, my parents, for I felt
as though I had been unjustly treated. You had
made me what I was, and then you blamed me for
my conduct. I know you did all for my good, but
it was evil to me. Forgive me the griefs I have
caused you, as I forgive you for the temptations to
which you exposed me.
And may God forgive us all, said the
weeping
motherbut, Lewis, what was your wife's
name?
MarieMarie de Longueville.
Mrs. L. was immediately sent for; she came,
exhausted and pale, but quite calm. Why attempt
to describe the scene? The death of Lewisthe
death-like swoon of his injured wifethe deep
grief of the mourning parents!yet there was a
consolation to his mother, she had seen her Lewis,
and she held in her arms his son. The infant she
considered her own, and it was soon to be wholly
consigned to her care. The poor Marie died the
next day.
Mrs. Merton (the name is fictitious) would not
like to be recognized; but she wishes to impress on
the minds of the ladies, for whom my work is
especially designed, two maxims: the first is, never
to pamper the appetites of your child, nor, by your
example, give the habits of the young a tendency
to evil; the second, always obey, as far as possible,
the impulse of charity, when it pleads in behalf of
suffering infancy. By neglecting the first, Mrs.
Merton lost her son; by observing the second, she
has gained her grandson, the youth who is now the
comfort and support of her declining years, and
who bids fair to be an honour to his country.
THE ROMANCE OF TRAVELLING.
We
must travel, if we would be in the fashion.
Men, women, and even children, are abroad to see
the wonders of the grand canal, and the grander
cataract. There is nothing like variety and change,
for enlarging the mind, and furnishing subjects for
conversation. Who can improve at home, where
the same faces are seen, the same voices heard, and
the same employments pursued, day after day, and
year after year?
It seems, too, as if circumstances had almost
inevitably
designed us as a nation of travellers. We
should be acquainted with our own country and
people. It is only by such means, that errors will
be corrected, prejudices removed, and that good
feeling and liberality of sentiment cultivated, which
are indispensable to the perpetuity of the Union.
What American does not wish it were in his
power to examine his whole country? But to
accomplish
this, he must wend farther than ever did
knight of chivalry in service of his mistress.
It may be doubted, however, whether the
indulgence
of this passion for sight-seeing, is really
conducive to happiness or mental improvement.
Content is not found in the bustle of a stage-coach;
nor does the power of steam, though hurrying on
the progress of the car or boat, have any influence
to quicken the faculties of the mind. The rapidity
with which travelling is now conducted, prevents
the tourist, unless extremely active and inquisitive,
from gaining much information, except what may
be called the technicalities of journeying,such as
the best routes to be pursued; the expenses; the
fatigues and the privations. He gains little
knowledge
of the country beyond what he sees from the
path he is traversing, or of the people, except it be
the inn-keepers, which he might not have
obtained
at home, in much less time and with less
exertion
than his excursion has cost him. But then he
has seen the world, and that he thinks adds to his
consequence in the opinion of those poor wights,
whom untoward circumstances detain within the
vulgar precincts of their own state.
It must, however, be confessed there is, as yet,
but little in our country to attract the sentimental
traveller, or make any one, except a naturalist or a
philosopher, linger on his way. The former would
find an exhaustless source of speculation and
amusement
in the examination of our new world, still so
rich in its first created beauty; and the latter would
R
rejoice to delay his steps to witness the exhibitions
of human comfort on every side, and to seek the
causes of those rapid improvements he sees, as it
were, developing themselves around him. But he
who goes abroad to awaken remembrances, or with
the hope of feeling those strong emotions which
are excited, when
Full flashes on the soul the light of ages,
may range from St. Croix to the Sabine, from the
Connecticut to the Columbia, and with some truth
cry that all is barren. Barren, but not in
historic
or traditional recollections. Though the
grand events which have occurred in America are
few, yet they are of such a peculiar character, and
in their consequences appear likely to be so
stupendous
,
that they stamp themselves on the heart, the
mind, with a strong and stirring moral interest,
which is, with the exception of the events
recorded
in sacred history, not exceeded by any
memorials
of the old world. The barrenness, the
vacancy
,
painfully felt by the traveller of taste and
sentiment, arises from the want of intellectual and
poetic associations with the scenery he beholds.
Genius has not consecrated our mountains, making
them high places from which the mind may see
the horizon of thought widening and expanding
around, over past ages,they are nothing but huge
piles of earth and rocks, covered with blighted firs
and fern; the song has not named our streams
they are only celebrated for affording fine fish,
good mill-seats or safe navigation. No fairies nor
lovers have made our valleys their places of resort;
neither green rings or flowery arbours have been
allotted to the one or the other; but fertile meadows
and fair fields are famed for affording the
cultivator
very profitable crops. It is therefore that,
though reason sees and acknowledges the abundance
afforded by our soil, yet fancy calls it barren; and
European travellers, accustomed to a land where
every place and object has its real or romantic
legend, would pronounce a tour of the United
States insufferably dull, and its inhabitants destitute
of taste.
And we are ourselves sensible of this lack of
sentimental interest, of heart-stirring recollections,
when viewing the wild and beautiful scenery of
our country. True it is, that in this working-day
world of ours, where every thing is intended to be
graduated to the standard of common sense and
equal rights, it would be very difficult, even for the
imagination of genius, to give to airy nothing a
local habitation and a name.
But still we have reason to believe that such
attempts
will be approved. Illustrations of
American
character, scenery and history, are demanded
by the public; and who does not feel, that to fix
a trait which shall be recognized as genuine, or a
record that shall make one solitary place
remembered
,
will be a reward for the effort? We want
the light of song poured over our wide land, and
its lonely and waste places peopled with the
affections. We want writers who can throw
enchantment
around rural seenes and rural life, and,
like Burns,
Gar our streams and burnies shine,
Up wi' the best!
Great events or wondrous things are not
necessary
to furnish themes for genius. A yellow
cowslip
,
or a mountain daisy, will be sufficient to
waken the feelings, when hymned by the hand of
a master. Marathon is not more the object of
curiosity to the traveller of intelligence and taste
than Lake Leman.
For the lore
Of mighty minds, doth hallow in the core
Of human hearts the ruin of a wall.
And who among my readers would not prefer,
with the Lady of the Lake for a directory, a tour
to Ben-venue and Coilantogle ford, and
Loch-Katrine, rather than to explore the field of
Waterloo, even though De Coster were the guide?
These observations are designed as the preface
of a true story which I relate, to throw, if
possible
,
somewhat of a romantic interest over a path
which those who have journeyed from Boston to
Windsor, Vt., by the way of Concord, N. H., will
readily allow has few real beauties to attract curiosity
or reward fatigue. We will pass the first eighty
miles, or thereabouts, without remark, as the
traveller
probably would, except that the characteristics
of the country were truly New Englanda rough
but sterile soil, rendered interesting chiefly by those
indications of persevering industry which
unequivocally
show that man has there obtained his allotted
dominion over the earth.
To a reflecting mind no sight is more gratifying.
There are grander exhibitions of human skill. A
ship under sail is one of these. We gaze on the
vessel, walking the waters, like a thing of life,
with curiosity, wonder, awe, and we are proud of
the power of man. We look on a fine and highly
cultivated landscape with a calm, contented,
approving
admiration, and we rejoice in his
happiness
.
Storms and danger are connected in idea
with the vessel; sunshine and security seem to
rest on the landscape.
There is around a snug country-seat, where the
neat white house looks forth from amid a group of
trees and shrubbery, like a lady in her best; and
the two barns, like buxom damsels in their
working-day
R 2
colour, keep modestly back; and the
full-leaved
,
and fruit-covered orchard, comes sweeping
down from the southern side of a green hill, while
the walled fields are rich with the growing harvest,
and cattle are in the pastures that stretch away to
the mountains, from which the rills descend that
swell the stream, sparkling in the valley. There is
around such a residence an air of honest
contentment
,
of plenty and independence, that always
makes me glad. New England has not a rich soil,
but its natural scenery is bold, variegated and
beautiful; and where it is cultivated with a careful
industry, directed by good taste, no part of our
wide republic presents more charming landscapes.
But the improvement (or beautifying rather) of the
country, is slow. Our young men are eager to be
rich and great. They despise the pursuit of their
fathersagriculture. They crowd our colleges
and cities, and struggle to enter the learned
professions
,
or become merchants or book-makers,
imagining they shall then be gentlemen.
There will be, ere the republic continues another
half century, a revolution in public sentiment
respecting
agriculture. If the people remain
sovereigns
of this fair country, they will not see the
occupation, in which much the largest number of
individuals are and must be engaged, degraded.
Nothing is now requisite to make the station of the
agriculturalist as honourable as it is useful and
independent
,
but that those who engage in it should
possess intelligence. Only let our farmers educate
themselves as they might do, and they would be
inferior to no class in society. The country ladies
must endeavour to promote that refinement of
feeling
and taste, which have such an influence in
awakening the mind to exercise its powers. Young
men of talents and education would then more
willingly engage in a pursuit which is sure to give
a competency to the industrious, and still leave
them more leisure for mental improvement, than
any other business that is not necessarily
connected
with study.
But unless a young man is a thorough-going
and determined geologist, so as actually to love
the faces of stones, I would not advise him to
establish himself any where on the route from
Hopkinton
to Newport, N. H. It is a fine situation to
study the character of the primary rocks, for the
country looks as if a hail-storm of granite had been
discharged thereon. There they lie, and probably
have lain thousands of years, masses of
moss-covered
rocks and a multitude of stones, encumbering
and nearly concealing the earth; and what is their
use? is probably the first inquiry arising in the
minds of nearly every person who views them.
All that was created was pronounced
good
so we
know the sterile as well as the fertile places have
their appropriate advantages, and where granite
rocks abound, there the traveller may always
expect
to find good water and good air; and where
sufficient industry has been exerted, a good road.
And the last, when passing through a country
where nothing invites us to linger, is no small
advantage
.
But Nature always exhibits some lovely
scene, even in her rudest mood; such an one occurs
unexpectedly, and therefore more welcome, on this
road, when Lake Sunapee opens abruptly on the
sight. The placid beauty of the blue waters,
contrasted
with the uncivilized scenery on which the
eye has been resting, gives to the heart a sensation
like that of suddenly meeting the smiling face of a
friend, while making our way through a crowd of
strangers.
Why is it that water, so monotonous in its
characteristics
,
should nevertheless possess a charm
for every mind? I believe it is chiefly because it
bears the impress of the Creator, which we feel
neither the power of time or of man can efface or
alter.
Such as creation's dawn beheld,
water
, thou rollest now.
Some one has called flowers the poetry of earth.
They are only its lyrical poetry. Water is the
grand epic of creation; and there is not a human
soul but feels the influence of its majesty, its power,
or its beauty. Sunapee lake has the latter quality
in a softened perfection, which, in some respects,
hardly appears like the work of nature. Its shore,
especially on the eastern side, is low and level,
and defined, as far as the eye can reach, by a line
of white sand, so uniform and unbroken, as to
appear
like a regular embankment to an artificial basin.
There the water lies, calm as sleeping infancy,
apparently
so near the
brim
, that a shower might
make it overflow. The country on the east rises
gradually, exhibiting cultivated fields, that look
soft and fair (partly from the distance which
clothes them in colours of air), when compared
with the rude scenery through which the road,
having the lake on the east and Sunapee mountain
on the west, winds for several miles.
Should a geologist, of the Huttonian theory,
enter the narrow path, his imagination would
probably
travel back to the era of that awful
convulsion
,
when, by the action of subterranean fires, the
huge mountain, preceded by a shower of rocks and
stones, which cover that region, was upheaved,
leaving a granite basin for the reception of the cool
waters which should there gather together.
The interest of the scene rests chiefly on the
majestic
mountain and the placid lake; yet here and
there may be seen verdant knolls, shaded by a few
tall trees, or little quiet dells, which might tempt
the sentimentalist to wish for a cottage (that
perfection
of romantic comfort), and one fair spirit,
and then dream how sweetly life would pass away
on the shore of the quiet lake.
We have not many such dreamers in our
bustling
country. Profit, not peace, is the object of
pursuit with us republicans. And the turmoil of
the cataract, rather than the tranquillity of the lake,
would be in unison with the spirit of American
travellers.
There is a remembrance connected with the lake
which may interest our stirring tourists, and
admonish
those (if there are any such) who are really
in quest of a spot where they may hope to dwell
in safety and retirement, that peace is not of this
world. The borders of Sunapee offer retirement
in perfection; but for safety, before deciding on
that, lookno, you cannot see from the coachbut
alight and search till you find, what seems an
impenetrable
wilderness of stumps, fallen and decayed
trees, broken rocks and tall brambles; were not
these intermingled, here and there, with an apple
tree, which in our climate always denotes the agency
of man, we might think no human footstep, except
perhaps the hunter's, had ever penetrated that
desolate
looking place. Yet there was once a
habitation
in that valley. Peter Wood's house stood
where those large stones and (if you search
closely
you may find a few) those broken bricks lie.
Mr. Wood had built his house in that valley to
screen it from the bleak winds, that during winter
sweep across the frozen lake; but, by ascending the
swell of land, about twenty rods distant, he
commanded
a fine view of the water and the eastern
shore, and had that desideratum of society for a
New England farmerneighbours within sight.
Though separated by the lake, they seemed near,
when he could see their dwellings. And truly,
his eye rested much oftener, and with more
satisfaction
,
on those plain farm-houses, than on the
wild wonders of the land, or the softening aspect
of the water; thus proving, that neither the taste
for natural scenery, or the love of solitude, had
been the cause of his selecting that particular spot
for his residence. In truth, it was neither; but a
taste for fishing and the love of fine trout, for
which the lake is famed. I state this with more
pride, since the recent opinion of a refined British
traveller has pronounced a voyage across the
Atlantic
to be well repaid by a breakfast on our shad.
The ability fully to appreciate good fish is, we see,
a mark of having been accustomed to good
society. I presume, therefore, none of my
fashionable readers will consider Peter Wood
otherwise than as a gentleman. Certain I am,
many gentlemen would have enjoyed extremely
an acquaintance with him and a sail in his boat,
when he went forth to fish, with a determination
not to return without some good luck. His
perfect
familiarity with the science of angling was
really wonderful, considering he had never heard
of Izaak Walton;but then he was an original
thinker, and such do not need to have recourse to
the rules of others; they are a law unto themselves.
I have said Peter Wood liked to angle; it was
his passion, and he never felt more dignified than
when he returned home with a fine mess of trout.
But his triumph would have been incomplete, had
none but himself known his success. Man was
most certainly created a social being, and it is
necessary
to the enjoyment of prosperity, that there
should be participants. We do not need a crowd to
make us happy; but friends, or
one
at least
one
must smile, or the sensations will lose their
perception
,
the heart its gladness, and the mind its energy.
Peter Wood had one frienda wife whom he
loved, and who was worthy of his affection; and that
is saying all that is requisite in her praise. I never
think it necessary to describe elaborately the
charms and graces of a married woman, if I can
say her husband loves her.
Well, Peter loved his wife and his infant child;
and when he could prevail on Betsey to take the
baby and accompany him to a fishing-place, which
was but a little way from their dwelling up the
lake, he was happier, I dare say, than ever
Bonaparte
was with Josephine by his side; for they had
no child. And when Peter had a good haul, how
delighted he was to hold up the fish for his wife
to view; and sometimes he would advance the
struggling victim close to his little girl; and then
both parents would smile at her fright, with as
much secret pleasure as did Hector and
Andromache
,
when their boy was scared with the
dazzling
plume and nodding crest. O, happiness is
made up of triflesit is only the heart that invests
them with importance.
One Sabbath afternoon, in the month of
September
,
18, Peter Wood and his wife took a walk
along the margin of the lake. They had, as usual,
their little girl with them; the father thinking, that
to walk without her in his arms was really loss
of time. There is hardly a more heart-thrilling
pleasure enjoyed by mortals, than that which
parents
feel when seeing their child first begin to
catch knowledge of objects. Byron, in his
allusion to that bliss, of which he had been
deprived
,
shows how fully he had sounded the depths
of human feeling. Mary Wood was only eleven
months old; but, from the circumstance of having
been often abroad, as well as from that innate love
8
of freedom in the open air, which every living
earthly creature seems to covet, she was in
ecstacies
with the excursion, and, her father thought,
understood all that was said to her on the occasion.
And he afterwards observed, that the little
creature
then appeared to know so much, he felt
fearful
she was not long for this world.
The day was calm as sleep; not a cloud had been
visible, and the thin white vapour, that was like
melted light over all the horizon, seemed but the
air resting in equilibrium;not a breath moved
the water or stirred a leaf. The stillness was so
deep as almost to be melancholy; as if Nature had
sunk to a repose from which she could hardly be
awakened.
Our husband and wife sat down beneath the
shade of a large fir-tree, and passed the time chiefly
in amusing their child. They loved the scene
around them, and yet it could hardly be said they
relished or understood its peculiar beauties.
Certain
it is, they had never analyzed the sources of
the satisfaction with which they gazed on the
bright smooth waters, as contrasted with the broken
and brown landscape beyond. Neither did they
notice the adorning which the dark evergreen
forest received, from being here and there
interspersed
with trees of a less sombre hue, particularly
the white birch; thus showing how much of beauty
is owing to situation and contrast. There is hardly
a more ugly native tree in our country, when
standing singly and alone, than the white birch.
Its thin, leper-like looking trunk, and scanty dingy
green foliage, which early in autumn assumes a
dirty yellow colour, cause it to be altogether
disagreeable
to the eye; and then the thought of the
detestable fuel it makesyou may about as
comfortably
burn snowsends a shivering disgust
through the frame, very similar to what we feel
on viewing an ugly reptile. But place that same
birch amid a forest of firs, where we can just see
its tall trunk, like a sunbeam, flashing through the
dark foliage, while its leaves blend their softening
tints above, and we call it a graceful tree, an
ornament to the woods. So it is. And so there
is an appropriate place for every thing and
every person, a niche where all would appear to
advantage. But all do not feel so contented to be
happy there, as did honest Peter Wood and his
wife. They, good souls, never dreamed but what
the landscape appeared to others precisely as it did
to them. With the lake came the thought of
water and fishing; with the forest, of fuel and
hunting; and with that lofty mountain, rivalling
Ben Lomond or the Grampian hills in majesty,
was connected the idea of gathering
whortleberries
.
And over all was the charm of familiarity
of homethat made it lovely.
Where ignorance is bliss, it really does seem
folly to be wise. Who that has a heart would
have wished to awaken Peter and his wife to the
full consciousness of all the horrors which a
cultivated
and refined person would have felt in their
situation? To live on with no object in view but
just to procure enough to eat and drink, and live too
in a place where the only advantage possessed was,
that they dwelt in safety. This advantage they
seemed to enjoy in perfection; for, unless the
mountain toppled down headlong, what could occur
to disturb them there in a place, bidding defiance,
apparently, to that spirit of improvement, which
works such astonishing changes in our land, and
in whose train follow ambition, envy, covetousness,
luxury, as surely as wealth, knowledge and taste.
But the storm was at handthough not of
human
passion.
It grows dark as nightis it sundown,
Betsey
?
said Peter, suddenly rising up.
She could not tellbut both felt that the
darkness
or deep shadow increased with uncommon
rapidity. They hurried along the shore to the
path that led to their dwellingPeter carrying the
child, which had fallen asleep, carefully, for fear of
awakening her, and his wife preceding him about
ten steps. There was no wind felt, not a breath,
and the water lay motionless; but, though calm, it
was awful in its tranquillity; for, an inky hue
was deepening and settling on its surface, and it
looked, when a flash of lightning gleamed over it,
and the flashes became frequent, more like black
marble than water. And several times Peter,
who was less agitated than his wife, thought he
heard a low, deep sound, like a groan, that seemed
to come from the recesses of the lake. When Mrs.
Wood reached, through the narrow-wooded track,
the top of the eminence that rose, as has been
named, east of their dwelling, she stopped, and
raised her hands high above her head, as if wildly
frightened.
What is the matter? called out her husband.
But she did not reply; and when he reached
the top, he did not need to repeat his question.
Though a strong man, his knees trembled under
him. What mortal would not tremble at the sight
of the whirlwind approaching, as it were, in an
embodied form? Nothing could be more terrible.
The cloud that seemed moving towards them, with
winged rapidity, was of a singular appearance; as
it were, a thick sheet of darkness, black as a pall
the edges of which were tinged with a brassy
hue; and in the midst was an appearance, in shape
S 2
like an inverted pyramid, whirling like the vortex
of an eddying gulf, and sending out incessant
and vivid flashes of lightning, which only
prevented
the horizon in the north and east from being
dark as midnight.
There are no appearances or events in the
natural
world which men feel are so certainly
connected
with Almighty power, as signs in the air. The
heavens shall be rolled together as a scroll,
thought Peter; for he had read his Bible (almost
the only book he did read), and he trembled, lest
the end of the world was at hand. But deep must
be the sin, suffering and despair, of that man, who
does not feel a sense of safety connected with the
idea of home.
Home!let us go home,said Peter Wood.
His wife started at the word, and they rushed
towards the house as to a refuge. They reached it,
and at the entrance Peter laid his little girl, still
sleeping, into her mother's arms, in order to secure
the doors and windows, as far as he could, to resist
the fury of the coming storm. As yet, no gust,
nor even a breeze, had been felt; the tempest,
wrapped in the wings of the cloud, came on in
silence; the moving darkness only giving warning
that it was approaching.
Mrs. Wood, agitated and exhausted as she was,
could hardly sustain the weight of the infant; and
she carried her to a bed, thinking the little
creature
would sleep easier there than in her arms.
The mother laid down her child, covering her with
care: and stooped, with the mother's blessing in
her heart, to kiss the forehead of her darling. As
her lips touched the soft face of her babeshe felt
a rush, a crash that shook the building to its
foundation
and
then seemed to gather up, crumbling,
tossing, whirling, scattering all like atoms in its
furytrees, rocks, timber, furniture, were
mingled
,
and driven, and dashed against each other, in
the vortex of the cloud, that rose and descended
alternately; when rising, it discharged from its
centre a shower of shivered limbs of trees, leaves,
gravel, and other spoils of its ravage; then sinking,
it again swept up, as in revenge, all that lay in its
path, tossing the huge rocks, as though they had
been marbles, heaving up the foundations of
buildings
,
breaking down, splintering, overturning acres
and acres of the forest that lay in its desolating
course. There was no thunder accompanied it
no sound but the crash of the destroying, till the
tornado entered the lake; and then the tremendous
conflict of the wind and water might be known by
the hollow roaring that was sent forth. The winds
triumphedthe waters, boiling and foaming, were
forced upward in the cloud, till the column seemed
to touch the skylaying bare the banks of the
lake, as though the secrets of the hidden springs
were about to be revealed!
I have not time to follow the track of the
tornado
after it had passed the lake. A volume might
be filled with the awful descriptionand the
sufferings
of those who were the victims of its fury,
on the western shore; but I must return to that
solitary family, who bore the first bursting of the
storm.
Neither Peter Wood or his wife were injured;
though how they escaped was wonderful. They
were both lifted up by the power of the wind, and
carried across a field and over fences, amidst the
driving and dashing fragments of ruin contained in
the cloud; yet they came to the earth without
wound. But their Mary, their sweet babe
where was she? The gown of the tender sufferer
was found on the borders of the lake, close by the
spot where she had been playing during the
afternoon
the
bedstead on which she lay was found
nearly a mile distant in the woods, in an opposite
direction from the general track of the wind. But
her body was never found. Whether her little
form was reduced to atoms by the grinding storm,
or thrown by the wind into the lake, or carried
into the wilderness, is a secret the last trumpet
only can reveal.
The parents looked on the destruction of their
dwelling with indifference, when compared with
the desolation their hearts felt in the loss of that
child. They were surrounded with ruin. A few
stones marked the site of their late residence; a
broken chair, a bureau without drawers, and a few
articles of hollow ware, was all that remained of
their property.
Reader, should you ever sail down the Ohio
you may, if you please, see a small yankee-looking
house, in a retired nook, a little way from the
margin of the river. And then, if you see in a
boat, not far from the shore, a square-built,
spare-boned
,
black-bearded man, angling with that deep
abstractedness which proves the devotee in his art,
that man is the original of Peter Wood. Should
you address him by that name, he might not
answer
to the cognomenbut what's in a name? He
will confirm the truth of my story, except, perhaps,
in some trifling particulars respecting himself and
wife. And he will describe the tempest as more
terrific than I have done. He will tell you that
his infant was swept away; and that he never could
endure the thought of again casting a line into the
water where she might be slumbering; that he could
not bear to eat the fish of the lake, for fear they
might have been fattening on the flesh of his child
and so he removed to the Ohio.
THE THANKSGIVING OF THE HEART.
The heart gives life its beauty,
Its glory and its power;
'Tis sunlight to its rippling stream,
And soft dew to its flower.
Our
good ancestors were wise, even in their
mirth. We have a standing proof of this in the
season they chose for the celebration of our annual
festival, the Thanksgiving. The funeral-faced month
of November is thus made to wear a garland of joy,
and instead of associating the days of fog, like our
English relations, with sadness and suicide, we
hail them as the era of gladness and good living.
There is a deep moral influence in these
periodical
seasons of rejoicing, in which a whole
community
participate. They bring out, and together, as
it were, the best sympathies of our nature. The
rich contemplate the enjoyments of the poor with
complacency, and the poor regard the
entertainments
of the rich without envy, because
all
are
privileged to be happy in their own way. Yet
enjoyment
does not always imply happiness. There
is a disposition of mind which cannot, by any
single
word in our language, be expressed.
Philanthropy
will best signify it; yet its influence is so
different, as displayed in different situations, that it
is called, alternately, contentment, charity,
resignation
,
fortitude and love. These are all but
modifications
of the desire to diffuse happinessa spirit
that leads us to rejoice with the joyful, to cheer the
unfortunate, and always to look on the sunny side
of our path, gathering flowers where the repining
(usually the selfish) would see only thorns and
gravel.
It takes but little to make one happy when the
heart is right: but a repining disposition never yet
enjoyed a Thanksgiving. There is always some
accident
or occurrence that mars the festival. The
turkey is over-roasted, or the sermon has been too
long; or, perchance, the ball-dress of a young lady
has not been sent home; or the hair-dresser has
failed in finishing the beau;many are made
wretched by trifles light as these. But the heart
is not in such troubles. It is sheer selfishness that
makes the grief and vexations of which two-thirds
of the world complain. It is chagrin, not sorrow,
people feel; and they endure it, because they will
not cultivate the disposition to be happy. I always
consider good examples much more beneficial than
wise precepts; and the example of Margaret Lowe
was full of instruction to her sex, in that kind of
excellence which was the object of the heathen
philosophy, and is now of the Christian religion,
namely, the excellence of being happy.
Margaret was one of those favoured persons
whose wealth of hope had seemed inexhaustible.
Hume remarks that this temper is more to be
coveted
than an income of ten thousand a-year; and
certain it is, that many possessed of that sum are
not so happy as was Mrs. Lowe, when deprived of
all but
hope
. The father of Margaret was once a
rich man, but in consequence of becoming surety
for a friend he was stripped of all his property, and
thrown into jail, where he died.
What a reward to the benevolence that prompted
him to assist his friend, and which did, in fact, give
thousands to the very men that oppressed him!
There is a defect in our free institutions, or the
rights of the individual would not thus be trampled,
and his feelings, and those of common humanity,
outraged. Margaret then learned a lesson of
resignation
she never forgot. It was from her
mother
.
When a mother's example and precepts
exactly
coincide, what a powerful effect they have on
her child!
Your father is dead, Margaret, she said, and
he died in prisonbut not in disgrace. The
misfortunes
that befal us in our attempts to do good,
should never be regarded as troubles to repine at
or regret: they are only sorrows, and then we
should always study to be resigned. Had your
father wronged his friend, or been guilty of a
dishonourable
action, we might with propriety have
indulged in mourning and despair. But such
gloomy feelings ought only to be cherished by the
guilty; and we will thank God that your father
was kept from the temptation to evilthat he died
innocent.
The mother and daughter knelt down together,
and the prayer they breathed was not
all
complaint
.
Margaret was handsome and portionless.
It is best for you, my dear, to be without a
fortune, said her mother. You will not now be
addressed by any man who does not really believe
you will make him a good wife. It will be in your
power to fulfil such an expectation; whereas, had
you wealth, your husband might expect more
happiness
from that than he would ever have enjoyed.
Riches are always over estimated; the enjoyment
they give is more in the pursuit than the
possession
.
It was by such instructions, always given in a
kind tone, and with a cheerful countenance, that
the mind of Margaret was developed; and when
she gave her hand to Thomas Lowe, a fine young
man in the employment of a company of merchants
trading to South America and the East Indies, she
T
was possessed of every requisite to be beloved as a
bride, and better still, of the qualities which secure
esteem for the wife.
Mr. Lowe was not rich, but he was of a good
family, and had enough to begin the world with all
the eclat necessary to entitle him to a place in
select
society; and for a few years Margaret not only
mingled in the first circles, but in accordance with
her husband's taste, which, it must be confessed,
was rather too much addicted to show, she was a
star in the galaxy of fashion. He was unwise in
this, but then he was not selfish in his extravagance.
He thought his wife would be happier to be thus
distinguished; and she did enjoy it, but it was only
because it appeared to gratify him; and when he
was about taking his last voyage, which he
expected
would detain him eighteen months, she
begged to retire to the village of Dorchester, where
she and her mother had resided, and pass the time
of his absence in quiet. He accordingly took a
pleasant cottage, and left her in the possession of
every elegance money could command. But he
did not calculate for contingencies; he did not
expect
his voyage would prove unfortunate. How
few that are in health, and rich in hope, do arrange
either their estates or their minds to meet calamity!
Margaret's mind was, in some measure,
prepared
;
and well for her that it was; for before the
eighteen months had expired, news came that the
vessel in which her husband sailed had been
wrecked and lost, and many of the crew had
perished
.
Her husband, however, she learned, had escaped;
but nothing further concerning him. Another year
passed, and Margaret had exhausted the funds her
husband had provided for her support; though
these had been, for the last few months, very
prudently
managed. She had three childrenthe
youngest born after her husband's departure. How
was she to be supportedherself and three
children
?
Her mother was deadshe had no
relations
.
The subject was the talk and wonder of her
fashionable acquaintance; for she was a delicate
woman, and her husband had always been tender
of her, as though she were the apple of his eye.
True, he had not been exactly economical, had not
studied thrift, but he had studied her gratification;
and did his kindness and generosity deserve to be
repaid by the treachery of affection she would have
manifested, had she made no effort to prevent
sinking
to that state of dependence which must have
been so painfully felt by him when he returned?
Margaret had a true woman's heart; willing,
indeed
proud, to depend on the man she loved, and
who had vowed to protect her; and she had also a
delicacy (or pride) in her affection for him, which
would not permit her to complain, or to solicit
assistance
from others, lest some implication of bad
management, or neglect of his family, might be cast
upon her husband. The dignity and decision of
her character were now unfolded, and the resources
within her own power of performance exerted;
and she was never so self-satisfied, never happier,
even when in the height of prosperity and fashion,
than now, when she plied her needle for hours
after
every light in the neighbourhood was out: and
then lay softly down beside her sleeping children,
confident that she had earned enough that day to
buy them food for the morrow. Her two eldest
boys were of an age to comprehend her when she
talked to them of their father. They soon caught
her enthusiasm; and to have every thing nice and
in order when their father returned, for she
confidently
expected his return, stimulated them to do
a thousand things they would otherwise have
thought a task. And then at school, how diligently
they studied, because they studied with all their
hearts.
If you learn your lesson well, my love, you
shall say it to your father when he comes home,
was, from their mother's lips, sufficient to arouse
either of them, whenever they seemed yielding to
that mental indolence which at times will nearly
overcome the energies of the most intelligent
children
.
And then, instead of playing, they worked
every spare hour in their little garden, planting
seeds and flower-roots, and watering them with as
much zeal in the rain as the sunshine, that they
might grow the faster, and blow by the time their
father came home.
They expected him so confidently in the
beginning
of summer, that not a rose was allowed to be
plucked from the large bush which grew near the
door, and which they wanted he should see in full
bloom. Even the baby knew that bush was kept
for papaand would point with his little hand to
the garden, when asking for a flower. These
trifling
incidents had a sweet and comforting effect on
Margaret's mind. They confirmed her more and
more in the resolution to support her children till
their father came home; and she felt the enjoyment
of their innocent society, their sympathy, was a
pleasure for which the world could offer her no
substitute. Happiness is, in truth, a very cheap
thing, when the heart will be contented to traffic
with
natureart
has quite a different price.
But the summer passed away, the roses were
gone, and still the wanderer did not return. The
villagers began to talk seriously to Mrs. Lowe
about her children. They told her she never
could maintain them all,never could bring up
boys as they should be brought up; and that it was
T 2
her duty to place her children with those who
would take them.
Mrs. Lowe scarce ever wept, but at these
solicitations
.
When the zeal of her well-meaning, but
often injudicious friends, urged upon her their
opinion that her husband would not return very
soon, if at allthat it was impossible she could
maintain her children, and that she was wearing
herself out in the attempt, she would weep bitterly.
But the moment she was alone, her confidence and
cheerfulness returned. She felt certain thenwhen
there was no one by to damp, by a slow shake of
the head, or a sad glance of the eye (I dislike a
shake of the head the most), the ardour of her
feelings
that
Thomas would soon return; and then
how glad he would be to see how the children had
grown, and how they had improved; and that
she
had taken care of them.
It requires but a few threads of hope, for the
heart that is skilled in the secret, to weave a web
of happiness. It is true, Margaret altered the
figures of her web as often as Penelope of old, but
the latter never laboured more perseveringly to
delineate the proud achievements her husband
had performed, than did the former to persuade
herself of the excellent things her Thomas would
yet do.
But this was not to last. Early in October, news
of the death of Thomas Lowe reached the village.
Margaret was for some days incredulous; but the
source from whence the intelligence was derived,
seemed to admit little room for doubt. There was
not a person in the town at all surprised by the
news. Every one affirmed that they had for
months been confident he was dead: and they
wondered
Margaret had not foreseen and prepared for
itwondered that she should be so overcome.
They knew not what treasures of the heart, what
rich fancies had been destroyed, rent, seemingly
from her very grasp, by the blow. She had
connected
every bright vision of the future with her
husband's return; and the affection of the mother
could not immediately gather up the fragments of
her shattered hopes, and mould them anew, to
fabricate
fair destinies for her little ones. But she
did do this. And she saw her sons handsome
(but that they were in reality) and intelligent, and
respected, and rich. Truly the heart has a deep
and wonderful power. Does it not seem cruel
that stern fate should so often destroy those
illusions
which are giving happiness to virtue, and
connecting success with exertion?
Margaret had one sorrow, which she did not
dare to ponder, for she felt yet unequal to devising
means to escape it, or of summoning fortitude to
endure it. It was the thought how her children
were to be supported, for she had not anticipated
that she must always do it. From this idea she
shuddered and shrunk as from a drawn sword.
But these feelings had a salutary effect. They
brought her more and more to see how impotent
would be her own efforts; till she finally cast all
her cares on Him who is peculiarly pledged to
sustain the widow and fatherless. Her warm heart
and enthusiastic mind seemed fitted to enjoy, in
devotion, all that happiness which hope gives
when it gives us heaven. The earthI have no
disposition to rail at our planet, or undervalue its
blessingsbut the earth is a poor, barren place,
when we are, in our wishes and hopes, confined
entirely to its chances and changes for our
felicity
.
Take all the pleasures of all the spheres,
And multiply each by endless years,
One minute of heaven is worth them all!
There are few sensations more painful, than, in
the midst of deep grief, to know that the season
which we have always associated with mirth and
rejoicing
is at hand. The contrast of our former with
our present situation, is then brought home to the
heart so forcibly, so acutely, that we must mourn.
Margaret felt this depression as the day appointed
for our annual Thanksgiving approached, and it
seemed as if her eyes were a fountain of tears.
Her neighbours pitied herthey did more, they
strove to console her; and many an invitation for
her and her children to dine, and spend the day
abroad, was urged upon her. But she said she
could not goher heart was too full of sorrow to
permit her to witness happinessenjoy it she could
not; and she begged to be allowed to stay in the
solitude of her own home, where she could indulge
her feelings without dampening the mirth which
the happy and fortunate had a right to enjoy.
Her friends saw she was decided, and forbore
to urge her; but they made the festivities of the
season an excuse for sending her a variety and
abundance of good thingsindeed, nearly enough
to stock her larder for the winter. The kind and
considerate manner in which these favours were
bestowed, and their seasonableness, affected Mrs.
Lowe with a deep sense of the protecting care of
God, who had thus, as it were, touched the hearts
of all the people in her behalf. She renewed her
resolution to be resigned. She strove to conquer
the weakness of grief, to which she had for some
days been yielding; and she was so far successful,
that, on the morning of the Thanksgiving, she
appeared with a placid, almost smiling face, and
her children, who watched her countenance, and
took the tone of their feelings from her's, were as
gay as birds.
She prepared herself and her children for their
dinner with all the exactness in her power. Her
mourning habiliments made the delicacy of her
complexion appear almost transparent. There are
but few women that look well in black: Margaret
did. It seemed to remedy the only fault which
could have been found in her figurenamely,
height. She was short, but black apparel always
makes a woman look taller than she really is; and
Margaret's symmetrical form appeared to fine
advantage
in her black gown; and her round, white
neck, from beneath the folds of her crape
handkerchief
,
seemed like a sunbeam from a cloud.
Sorrow
had touched her fair cheek, but it was only
with its softening power; the blight had not yet
fallen. Margaret was pale, but not wasted
anxious
,
but not careworn; for her troubles had only
weighed heavily during the last six weeks. But
still the change in her appearance was so apparent
that many who saw her were astonished. The
sickness of the heart soon and surely displays itself
in the countenance
Nor does old age a wrinkle trace
More deeply than despair.
Was Margaret destined thus to struggle with
adversity, and fade, and wear away in her efforts
to support her children? She was beginning to
hope better things, for she was naturally inclined
to be happy. As she arrayed her little ones in
their new suits, the wearing of which make, in
most families, an indispensable part of the
privileges
of the day, and arranged their bright glossy
hair, she thought there was not three lovelier
children
in the worldnor three betterand why
should she complain? There was poor Mrs.
Horton
had an idiot child, and Mrs. Pool a deaf child,
and Mrs. Savage a blind child, and some of her
neighbours had sick children, and some had
disobedient
childrenBut mine, said she to herself,
mine are all good and healthy, and happy; and
they can learn, yes, they can learnand I will
teach them all I can, and, by-and-by, they will
begin to help themselves. O, how many
blessings
I have to be thankful for! And I
am
thankful
.
And she burst into tears.
Margaret Lowe's next neighbour was Mrs.
Savage
.
She was a kind woman (notwithstanding
her name), and, when her dinner was nearly ready,
she said to her daughter Jane
My dear, I wish you would just step over to
Mrs. Lowe's, and see if you can persuade her to
come and dine with usshe must be so lonely
there;if Mr. Cummings (he was Jane's
intended
)
would accompany you, and assist in helping
the children along, I cannot but think she would
come.
The young lady and her lover very willingly
obeyed. She pitied Mrs. Lowe from her heart,
because she was herself about to be married to a
lieutenant in the navy; and who knew but he too
might die, far, far away from his home, and leave
his wife, like Margaret, to mourn! Such thoughts
always came home to Jane's heart, when she heard
Mrs. Lowe mentioned. As for William
Cummings
,
he had been intimately acquainted with
Mr. Lowehad sailed several voyages with him,
and acknowledged one obligation from him which
he said he should never forget. What the service
was he had never told; but, as he alluded to it
during
their walk, Jane ventured to inquire.
I cannot tell you, Jane, said the young man
we were engaged in an adventure which we
promised
never to reveal without the consent of each
other. And though now the matter might safely be
told, yet, as I never had his consent, I never can
reveal it.
But he is dead, said Jane.
That does not release me from my promise,
love. I vowed never to tell it without his
consent
.
Ask his wife, then, said Jane, smiling. She
and her husband were both one, you know,if she
consents
Lieutenant Cummings was ringing at the door
of Margaret's house, and did not listen to the
conclusion
of his Jane's argument. No step was heard
approaching the door, and after a moment's pause,
Jane, being in the habit of calling often, entered
without ceremony, and, passing through the entry,
threw open the door of the small room, where
Margaret usually sat with her children.
Good heavens!her husband, cried Jane.
Ah! it is indeed Lowe! said lieutenant
Cummings
.
And so it was. And a happier group was never
seen. There was Mr. Lowe, his two eldest boys,
one on each knee, with their bright cheeks laid
close to his sunburnt face. They both
remembered
,
or thought they remembered, their father. But
the little one was more shy. He clung to his
mother's
neck, and, as Jane and her lover entered,
Mrs. Lowe, who had been trying to persuade
Charley to kiss papa, had so far succeeded, that the
U
child had raised his head from her bosom, and she
was holding him towards her husband, her own
sweet face all radiant with smiles, though tears
were swelling in her bright blue eyes;but tears
of joy have a very different effect from those of
sorrow.
What a lovely woman Mrs. Lowe is, said
Jane, as she and her lover were wending their way
home; and she will be so happy now, for she
has a heart made for happiness.
It will be a real Thanksgiving of the Heart to
them, or to her, said Lieutenant Cummings.
And why, in particular, to her? inquired
Jane.
Because she has sought her happiness in the
performance of her dutiesin the cultivation of the
benevolent affectionsin making others happy.
When such exertions are crowned with success, I
cannot think earth has a more perfect felicity for
the human heart.
Would that all who celebrate our annual festival,
might enjoy such felicity. And who that has ever
sought
, has failed to obtain it?
Many are the sayings of the wise,
In ancient and in modern books enroll'd,
Extolling patience as the truest fortitude.
But with the afflicted, in his pangs, their sound
Little prevails, or rather seems a tune,
Harsh and of dissonant mood from his complaint;
Unless he feels within
Some source of consolation from above,
Secret refreshings that repair his strength,
And fainting spirits uphold.
THE LOTTERY TICKET.
Dost thou spurn the humble vale?
Life's proud summit would'st thou scale?
Check thy climbing step elate,
Evils lurk in felon wait,
While cheerful peace, with linnet song,
Chants the lowly dells among.
Burns
.
Dick Woodcock
was the only child of a
respectable
farmer, living in one of the interior
counties
in the state of New York. The father was a
practical agriculturalist, in the true definition of the
term; that is, he
practiced
himself the theories he
recommended to others; and in guiding a plough,
or in wielding a scythe or sickle, few in the
neighbourhood
equalled, none excelled him. He was
also famed (and why need fame be appropriated to
the hero or poet only?) for keeping his estate in
thorough repair. Not a furlong of fence was
wanting
,
not a board hung endwise from any of his
numerous
buildings, nor was an old hat ever seen
protruding its unmannerly crown through a
casement
in his snugly-planned and
comfortably-finished
habitation.
The consequences of such industrious thrift may
easily be divined. He was prosperous, respected
and happy. Dick was his only childa
fine-looking
,
noble-spirited boy he wasthe pride of his
parents, and a pattern for all the little boys in the
village where he dwelt. He was up with the robin
in the morning, and you might hear his whistle as
gay as its song, while he followed and emulated
his father's industrious movements through a long
summer day.
Many there were who advised Mr. Woodcock
to send his boy to college; and, to confess the
truth, his paternal pride would have been gratified
with the eclat of a liberal education for his son.
But he finally abandoned the scheme, partly
because
he had the good sense to discover (and this he
did without knowing a word of phrenology, which
shows that the truth of the science may exist
without
the theory being understood) that his son had
not the developments of a natural-born genius;
but chiefly because he could not bear to think his
excellent farm would be, at his decease, transferred
to the possession of strangers. He knew this must
probably be the case, should his son become a
scholar
;
and indeed his father would not have desired
him to return to the plough with all his college
honours thick upon him.
Mr. Woodcock was a patriot of the old school,
U 2
loving his country as he did his religion; because
he thought both the best, without expecting, for his
faithfulness, worldly honour or emolument
asking
favours of none, save Heavenesteeming an
honest man the noblest work of Godand an
independent
American farmer as the most enviable
of all beings on the face of the earth. Thus he
lived, at peace with himself and with all men; and
when he died, his eulogium was the tear of
unaffected
sorrow for the loss of a useful citizen, and a
pious Christian.
Dick was just nineteen when his father died;
but he wrote himself a man, and was so
considered
by all his acquaintances. And none of those
prophecies of ruin to a fine estate, which are so
often breathed forth when the accumulator is laid
in the dust, were uttered on this occasion.
He is gone, said Colonel Piper, but he has
left a worthy son, who will tread in his father's
steps.
Ay, ay, rejoined Dr. Soda, there'll be no
falling off, I'll warrant ye. Dick will keep the
body of his estate sound; he'll not hurry the
circulation
,
as some young heirs would.
Mr. Woodcock began the world with little or
nothing, said squire Stapleton, and he has left
property worth at least $10,000; if Dick makes as
good improvement, he will soon be the richest man
in town.
And he is now one of the steadiest,
interrupted
deacon Church. I always see him at meeting
o' Sundays, and I never heard him accused of a
vice, or even folly.
The ladies, too, were unanimous in their praises
of Mr. Richard Woodcock; each remembering and
retailing some anecdote of his cleverness and
intelligence
;
and all rejoicing that his widowed
mother
,
in her hour of bereavement and sorrow, had
such a prop on which she might lean for support.
The young ladies might, perhaps, have felt
rather
self-interested in his possessing a character
as fair as his estate, had they not been deprived of
all hope of obtaining such a prize: but they well
knew the young and handsome heir was already
engaged. And had not Chloe Harris been one of
the best girls in the world, her flattering
expectations
must have excited envy among her associates.
But Chloe was so sweet-tempered, so
unpretending
,
so dutiful and industrious at home, and so
obliging to her friends, that her superior beauty,
and even the superior fortune to which she
seemed
destined, were thought but the reward of her
merits.
Dick and Chloe had been companions from
infancy
,
and had loved before either ever read a
novel, describing the causes and symptoms of the
tender passion. Their affection was, therefore,
the dictate of nature, pure as her zephyrs, and
sweet as her roses; no vanity was flattered in their
preference for each other; no caprice indulged in
their intercourse; each loved and was beloved,
and the completion of Dick's majority was
assigned
for their unionfor ever. Alas! that the demon
of Chance should blast this fair prospect of
happiness
.
In an evil hour Dick became possessor of a
Lottery
Ticket; and if the motive could ever hallow
such a purchase, it would seem as if his must have
been laudable. He purchased it as an act of
humanity. A poor man, whose wife was sick and
in need of many necessaries, came to him, and
relating
the story of his wants and woes, produced
the card of fortune, which he, it seems, had won
at a game of bowls, and begged Dick to purchase
it. Dick's feelings were compassionatehe would
willingly have afforded relief to the suffering
woman
without any reward; but he knew the man,
even should the ticket be a prize, would not be
benefited by the windfall, as his habits were not
good, while the ten dollars would most probably
be applied to make his family comfortable, in the
exigence which really seemed to have touched his
heart with sorrow, and his conscience with
compunction
.
So Dick paid the money and took the
ticket; and repeating three several times to
himself
,
It will certainly draw a blank, he
deposited
it carefully in his pocket-book.
However my young hero might flatter himself
with being perfectly unconcerned in the result of
the experiment, there was, that evening, a
restlessness
in his feelings which he had never before
experienced
;
and when he laid himself down to
sleep, a thousand busy schemes and wild fancies
floated on his imagination. Golden dreams
hovered
over his pillow; gay visions seemed beckoning
him to bowers of pleasure, and he awoke in a state
of fevered excitement, that, although it might
presage
happiness, was very far from deserving that
epithet. He had now a new theme for
speculation
,
and the possibility of obtaining a prize
rendered
information concerning the management of
lotteries far more necessary and important than the
cultivation of his farm. Even his visits to his
beloved
Chloe were shortened; yet he intended fully
to repair his negligence when he could surprise
her with the tidings of his good fortune, and call
on her to assist him in forming plans for the
enjoyment
of his wealth.
Ah, dear deluding Imagination! How lofty are
thy structures; how unclouded thy horizon; how
placid thy waters; how enchanting thy landscapes!
Who, beneath thy influence, can believe a word, a
look, a breath, will dissolve such magnificence,
darken such brightness, disturb such tranquillity,
or deform such loveliness! But, Imagination, thou
art a false meteor, and whoever quits the steady
way of reason to follow thy delusive light, will
find a faithless guideit glitters but to betray.
The important drawing was, at length, after
various
delays, completed, and Dick received a
confirmation
of his sanguine hopes. He had drawn
the prize! the highest prize! $50,000!! Ah,
Pleasure, canst thou come in a brighter form than
in the golden shower?
Well, I say nothing of Dick's feelings on this
occasionthey were too sublime for description;
but his friends congratulated; the world (by this
term I mean all who ever heard of Dick or his
good fortune) talked, and wondered, and envied;
and about five hundred tickets, in the Second
Class, were immediately purchased, mostly by
young men in that village and vicinity; the
purchasers
all sanguine in the hope of obtaining a
similar prize. What a mercy that they were all
disappointed!
Dick had now become lord of himself; and,
according
to previous arrangements, should have
been married to Chloe Harris. But he postponed
the wedding till he had visited the city and secured
his riches. Wealth maketh many friends, said
Solomon, and our golden-fledged hero fully proved
the truth of the apothegm. The gentlemen to
whom he was introduced in the city, lavished on
him expressions of attachment, and offers of
assistance
:
cards and compliments gratified his vanity,
djeners
and dinners his appetite, till the parade
and pleasures of the commercial metropolis made
him think the pursuits of a country life weary,
stale and flat, indeed, if not unprofitable.
There was one young merchant, by the name of
Ashton, to whom Dick became particularly
attached
.
Ashton was gay, intelligent, and insinuating;
and it is not wonderful a young and inexperienced
heart should be deluded by his fair seeming. He
soon perceived the ascendancy he had gained over
the mind of Dick, and employed it to convince
him that a life passed in the retirement of the
country must be monotonous and miserable; and
that, to insure himself permanent felicity and an
immense increase of wealth, it was only necessary
to enter into partnership with him, Mr. Augustus
Ashton, and fix his residence in the city. His
artifices were ingenious, and arguments specious
that they were deceitful and unsound the event
proved: but perhaps, under like circumstances,
older and wiser men than Mr. Woodcock might
not have discovered their fallacy.
Ashton introduced him to his sister. She was
very pretty, and highly accomplishedthat is, she
dressed elegantly, danced gracefully, and played
divinely. Dick loved music, naturallyhe had
never read Shakspeare, and knew nothing
descriptively
,
about the concord of sweet sounds, yet
his ear delighted in harmony, and he had, for
several
years, been esteemed the very best singer in his
own village meeting-house. But such airssuch
symphonies, he had never listened to before! Oh!
when the fair Belinda Ashton touched her
instrument
,
his very soul seemed to thrill, and was
indeed
wrapped in Elysium!
There was, at this time, but one circumstance
which prevented Dick's felicity from being
perfect
;
and that was such a trifle that I am almost
ashamed to mention it. But somehow, trifles do
form our happiness, and trifles will make us
miserable
;he
had become disgusted with his
name
.
Woodcock!it was not a romantic or heroic name,
to be sure, but it had always sounded well enough
in the rustic place in which it was his lot to be
born, and where he might have lived and died
without discovering its uncouthness. Now such
bliss of ignorance was denied him, for he had, one
fatal evening, overheard two city ladies repeating
it with peculiar accents of ridicule. He never
afterwards
could endure it; and on disclosing to
Ashton the cause of his inquietude, that faithful
friend assured him it might easily be removed.
An application to the legislature for leave to alter
his name was all that was necessary.
Now was the fancy and taste of Miss Belinda
Ashton exercised and displayed, in selecting a
name for the friend of her dear brother. It would
require a volume to record all the consultations
held concerning this important matter. Novels
were ransacked, characters compared, sounds and
syllables criticised. The labours of Webster,
when tracing the etymology of
bridegroom
, would
have yielded in intensity to this name-seeking
research
.
Finally,
Beaumont
was the fortunate
name which had the honour of receiving the
preference
.
Ashton posted, forthwith, to Albany,
where the legislature was, providentially (as Dick
thought, though he did not dare to allude to such
a cant word as
Providence
in the presence of
Belinda
),
then in session, to expedite the alteration;
and Dick hastened home to arrange his affairs, and
prepare for a permanent residence in the city of
New York.
He still intended to fulfil his engagements with
Chloe Harris; yet there were several reasons which
urged a further delay. He wished to settle in
business, and acquaint himself more fully with the
customs of the city, before introducing his wife
V
into such stylish scenes; and he sometimes
wished
,
though he shrunk from expressing it, that she
could become more accomplished before making
her debut. There was a strife between his
newly-awakened
vanity and his early affection, which the
woman who loved as Chloe did, could not fail of
perceiving. It wounded her to the heartand
when he saw her sorrowful, his first feelings of
tenderness were awakened, and he would dwell on
the scenes of happiness which awaited them, with
all the lover's enthusiasm; but when, in the ardour
of his passion, he pressed her hand, another vision
arose. He sighed while he lamented that she
had never been taught to awaken the piano. It
would now be vain to attempt it, said he; you
have, my dear Chloe, been obliged to work so
much, that your hand would never be quite pretty
enough for display; nothing looks so lovely as a
soft, white hand, when just touching the keys with
a motion that gives the fingers the appearance of
glancing sunbeams.
From that evening Chloe despaired of ever
making him happy. However, she listened to his
promises of a speedy return, without exhibiting
any distrust; and it was not till after he had
departed
for the city, that she wept in bitterness over
her withered hopes. That they were to be
blasted
,
a few months decided. A paper from New
York announced the marriage of
Mr. Richard
Beaumont
, merchant, to the
amiable
and
accomplished
Miss Belinda Philomela Ashton.
Such an outcry as it raised in the village of .
What, Dick Woodcock married to a city miss!
said Colonel Piper. He'll pay dearly for his
whistle, I guess. Fine birds must have fine
feathers
.
He never will prosper in this worldthat's
certain, said Miss Clarissa Comstock; a maiden
lady, whose age gave her authority as an oracle.
It is a bad business, dealing in lottery tickets,
observed Doctor Soda, who, by the way, had drawn
three blanks. Riches got in such a hasty
manner
never wear well.
'Tis a pity, truly a pity, and I mourn that one
so promising should fall into error, said the
clergyman, who was truly benevolent and sincere.
In short, not a person in the town, except Chloe
Harris, was silent on the occasion of Dick's
fickleness
and faithlessness. Even his own mother,
dearly as she loved him, and proud as she was of
his prosperity, acknowledged he was greatly to be
blamed. Many talked of a prosecution, and
guessed
that Chloe might obtain full half of his fortune
as her damages; but none dared hint such a
manner
of revenge to the fair, injured, but
uncomplaining
girl.
A short time, however, brought a letter from
the recreant swain to his forsaken mistress, in
which he made many awkward attempts at
apology
;declaring
his friendship for her unalterable,
wished her a better husband than ever he should
make; and finally, begged her acceptance of a
draft for $1000, which his letter enclosed, as some
reparation of the wrong he had done her.
This is a speculating and selfish age; and to
think money will answer all things, is too much
the characteristic of Americans. Shame on them,
that, with their high privileges of intellectual,
moral
,
and civil improvement, they should make gold
their god! Even ladies have not escaped the
contamination
of selfishness. A few hundred dollars
will dry the weeping eyes of the most despairing
damsel, and make her think the defection of her
plighted swain a very lucky speculationand so,
instead of breaking her own heart, she very coolly
determines to break his credit, comforting herself
with the thought that cash is more current than
love. Such is avarice. Honour, patriotism,
religion
,
even delicacy and affection, are sacrificed on
the altar of avarice. God of my country! is there
no word of power can exorcise this demon from
among us!
The noble mind of Chloe Harris disdained such
a mercenary appeal. She had loved Richard
fondly
,
dearly, truly. He had broken his vowsbut
she could not forget her tenderness; and now,
should she accept of paltry gold as an equivalent
for his affection? Noshe spurned the base idea.
She returned him his letter and draft, without
comment or expostulation, leaving the injuries he
had done her to God and his own conscience for
accusation and punishment. Her faded cheek and
melancholy eye alone told the tale of her wrongs
and her sorrows, and the pity of her friends was
only exhibited by added respect and increased
attentions
and tenderness towards the dignified and
innocent sufferer.
Thus passed away two years, during which
time they frequently heard of
Mr. Beaumont
,
alias Dick Woodcock, and of the splendid style in
which he was figuring. Many of the old people
shook their heads, and observed they feared (that
is, hoped) he would see hard times before he died;
but nearly all the young men thought him a very
fortunate and happy fellow. Dick could have told
them a different tale. Yet few grow wise by the
mistakes of others; it is only by experience we
are convinced that gaiety is not happiness. Dick
had surfeited on the pleasures of the world, and
found them fallacious. He had been introduced to
every fashionable amusement, and when their
novelty
was gone, they were amusements no longer.
V 2
He had been initiated into every fashionable vice,
and found his peace and health and fortune were
to be sacrificed in the pursuit. He was new to sin,
and open to reproof; and had he but possessed one
faithful friend, to have warned him of his danger,
and pointed out the means of escape, he might
have been rescued from ruin. But he had
forsaken
those who loved him for himself, and was
surrounded by a set of interested sharpers and
holyday-friends, who only wished to fleece him of
his substance, or feed at his expense.
His wife was all sentiment in her expressions,
and all selfishness in her heart. She had married
him solely for his fortune, and seemed determined,
by the extravagance of her expenditures, to make
herself amends for what she considered her
sacrifice
of dignity in the connexion with an uneducated
country booby. In short, Dick found his elegant
house was only for the accommodation of company;
that the costly furniture was all arranged for
parties
;
that his servants were kept to wait upon his
guests, and his wife's smiles, and music, and taste,
and time, were all devoted to the entertainment of
those she thought better worth her attention than
her husband.
Where now was the social hearth, the kindred
smile, the domestic confidence, he had been
educated
to enjoy? Too late he repented his
infatuation
.
He thought of the affection of Chloe; of her
modest virtues and home-loving disposition; of the
estimation in which all his wishes had been held
by her, andbut it was too latethe die was
cast; onward he must go, knowing, also, that the
end would be ruin.
It seemed as if fortune, with her proverbial
inconstancy
,
now sought to torment and disappoint,
as much as she had before favoured him; almost
every speculation into which he entered, owing
either to his own ignorance, or the villany of those
with whom he was concerned, was unsuccessful;
and from what might well have been termed an
independent fortune, he soon began to be in want
of money. To relieve himself from some of his
embarrassments he disposed of his paternal estate,
which he had left in the management of his
mother
.
This, he feared, would give her uneasiness,
but knew not how to avoid it.
When the new owner arrived at the village, and
announced to Mrs. Woodcock the purchase of the
farm, not even excepting the reversion of her
dower, she seemed thunderstruck; but when he
actually took possession, her reason well nigh
deserted
her. She had borne the death of her
husband
with the fortitude of a Christian,that was an
inevitable evil. She had been cheerful, too, under
the desertion of her son, for she was a bustling
woman, and the care of the estate had occupied
her mind, and prevented her from dwelling on the
dangers to which he was exposed. But now she
was bereft of alland to see the fields her husband
had cultivated, the trees he had planted, the house
he had erected, in the possession of a stranger,
while she had none to soothe her passage to the
grave,her mind could not support it. A
nervous
fever attacked her; and now it was that the
strength and disinterestedness of Chloe Harris's
affection for her first and only love was tested.
She lavished on the mother the tenderness, which
neither his falsehood nor time had destroyed,
towards
the son. Day and night she sat by her
pillow
,
and tended and soothed her, as if she had been
indeed her mother. And when the poor
heartbroken
woman wept over the follies, and predicted
the ruin of her prodigal, Chloe always found some
extenuating circumstance to urge in his favour,
even while weeping herself at the remembrance of
his cruelty and injustice. A short time, however,
terminated the sufferings of Mrs. Woodcock. She
died blessing Chloe, and charging her with reproofs
and forgiveness for her erring son.
Richard had been informed of his mother's
illness
,
but did notperhaps could notvisit her, and
she was laid in the grave, and wept only by Chloe.
From that day, the sweet girl seemed pining with
unrestrained sorrow. While she thought the man
she had loved was happy, she had endeavoured to
bear her own disappointment unmurmuring; but
now, when convinced that he had sacrificed his own
peace and honour at the shrine of folly, and that
the day was not far distant when, deprived of his
fortune, he must be degraded and miserable, she
wept for him as well as for herself; and her sorrow,
joined with the fatigue she had undergone in
nursing
Mrs. Woodcock, soon terminated in a quick
consumption. She welcomed the approach of death
as a kind messenger, which would bear her from a
world of sorrow to a region of peace, and departed
without a struggle. Before her strength was
exhausted
,
she had written a letter to Dick, in which,
after detailing the scenes of his mother's death, and
delivering her dying admonitions, she adverted to
her own situation, briefly describing the tortures
he had inflicted on her trusting heart, and
concluded
by sayingBefore this meets your eye, I
shall be laid in the calm and silent grave. I die
willinglyI die peacefullybutoh! Richard,
how will you meet the king of terrors? When
that hour approaches, assure yourself of my
forgiveness
;
yes, when your own conscience speaks
in thunders, let my remembrance whisper
forgiveness
of all I can forgive. Would that I could assure
you of the pardon of heaven! Farewell! farewell!
I shall pray for you with my last breath. She
had given directions that it should not be sent till
after her death.
Dick, meanwhile, was suffering the penalty of
his faults. Partly to stifle reflection, and partly
yielding to example, he had become a gambler, and
always losing, as is generally the case with novices
in this pastime, his ruin had become inevitable.
Attachments were levied upon his property;if he
went abroad, he was assailed by dunsat home, he
was met with reproaches, till he felt existence a
burden, and even breathed blasphemous wishes,
that he might be annihilated.
It was during one of these paroxysms of
desperation
that the letter from Chloe Harris was put
into his hands. He recollected the hand-writing,
and trembled; yet there were sweet feelings
mingled
with his terrific ones. He thought of her
love, of the happy hours they had passed together,
of the happy life they had anticipatedhis heart
melted; he kissed the signature, while his eyes
were filled with tears. He broke the seal, but
when he had read the contents, the whirlwind of
his passions defied control. His dying motherhis
darling Chloehe saw themhe heard their meek
voices raised to bless the wretch who had sacrificed
them to his vanity!
Oh! exclaimed heif they had only cursed
me! Why did they not curse me? I deserved it
I would have bowed down in the dust, and
submitted
to any punishment. Yes; I deserve the
most horrible! and then he raved against his own
folly, and called heaven's vengeance on the villain
who had betrayed him, till his strength was
exhausted
then
recurring to the forgiveness of those
injured beings, his soul softened, and he wept aloud.
Forming a hasty resolution to quit a place which
had become intolerable to him, he took passage in
a vessel which was just getting under sail for New
Orleans. He took no leave of his wifeall was
the effect of a momentary determination. During
the voyage he was gloomy and abstractedhis
only satisfaction being derived from perusing the
letter of Chloe Harris, which he kept constantly in
his bosom. Sick at heart, when he landed at New
Orleans he took no precautions to guard against the
yellow fever, which was then prevailing: it
attacked
him, and in three days from the time he landed,
pressing the letter of Chloe to his bosom, he
fervently
ejaculatedO God! forgive me! and
expired.
AN OLD MAID.
Do not smile at me that I boast her off,
For thou shalt find she will outstrip all praise,
And make it halt behind her.
Miss Atherton
, Mr. Burton,said Mrs.
Carvill, as she led forward the lady whom she had
met at the door, and embraced with an affectionate
warmth that could not be mistaken for
common-place
courtesy. The smile of welcome is not like
that of politeness, and it must be a novice who is
deceived in such matters. Mr. Burton admired
Mrs. Carvill's taste and honoured her judgment,
and respected her sincerityand he saw she loved
Miss Atherton; but how any mortal could love an
old maid was, to him, matter of astonishment. Had
she only been called
Mrs.
, he would have seen at
once in her countenance that kindness of expression
which tells the tale of the devoted wife, and
affectionate
mother, and all the soft charities of life
but a
Miss
, who had evidently lived her ten
lustres
,
was associated, in his mind and feelings, with
all the disagreeable peculiarities of temperament
and character ever displayed by poor human
nature
.
Do you not think Miss Atherton a very
elegant
woman? asked Mrs. Carvill, as the first
named lady departed.
Burton assented, for he was too polite to
disagree
with a lady, and respecting her friend, too
but there was an expression in his eye which Mrs.
Carvill understoodshe heeded it not, but
continued
Miss
Atherton is my beau ideal of
female
excellence, and I am always exacting of my
friends the same homage to her virtues. I hope
you will trust me as voucher, till you are
acquainted
with her, and then she will need no eulogist.
And yet, notwithstanding her perfections, she
has, it seems, lived only for herself, and wasted her
sweetness on the desert air.
A very gentlemanly manner of expressing
your dislike of an old maid, said Mrs. Carvill,
smiling.
Mr. Burton returned the smile, as he replied:
I have, I confess, an aversion to the whole tribe
of antiquated maidens; not doubting, however, that
there may be amiable and intelligent ladies among
them. You will ask my reasonswell, it seems
to my mind impossible they can possess the true,
feminine virtues and graces of character in the
perfection
they would have done, had they been
married
,
W
and of course initiated into the performance
of social and domestic duties, and imbued with the
charities and affections of their own sweet home.
I think they must be egotists, because they have
had no engrossing object of love that would make
them forget
self
and they must be discontented,
too, from that constitution of our nature which
makes us invest the unattained, and especially the
unattainable, with extraordinary attractions; and
these feelings, selfishness and discontent, will make
them envious, suspicious and ill-natured. I do not
include Miss Atherton in this pictureshe is your
friend, and I said there were exceptions; but, I
own, my interest in her is not increased by the
circumstance
of finding her a single lady.
Mrs. Carvill did not reply to these opinions of
her guest. She knew such were entertained by
most men, and that they would never be altered
by the arguments of a woman. It is strange a lady
will argueshe never convinces a man by
arguments
addressed to his reason; but she may by
appeals
to his feelingsto his heart. Nor need she
think this course at all derogatory to the character
of her influence, or to the truths she would impress.
It is more important to the cause of virtue and
public morals, that men's feelings and affections
should be kept right and pure, than that they should
be logically convinced of the importance of
goodness
and purity.
Mrs. Carvill changed the subject of
conversation
the
last new poem was discussed; the
transition
to the sister art, painting, was easy, and then
engraving seemed to glide in as naturally as the
ghost in Hamlet illustrated the story of Bernardo.
I have lately obtained an engraving that I think
tolerable, observed the lady, at the same time
producing from her port-folio the piece in question.
This drawing, continued Mrs. Carvill, has, to
my taste, a charm more divine than beautyit has
truth. It is no ideal representation; but a record
of filial devotion and love. I was acquainted with
the originals, and have often seen Calista thus
kneeling to help on her father's shoe, for he was a
man of many infirmities, and more fears. `The
grasshopper shall be a burden,' is a melancholy,
but striking description, of the imbecile feelings of
the aged. Among other weaknesses, they usually
have a dread of strange attendants, and a querulous
impatience when such would assist them. This
old gentleman was afflicted with the gout in his
feet, and the approach of a servant to put on his
shoe would have been torture; yet he would sit
with folded hands, and that look of quiet and
trusting
abandonment, which an infant wears in the
arms of its mother, when his daughter knelt beside
him, and with her white fingers so skilfully and
tenderly performed her office. She was a lovely
girl!
She was, indeed, if this is a good likeness.
The features are faithfully drawnbut the
beauty of her countenance, the mingled expression
of spirit and sweetness, the sparkling vivacity of
her dark eye and ready smile, tempered and
chastened
by that air of thoughtfulness, which seemed
the effect of her watchful love and care for the
happiness of others, not the affectation of superior
wisdom or deep studythese, sir, are traits which
can never be delineated. The painter might as
well fix on his canvas the changing light of the
evening cloud.
I hope her destiny has been a happy one,
remarked
Mr. Burton; she must have made an
estimable
wife.
Mrs. Carvill smiled as she answered: I see
you have no faith in female excellence, unless
developed
in the matronly character. Now, I would
have a wider field for woman's usefulness. I would
have our young ladies impressed with the idea that
their happiness and respectability does not
necessarily
result from marriage, but from the cheerful
and faithful discharge of the duties before them, in
whatever state or station they may be placed. But
examples strike more than general truths. Allow
me to tell you the story of my drawing.
This old gentleman was twice married, and had
three daughters, just the number for a fairy tale,
and Calista was the youngest and the favourite, as
all such stories have it. She was the daughter of
the second wife, and ten or twelve years younger
than her half-sisters, who, according to our mode
of early marriages, were wooed and won before
Calista was out of the nursery. Her mother died
soon after; and whether it was that her father felt
the deep loneliness which nothing but the presence
of some beloved object can dispel, or whether he
feared the plan pursued in educating his two elder
daughters was injurious, I cannot say, but he
adopted
a very different method with Calista than is
usually pursued by the rich and fashionable among
us. He did not send her to a boarding-school, to
learn frivolous accomplishments, and make
romantic
friendships, and have her head filled with the
fashions and the beaux, before any principles for
the guidance of her conduct in life, or any distinct
ideas of what constituted rational happiness, had
been conveyed to her mind. Certain it is, that the
love of home and the habit of domestic confidence
must pervade female education, or merely being
married will never make a woman fond of
domestic
pleasures, or capable of discharging domestic
W 2
duties. It is strange, Mr. Burton, that men of
sense, learning, and knowledge of the world, can
believe that a weak-minded, sentimental, frivolous
young lady, whose whole heart is devoted to dress,
amusements, and husband-hunting, will make a
kind, and submissive, and judicious wife! Such
apparently gentle girls are the most unreasonable
beings in the universeas wives, I mean.
I will never marry such an one, Mrs. Carvill.
Not an unreasonable one, you mean. But you
will not believe, till you find by
conjugal
experience
,
that a pretty, soft-spoken, sentimental young
creature, whose deepest learning is a few French
phrases, and a few tunes on the piano, can exhibit
passions violent as Queen Elizabeth, or be
obstinate
as Madame de Stael in an argument.
Will you not, my dear madam, when
understanding
so well the danger, instruct me how to
avoid it? I will do any thing you enjoin, except to
marry a
blue
that, I hope, you will not propose.
Nothat would be to condemn you to
celibaey
,
for
blues
are as scarce here as honest men were
in the days of Diogenes. I can give you only one
rule that will always apply. Before proposing to
marry a young lady, consider if she has qualities
you would esteem in an intimate friendif she
have not, never dream your love will last, though
she be beautiful as a Houri. Beauty is a fascinating
objectbut, who ever selected a friend for his or
her beauty?
But your Calista was handsome.
Trueand I think it an advantage that she
was handsome. I admire beauty, but I do not love
it. Our pride is flattered to possess personal charms
ourselves, or contemplate them in our friends, but
they never yet made an individual more worthy
our esteem; and true love must be fostered by
esteem
,
founded on the qualities of the heart and
mind. Calista was lovely, and her father used to
gaze on her with parental exultation; but it was
her winning ways, her gentleness and cheerfulness,
that made her seem dearer to him than life; and it
was her good sense, and ready ability to assist him,
that won his undoubting reliance on her judgment,
and made her his confidant and counsellor in
every
emergency. She was, as I observed, educated
at home; a widowed aunt, an accomplished,
judicious
,
elegant and pious woman, supplying the
mother's place; and with occasional lessons from
masters, and the superintendence of her father's
watchful care, she grew up one of the most perfect
and fascinating beings I ever beheld. She had
learning enough to make a woman vain, and was
mistress of every lady-like accomplishmenthad
beauty that made her the cynosure of all eyes; and
yet, though I have heard her eulogium from young
and old, it was always rung on one changeher
goodness. She did not live for display. Her
father
had cultivated her reason, and like a
reasonable
being, she found her happiness in the
performance
of her duties.
Was she not fond of society, of amusements?
demanded Mr. Burton.
Certainly; she enjoyed society with that keen
relish which cultivated minds only know. It was
not with her the silly, selfish pleasure of exciting
admiration by her appearance, but of improving
herself by that most exalted privilege of humanity
conversation. And she had, in perfection, the
happy art of making all around her enjoy
themselves
.
Her intelligence and vivacity were not
reserved for brilliant occasions, that she might
shine in company. I have never seen her more
gay and agreeable than in her father's apartment,
when nursing him during his periodical returns of
ill health. The intercourse between them always
reminded me of Winter in the lap of May. The
tastes and feelings, that usually seem checked and
chilled in one of his years, were by her sunshine
and freshness of spirit kept alive, and he retained,
at eighty years, the relish for those innocent and
mental pleasures that charmed him in youth; that
is, when Calista was presentbut he would droop
and complain if she were detained from his side,
and all cheerfulness seemed to forsake him. It was
this that determined her not to marry during her
father's life.
Your heroine is then to turn out an old maid,
I find, said Mr. Burton, smiling; and you are
reading me a homily on my prejudices against
single
damsels.
No, not exactly that. I am simply relating
the circumstances that made me love, almost
worship
,
an old maid; and you may draw your own
inferences. For myself, I believe that the
happiness
and respectability of a woman is most
permanently
secured by a good marriagebut I think it
highly injurious to my own sex, and to society,
that our young girls should be educated only with
a view to marriage. I would have females
instructed
that the fulfilment of their duties is, in any
fortune, any station, sufficient for their happiness
and I would have them respected, when filling up
their lives by acts of usefulness and benevolence,
as among the excellent of the earth.
Why, so would I; but you know, Mrs.
Carvill
,
that all single ladies are not as perfect as your
friend. I cannot but hope Calista wedded some
worthy man at last.
A smile crossed the lady's benevolent
countenance
,
as she replied, that wish was often breathed
for her, but I believe never by her. While her
father lived, she never permitted marriage to enter
into her calculations. She never gave any
encouragement
that permitted an offerand though so
handsome and agreeable, and with the expectancy
of a tolerable fortune, she, by her prudence,
prevented
any gentlemen from falling in love with
her. All who approached her, seemed to consider
her beyond their reach; and this circumstance
has always made me feel very intolerant towards
those coquettes who keep a train of lovers around
them, when they have no intention of accepting
any one of the number. Against such heartless
coquettes, when left to be old maids, the ridicule
of the world is not unjustly directed. I never wish
to hear a single lady boast of her offers. There is
something undignified and unfeeling in the
exhibition
of the disappointments she may have inflicted,
unless the offers were dictated by mercenary
considerations
.
In such cases, the lady has sufficient
provocation to be severe. Calista's father lived till
she was nearly forty. The days of romance were
over. She had engaged in many charitieshad
taken one of her nieces to educatehad, in short,
fixed her routine of life, and felt that her habits
must be altered, and favourite occupations perhaps
foregone, should she marry then; for a man
suitable
to her age, would also have formed his habits,
and fixed his opinions, to which her's must have
been conformed. A widower, and bachelor, both
unexceptionable in character and fortune, applied
to her friendsand her answer decided for celibacy
for life. Yet she was one of the most lovely, and
is now one of the most agreeable women I ever
saw. Her heart, her affections, have always been
engrossed by some dear object; and I do not think
a wife or mother ever fulfilled their duties with
more tender devotion. The fountain of woman's
love has flowed out in benevolence to her friends;
and in making others happy, she has found the
reward
of her own happiness. Would she, in the
character of a wife and mother, be more amiable,
more justly entitled to our esteem, than she is now
as an old maid?
NoI think not; and I like your ideas
respecting
the education of young women. I have,
myself
,
been disgusted to hear calculations for the
marriage of their daughters, enter into all the plans
of mothers; and I have vowed never to wed with
such an one, educated for the market! But your
friendI wish you would introduce me to her.
It has already been done, sir. The original of
that picture is Miss Atherton.
LADIES' FAIRS.
But here the needle plies its busy task.
The
art of
sewing
was the first invention of
human skill; and probably one of the first
manufactures
of Tubal-cain was that of needles. The
art has never been lost; wherever man and woman
are found, savage or civilized, sewing, in some
manner, is practised; so universally, indeed, that it
seems an instinct rather than an art, and a
distinguishing
characteristic of the human race, from
every other species of animated nature.
It must be obvious that an art, so long and
constantly
practised, has had a powerful effect on the
character as well as comfort of the world; and had
we time for the investigation, it might be easily
shown, that the refinement of society is dependant
upon the perfection to which needle-work is
advanced
,
and the estimation in which it is held; and,
consequently, that woman, to whom this branch of
ingenious industry is almost entirely conceded,
wields over the destiny of nations a weapon more
powerful than the sword of the conqueror. Such
a dissertation is foreign from my purpose; however,
my readers will easily, without any prompting,
refer the improvement of manners to different eras
in the art of sewing, from that of necessity to the
needle-work of convenience, of elegance, of luxury;
and then comes the crowning grace, when the work
of fair fingers is made subservient to the luxury of
doing good.
We are slow to learn that, though
In faith and hope the world may disagree,
Yet all mankind's concern is
charity
.
Charity of opinion and feeling was, doubtless,
what the moralist intended to inculcate; but, in a
world like ours, where physical wants press so
heavily on the helpless, where so many are
poverty-stricken
,
and require to be fed and clothed,
before
kind words can soften their hearts, and
convince
them that compassion is really felt for their
moral wretchedness, and a deep interest in their
eternal welfare, we must always consider a
disposition
to give alms, if not the purest kind of
charity
,
the most certain evidence of feeling pity.
In what manner alms may be best administered,
so as to bless those who give and those who take,
is a question of much importance. Doubtless, the
most essential preparation, by which we are fitted
X
to receive benefit from any action, is to keep the
heart right; but of the hearts of others, we may not
judge, and of our own, we are too often partial
judges. We must then, in considering the value
of the benefits conferred by a particular charity,
estimate its effects on the conduct and character of
the giver and receiver; and where the tendency of
the chosen mode of relieving the distressed is, on
the whole, productive of much good, we should
not relinquish it, though some objections may exist;
for there is no perfect manner of charity. If we
are too careful, we shall always be troubled about
many things, which a more trusting heart and mind
would have avoided.
The expediency of Ladies' Fairs has been, with
some excellent people, a subject of doubt, if not of
disapprobation; and it has been our lot to hear the
matter discussed, feelingly, by those who held
opposite
opinions, and yet were equally entitled to
that best of human appellationsthe benevolent.
Those who disapprove this mode of charity, urge
the impropriety of the displaythat it encourages
vanity in young ladies, and makes the motive of
being seen and admired, the predominating one in
their hearts.
Another objection is, that the real benefits of the
charity are, to the poor, very problematicalif one
class of sufferers is helped, another is injured,
because
the articles sold are principally made by the
rich, and, being disposed of, prevent the sale of
fancy works of a similar description, which would
be made by those who have the skill, and depend
wholly on their industry and ingenuity, but who
are, by this competition of the Fairs, thrown out of
employment.
These, we believe, are the principal objections:
let us examine them.
The first objection would be a serious one, if this
were the only manner of display which could foster
vanity, or the most likely one to excite and gratify
it. But this is not the case. Young ladies are
seen at places of public resort, and seen, too, in
their promenades, with quite as much freedom to
the observers, and hazard to the observed. While
the sexes are permitted to mingle together in
elegant
amusements, in the pursuits of literature, in
the worship of God, we cannot discover any
impropriety
in their occasionally meeting at the
shrine of Charity.
But it is said the Fairs offer encouragement to
those who would not otherwise be permitted to
approach the ladies who manage the show: that
the purchase of a ticket will give to any fellow the
freedom of the apartment, and the privilege of
gazing on the fair managers. So will the purchase
of a ticket admit the same fellow to the public
concerts
,
the hall of the lecturer, and the picture
gallery
;
and yet what elegant, intelligent and virtuous
lady, refuses to appear at those places of
fashionable
resort, because the ignorant, disagreeable, or
vicious, may gain admittance? With such she has
no communication; nor has she any when they
appear at the Fair where she presides; nor while
Fairs are managed discreetly, will there occur any
opportunity for insolence to wound the feelings of
the most delicate lady. Gentlemen may, perhaps,
purchase the articles more readily when presented
by a fair hand; and the beaming of a bright eye
may melt their hearts to unusual generosity in the
prices they pay for what is to them of no value,
but as associated with the fairyet mingling with
these visions will be the thoughts of the objects to
which the money they give will be devoted, and a
disposition to encourage other benevolent plans
will be fostered by this exercise of benevolence.
The man who purchases articles at a Ladies' Fair
is more likely to bestow charity on the next
applicant
than he who condemns all such means of
obtaining
money for charitable purposes is to give at
any time.
The second objection has more apparent
reasonableness
;
for if the poor are deprived of an
employment
,
the same amount of money they could have
earned will not, as a charity, be equally beneficial
as would the opportunity of gaining it by their own
industry. Giving alms to those who are able to
work is a very bad plan. We should not do this.
Better let the poor earn what we can afford them,
even if the labour they perform is of no manner of
use to us. To a poor woman who has nothing to
do, the fairy's task of assorting feathers and
winding
tangled skeins of yarn, if she can have
pay
for
her industry, will be better than a support without
labour. But we think the articles sold at the Fairs
have increased the demand for fancy works of a
similar description, and so, instead of injuring those
who make such trifles for a livelihood, they benefit
them. Those who purchase at the Fairs, with few
exceptions, would not otherwise purchase at all; but
the fact that they did buy, has a tendency to make
fancy works fashionable, and when that is
accomplished
,
their sale is secure. Whatever is fashionable
is soon necessary; and the circumstance, that such
articles as have been sold at the Ladies' Fairs are
now kept at many fancy shops, is proof that the
ingenious and industrious poor are reaping benefits
from this trade in trifles.
It is true, the articles for the Fairs are chiefly
made gratuitously, and by ladies who are exempt
from the necessity of earning; and this
circumstance
,
we consider, will have very beneficial
consequences
.
It is exceedingly difficult to give
habits
X 2
of domestic industry to those who have no
need of labour; yet on such habits mainly depends
the physical health of woman, and much of that
cheerfulness of mind which makes her useful and
agreeable at home. We regret to see that, in
female education, needle-work has, of late, been so
sadly undervalued. The old-fashioned
accomplishments
of embroidery and tenth-stitch were
preposterous
,
when they demanded all the time of woman;
and so would be music, or drawing, or any
accomplishment
we term literary. A young lady should
be trained to vary her employments, and display,
in every department of womanly knowledge, good
sense and refined taste; and she may as truly
exhibit
sense, and taste, and elegance of fancy in her
needle-work, as in reciting philosophy, quoting
poetry, or playing the harp.
The truth is, that in female education there is
now danger from excess of mental culture. The
mind is dragged and driven to make exertions
beyond
its abilities, and the constitution fails in the
effort; and from the confinement to which girls are
subjected at school, particularly when their studies
are likewise continued at home. Some relaxation
should be allowed, and then a taste for the beauties
of needle-work, and for all feminine employments,
in which fancy and skill are blended with industry,
may be cultivated; and surely, when these are
called
forth, and directed by the pure motive of
relieving
the distressed, they are deserving of high
praise.
I have made all these articles during mornings
and holidays, said a pretty young lady, as she
showed me a variety of butterfly needle-books,
pincushions
of many forms, and other ingenious and
beautiful creations, that completely covered her
work-table. I engaged to make a dozen articles
for the Fair, continued the lovely girl, but I liked
the employment so well, that I have made double the
number. Mother thought I would be soon tired
of rising so earlyand I thought so too; but I have
felt the better for it every day, and I learn my
lessons
at school better, because I must study and be
industrious there, so that I can have more time at
home to work on these pretty things.
Here is the true secret of making the rich
industrious
it
is to give them a pleasurable motive
for exertion. The poor must labour to live; but a
young lady who can have every pecuniary wish
gratified, without taking thought for the means, is
in great danger of becoming indolent, selfish,
useless
and unhappy.
So far as the Ladies' Fairs have relieved the rich
from
ennui
, and the poor from suffering, they have
done good, much goodand we hope they will be
continued. The money obtained should be sacred
to the sick and helpless; suffering age and destitute
childhood seem the proper objects of this charity;
and the young and rich, while devoting their time
and thoughts to these, may be assured that they
will do honour to themselves by exhibiting their
industry and ingenuity, their skill in needle-work,
and the devotion of that skill to benevolent
purposes
.
THE MODE.
Some change of course, should be in force,
But surely not so much.
What
a variety of changes there has been in
the costumes of men and women since the fig-leaf
garments were in vogue! And these millions of
changes have, each and all, had their admirers, and
every fashion has been, in its day, called
beautiful
.
It is evident, therefore, that the reigning
fashion, whatever it be, comprehends the essence
of the agreeable, and that to continue one
particular
mode or costume, beautiful for successive ages,
it would only be necessary to keep it fashionable.
Some nations have taken advantage of this
principle
in the philosophy of dress, and have, by that
means, retained a particular mode for centuries;
and there is no doubt the belles of these unfading
fashions were, and are, quite as ardently admired,
as though they had changed the form of their
apparel
at every revolution of the moon.
In some important particulars these fixed planets
of fashion certainly have the advantage over those
who are continually displaying a new phasis.
They present fewer data for observation, and
consequently
,
the alterations which time will bring to
the fairest person is less perceptible, or, as they
always seem the same, less noted. There are few
trials more critical to a waning beauty, than the
appearing in a new and brilliant fashion. If it
becomes
her, the whisper instantly runs round the
circle, how young she looks!a most
invidious
way of hinting she is as old as the hills;if it
does not become her, which is usually the case,
then you will hear the remark, what an odious
dress!meaning, the wearer looks as ugly as the
Fates.
The contrast between a new fashion and an old
familiar face instantly strikes the beholder, and
makes him run over all the changes in appearance
he has seen the individual assume; and then, there
is danger that the antiquated fashions may be
revived
and
how provoking it is to be questioned
whether one remembers when long waists and
hoops, and ruffled-cuffs were worn!A reference
to the parish-register, or the family-record, would
not disclose the age more effectually.
Nor are the youthful exempted from their share
in the evils of change. It draws the attention of
the beholder to the dress, rather than the wearers;
and it reminds bachelors, palpably and alarmingly,
of the expense of supporting a wife who must thus
appear in a new costume every change of the
mode.
Now, as it is fashion which makes the pleasing
in dress, were one particular form retained ever so
long, it would always please, and thus the
unnecessary
expense of time and money be avoided;
and the charges of fickleness and frivolousness
entirely
repelled. We have facts to support this
opinion.
Is not the Spanish costume quite as becoming
as our own mode? and that costume has been
unchanged
,
or nearly so, for centuries; while the
French and English, from whom we borrow our
fashions (poor souls that we are, to be thus
destitute
of invention and taste)! have ransacked
nature
,
and exhausted art, for comparisons and terms
by which to express the new inventions they have
displayed in dress.
We are aware that a certain class of political
economists affect to believe that luxury is
beneficial
to a nationbut it is not so. The same
reasoning
which would make extravagance in dress
commendable, because it employed manufacturers
and artists, would also make intemperance a virtue
in those who could afford to be drunk, because the
preparation of the alcohol employs labourers, and
the consumption would encourage trade. All
these views of the expediency of tolerating evil
are a part of that Machiavellian system of
selfishness
which has been imposed on the world for
wisdom
,
but which has proved its origin by the
corrupting
crimes and miseries men have endured
in consequence of yielding themselves dupes or
slaves of fashion and vice.
We do hope, indeed believe, that a more just
appreciation of the true interests and real
happiness
of mankind will yet prevail. The
improvements
,
now so rapidly progressing, in the
intellectual
and civil condition of nations must, we
think, be followed by a corresponding
improvement
in the tastes and pursuits of those who are
the
elit
of society. Etiquette and the fashions
cannot be the engrossing objects of pursuit, if
people
become reasonablethe excellencies of mind
and heart will be of more consequence to a lady
than the colour of a riband or the shape of a
bonnet
.
We would not have ladies despise or neglect
dress. They should be
always
fit to be seen;
personal neatness is indispensable to agreeableness
almost to virtue. A proper portion of time and
attention must scrupulously be given to external
appearance, but not the whole of our days and
energies. Is it worthy of Christians, pretending
to revere the precepts of
Him
who commanded
them not to take thought what they should put
on, to spend their best years in studying the form
Y
of their apparel? Trifles should not thus engross
us, and they need not, if our citizens would only
shake off this tyranny of fashion, imposed by the
tailors of Paris and London, and establish a
national
costume, which would, wherever an American
appeared, announce him as a republican, and the
countryman of Washington. The men would
probably
do this, if our ladies would first show that
they have sufficient sense and taste to invent and
arrange their own costume (without the
inspiration
of foreign milliners) in accordance with those
national principles of comfort, propriety, economy,
and becomingness, which are the only true
foundation
of the elegant in apparel.
It is not necessary to elegance of appearance,
nor to the prosperity of trade, that changes in
fashion should so frequently occur. Take, for
instance
,
the article of shoes. What good
consequence
results from a change in the fashion of
shoes?
If we have a becoming and convenient mode,
why not retain it for centuries, and save all the
discussions about square-toed, round or peaked
and all the other
ad infinitum
changes in cut and
trimmings? And if the hours thus saved were
devoted
to reading or exercise, would not the mind
and health be more improved than if we were
employed
in deciding the rival claims of the old and
new fashion of shoes to admiration?
Such portions of time may seem very trifling,
but the aggregate of wasted hours, drivelled away
thus by minutes, makes a large part of the life
allotted
us.
We by no means advocate an idle and stupid
state of society. Excitement is necessary;
emulation
is necessary; and we must be active if we
would be happy. But there are objects more
worthy
to call forth the energies of rational beings
than the tie of a cravat, or the trimming of a
bonnet
.
And when the moral and intellectual beauty
of character is more cultivated and displayed, we
hope that the foreign aid of ornament will be
found less necessary; and when all our ladies are
possessed of inward greatness, unaffected
wisdom
,
and sanctity of manners, they will not find
a continual flutter of fashion adds any thing to the
respect and affection their virtues and simple graces
will inspire.
THE MYSTERIOUS BOX.
I would rend away
The links that bind my spiritI would burst
From my dark cell of silence into day,
And climb with tireless hand my upward way,
Where all, who wield the hearts of men, have trod;
Honour and love are there, and these repay
For the dull cares and toils wherein we plod
They have a spell to charm the slave who turns the clod.
Percival
.
What
a shame it is that we have not one real
poet among our thirteen millions of people! said
Edward Blakeley, as he entered the parlour, with
the Edinburgh Review in his hand.
You forget, Edward, cried his sister Lucy,
eagerly; there is Bryant, and Percival, and
Willis
,
and Sigourney, and
No, no, Lucy; I forget no one. I remember
well every American who has written a stanza
worth remembering, and I could almost worship
the writer. But I repeat that we have not, and it
is a national disgrace, a single individual among
our thirteen millions of people, who devotes
himself
or herself to the service of the Muses.
Because there is no adequate compensation
offered for poetry, said uncle Thomas. We have
the poetic temperament in profusion among us.
I fear not, replied Edward; I fear this
dullness
is constitutional. When I read the sarcastic
observations of Englishmen and Scotchmen, on
our want of genius and originality, I often am so
mortified, with feeling that the accusation is true,
that I almost hate the name of American.
We shall have poets when we have M
cenases
,
remarked uncle Thomas, drily.
It is possiblebut, dear uncle, what reasons
have you for believing this? None of the
immortal
bards have written for hire.
But they were rewarded, nevertheless; or
most of them, with whose histories we are
acquainted
,
attained, in consequence of their
writings
,
situations of honour and profit; or, at any
rate, they were better provided for than they
would have been, had they never made rhymes.
Most of the poets have been what the aristocratic
language of the old world styles
low-born;
and
their genius exalted them to be companions of the
titled, learned and wealthy; and this envied
privilege
these
low-born
poets could not in any other
way have obtained. So that you see, Edward,
there is a reward, and one, too, exceedingly
coveted
,
where the distinctions of rank are established
Y 2
by law, for men of genius to devote themselves to
works of imagination and taste. America has not,
as yet, offered these rewards in a sufficient measure
to foster that inclination which genius, I believe,
always feels, to indulge in the studies which would
elevate and refine society, rather than make it
comfortable.
And so, I suppose, you are intending I shall
infer, that the brave spirits among us republicans,
who might have been distinguished as poets, are
employing their powers to invent steamboats and
cotton gins, &c. &c.
I mean to say, Edward, that our men of genius
have hitherto found useful speculations more surely
the path to fame, wealth and respectability, than
sublime fancies would have been. And so they
have been utilitarians, when they might have been
poets. But we will leave this discussion for the
present. I had promised the girls a story, and was
just beginning as you came inand I believe they
will prefer my story to your logic.
The young ladies laughed, and declared, as
young ladies should do, that they infinitely
preferred
stories to logic.
Edward looked a little blanked, for he had just
graduated, and thought, as graduates usually do,
that all wisdom was learned at college; and that
whatever did not savour of logic, must be nonsense.
But still his early habit of listening to the stories
of his mother, had made him love stories, and he
could not, with all his logic, cure himself of the
silly habit, as he called it. So now he sat down, a
little without the circle which drew around uncle
Thomas, and though keeping his eyes on the open
page of the Edinburgh Review, he heard every
word of the following
Tale
:
About fifteen years ago I made an overland
journey to New York city, by the way of
Windsor
,
Vermont, thence across the Green Mountains
to Albany; but from that place I went by water, so
that, after all, it was not exactly a land journey.
But it was long enough to tire me prodigiously,
for the roads then were rough, and the company I
met in the stage duller than the mile-stones, for
these last always reported progress. I recollect, in
particular, how disgusted I was with the affectation
and chatter of a party who entered the stage the
morning we started from Windsor. There was a
young fellow who fancied himself a great man,
because his father could afford him money enough
to spend. I knew his father wella pains-taking,
plodding drudge in the service of mammon he was
and he had been rewarded for his servitude. He
was rich. His son has, not long since, been in the
debtor's room, and, I believe, taken the poor
debtor's
oath. Little did he think of such a downfal
when I saw him in the stage. Then he was all
pertness and flippancy; and the two ladies he was
escorting, the young Miss to whom he was
engaged
,
and her maiden aunt, were delighted with
his pertness, which they doubtless thought wit,
and they laughed at every silly, stupid observation
he made.
I did not think it strange that the young lady
was pleased; she was blinded by her love or vanity;
but I did think an elderly spinster, who I could
see wore false hair, and of course was gray, for it
was not then the fashion for all ladies to wear it,
might have been more wise. But to tell the truth,
the ladies were as shallow as the coxcomb, and
that is a case which seldom occurs; for though
women are rarely found so wise as wise men, they
are as rarely found so weak as foolish men. The fair
sex have, as I think, an instinctive capacity for
social intercourse, and seldom appear so dull, odd,
or awkward, even when ignorant of established
rules and the subjects of colloquy, as do their
lordsand then they have a kindness in their
smile, an attentiveness in their manner, which
makes one believe they comprehend every word
they hear. I always like to talk before ladies, for
I am then incited to use my best language, and
bring out my purest thoughts and feelings.
And tell your best stories, too, said Lucy.
Yes, my love, when I do not forget them in
my old-fashioned digressions. But I shall go on
regularly now, for I am just coming to my hero.
Then the young beau in the stage is not to be
your hero? observed Edward.
No, no, EdwardI shall never take a coxcomb
for a hero of mine. But I don't mean by a
coxcomb
,
one who likes to dress and dash, even
though he may carry his extravagance a little too
far. I mean a conceited prig, who has nothing but
extraneous qualifications to entitle him to his place
in society. He depends on his father's fame, or
friends, or wealth, or else on the eclat of graduating
at a popular university, or travelling over Europe,
or residing in a city; such a fellow is all pride and
pretension, and seems to think nature has given
him a patent of nobility, when, if it were not for a
combination of lucky circumstances in his favour,
he would probably have been a wood-sawyer or an
old clothes man. It seldom, however, happens
that such an one is fortunate to the end; and when
the time of trial comes, he `falls, like Lucifer, to
rise no more.' There's poetry for you, Edward.
I am glad you listen so attentively to my story.
Your lecture, you mean, uncle.
My story, I say. Where was I? Oh! the
stage-coach. Well, we had just crossed the Green
Mountains, and during the whole ride I had hardly
opened my lips. I felt truly rejoiced when a man
in a wagon, who had come from a cross-road,
which seemed to lead through the woods on our
left, hallooed for the stage to stop, and after
inquiring
if there were many passengers, said a
gentleman
wished to go on as far as Rutland.
The gentleman soon came up, for he had not
ridden in the wagon, and taking a small bundle
from the wagon seat, he handed it to the
coachman
to place on the top of the stage, and then
taking a box from a buffalo skin, in which it had
been wrapped, he spoke a few words earnestly,
and in a low tone, to the wagoner, and then entered
the stage. I tell all these circumstances, because
they are essential to the catastrophe.
When the stranger entered, I bowed, as I
always do on such occasions, but the coxcomb I
have before named turned up his nose, with a
scornful smile, and instantly removed from the
front seat, where he had hitherto sat, to gaze, as I
supposed, uninterruptedly on his Dulcinea, to the
middle seat, which I had hitherto occupied alone,
and thus left the whole forward seat for the new
comer. He, however, did not seem to wish for
much space in which to display himself. On the
contrary, I thought he appeared to shrink from
observation, and drew his hat down over his eyes,
and his red silk handkerchief up over his chin.
These movements might not have any particular
motive, but there certainly was a mystery in the
curious box he carried with him. It was a queer
shaped box, nearer a triangle than any other form;
perhaps eighteen inches on the longest side, and
about twelve inches in height. This box the
wagoner had handed to the traveller, after the
latter
entered the stage. It was handed very
carefully
,
and the traveller held it very cautiously, and
kept his eyes fastened on it in a way which seemed
to me very odd. I noted these things more,
perhaps
,
because I was glad to have a subject to
employ
my thoughts, and prevent the silly simpering
conversation which was going on between the
lovers and the duenna from entering my sober
ears. But I could not wholly escape hearing, and
I found their witticisms were directed against the
stranger. I knew, too, that he must hear them,
for once or twice the colour rose on his pale cheek,
and he held down his head, and closed his eyes, as
though he would have us think he was asleep.
I always feel pained to see a fellow being suffer
such contumely, when it is so undeserved, and I
endeavoured, by paying him particular attention,
to reassure him. But it was all in vain that I
talked to him. I could not draw him out. He
would answer my questions, but as briefly as
possible
,
consistent with civility. To my several
remarks
on the country, the weather, the news, &c.,
he would not add a single syllable. He seemed to
be labouring under some excitement or anxiety of
mind, which entirely unfitted him for conversation.
I did not think it was bashfulness, as what he did
say was spoken in an easy assured tone, and there
was no lack of information in his answers. But
he would not talk; and so I contented myself with
taking the inventory of his apparel. He was not
exactly shabby, yet his clothing augured poverty;
it was unsuited for the season. The day was a
chilly one; it was the last of October, and the
traveller had no over-coat nor gloves; and his
sur-tout
was thin and threadbare, and his boots were
patched, and did not fit him very well.
Yet still there was something in his appearance
and manners which interested me very much
somewhat like the sympathy we read of in novels.
He was young, and his face, or all of it I could see,
very pale and scholar-like. His eye was blue,
deep dark blue, and I thought expressed
melancholy
or suffering; but there was, at times, a
quickness
in his movements, which betrayed a hasty
temperament, or it might belong to a suspicious
one. Perhaps I should have thought the quick
changes of feeling which I observed pass over his
countenance were the inspirations of genius, and
have set him down as a scholara poethad it
not been for his hard, sinewy hand, which showed
too plainly that manual labour had been his calling.
All these particulars I noted before it grew dark;
and, on the whole, I made up my mind that he
would prove no common characterbut whether
inclined to good or evil I could not decide. But
tavern-keepers know every body, thought I; so,
when we reach Rutland, I'll find out who this
young adventurer may be.
We reached Rutland about nine in the evening.
Now I never thought I was much given to the
luxuries of the table, but yet, when I am
travelling
,
I confess my mind is quite too much taken up
with what I shall eat and what I shall drink. At
this time I was cold as well as hungry; the
landlord
had a good fire and a good supper, and I was
so completely engrossed with
self
, that I never
observed the young traveller was not at the table
with us, nor in the parlour with us, nor did I see
him, or think of him, till the landlord was lighting
me to my bed. Then I inquired for him.
`What, the fellow in the surtout?' answered
the man. `Why, he called for a chamber, and
Z
lights, and carried up his box and budget, and then
went out, and after a time returned with some one,
and they are now, I guess, in that chamber.' He
pointed to one next that I was entering.
`Did he take supper?' said I.
`No, no! he did not look like one who could
afford to eat my suppers.' The landlord laughed,
and I felt as though I would have been willing to
have gone without my own supper, to have been
certain that poor young man was not hungry.
After the landlord had departed, I sat down in
a huge arm-chair that stood close to a door which
was then partly open. I had not sat there above a
minute, when I was certain I heard voices in the
next chamber. It was there that the young man
was, and I opened the door without any plan or
thought of what I wished to do or know. The
door opened into a large closet, which separated
the two chambers; I saw a glimmering of light
through the plastering near the top of the wall, and
I could now plainly hear, for the plastering was
very thin, some one talking earnestly and rapidly.
My curiosity was awakened. I softly entered the
closet, and standing on a chair, could just look
through the chink in the wall, which had probably
been made by the removal of a nail, or large
wooden peg, which had once been driven into the
plastering on the closet side. The hole was
sufficiently
large for me to see the two men plainly.
They sat by a table, one on each side. The young
traveller was facing me, consequently I could only
see the back of his companion. But I judged by
his thin hair, and the appearance of his dress, that
he was an elderly man. I noted him but little
though, for my whole attention was engrossed by
the mysterious traveller.
This young man had laid aside his hat, and his
bold forehead, from which he often brushed back
the dark hair that clustered thickly on the top of
his head, gave much more of dignity to his
appearance
than I had thought he possessed. But the
charm of his face was in his eyes. I told you they
were blue, and I had thought melancholyall that
expression had now passed away. They seemed
to burn and literally flash with energy, and hope,
and joy, as he went on showing paper after paper
to the other gentleman. The papers seemed to be
filled partly with writing, and partly with plans or
drawings, which the youth was describing. He
had taken these papers from his queer-looking box,
which stood open on the table; but they did not, I
found, constitute its chief treasure. Presently he
took, very carefully, some little wheels and models
in wood and metal, and other strange fashioned
articles
,
from his boxand he placed them together,
and then he stood up, and rubbed his hands, and
went up close to the other man, and talked. My
stars! how fast he talked! You must know that I
could not hear a connected sentence, for he spoke
low as well as fast, so that the whole scene was
pantomimic. It was the most animated one I ever
sawthe embodying of real feeling and passion in
the changes of noble features, and the gestures of a
fine and powerful form.
You probably wish to know what I thought of
the scene and the youth. I could not, for some
time, form any guess of his character. At last I
saw the old gentleman take from his pocket-book a
bank bill, which he seemed comparing with some
of the drawings on the papers before him: and
then the truth flashed on my mind at once. They
were counterfeiters! The whole mystery of the
scene was unravelled. I now knew why the young
man had come from that cross-road with so much
precaution, his whispering with the wagon-driver,
his skulking in a corner of the stage, his silence
and downeast lookswhy, I read the whole
history
at a glance. It is wonderful how the
possession
of one link in a confederacy will enable you to
put the whole fabric in motion, like pulling the
string of a dancing Jack. but so it is. And after
the mystery is understood, how very weak appear
the devices of the art which had before blinded
you!and how manfully you go on, tearing in
pieces the whole fabric, and accounting for every
appearance, probable or improbable, with as little
hesitancy as you would balance an account, when
the items were all before you.
I had heard, when in Windsor, of the recent
escape of a young and ingenious villain, who had
been detected in passing counterfeit money. I
believe
I read the advertisement, offering a large
reward
for his apprehension; at any rate, I heard
him described, and the youth before me answered
the description. He had `dark hair and blue eyes,
and was nearly six feet in height, and could appear
like a gentleman,' as the description ran.
My first impulse, after making this discovery,
was to call the landlord, and have the rogues
secured
.
Then I recollected I had heard that the
misguided man was the only son of a widowed
mother, who, it was thought, would never survive
the disgrace of having him condemned to the state
prison. I remembered, too, that extenuating
circumstances
were namedhow the youth, who was
clerk in a store, had been inveigled by older
villains
,
and a bad woman, the worst of tempters in a
human form. I had heard more than one
gentleman
z 2
observe, he hoped the poor fellow would
escape
,
for he might reform if not degraded by
public
punishment, because he was young, and
naturally
a fine disposition.
These thoughts so overpowered me that I
could scarcely stand, and so I crept softly from the
closet, and sat down in the arm-chair, to reflect
what was my duty in this case. On one hand, my
sympathy for the unhappy culprit, who I saw was
really a noble creature, that is, as God had made
him, strongly inclined me to let him take his
chances of escape. Then, his poor motherI
fancied
I heard her beseeching me not to expose her
son, her only son, to disgrace; and I was decided
for a few moments to let him go.
Then the responsibility of an American citizen
to protect those laws from violation which he has
helped to make and impose, came vividly on my
mind. How could I connive at the escape of the
guilty from justice, without forfeiting my own
esteem, even though my secret should never be
known? Those bonds of law which
freemen
impose
on themselves, are far more obligatory on the
conscience and honour of individuals, than are those
statutes enacted by despots, or self-constituted
rulers
.
The
freeman
has no mental reservations.
His secret purpose, as well as his solemn oath, is
pledged to support the laws. He knows and feels
this responsibility, and he cannot escape it. There
is no subterfuge. He cannot say these things
belong
to the government, let the proper officers look
to it. Our police are the citizens, our guards the
citizens; and as an American citizen my duty was
plain: I must expose the guilty.
But before I went to call the landlord, I thought
I would take one more look at the counterfeiters.
The old man had gone; and the youth was pacing
the room with an anxious and troubled air. The
bright flush, that had given such animation to his
features during the discussion, had faded entirely.
He was pale as a statue, and when he stopped in
his walk, as he several times did, and stood still as
a statue, had it not been for the glance of his eye,
he would have seemed a marble figure. I pitied
him deeply, I think it no shame to say it, though
he were a counterfeiter, for I saw he was
miserable
.
Finally, I resolved to go to him, and
expostulate
with him, and see if I could not find in his
penitence some reasons to justify me in letting him
escape.
I went and knocked at his door, which he
immediately
opened. He seemed a little startled,
however, and asked me, abruptly enough, what I
wanted with him. I answered that I came to warn
him of consequences which must overtake him
soon, if he pursued the course he had begun.
He looked wonderfully amazed, and asked me
to explain. This I did as quickly as possible, for
I think a frank straight-forward manner always
succeeds best with the young. Had he been an old
offender, I should have gone more cunningly to
work, and endeavoured to entrap him by artful
questions, and asked for a sight of his box, and so
on;but I went right to the point at once, told
him how I had seen him and his partner in iniquity,
and the contrivances I knew he had in his box for
forging bills; and lastly, I told him who I suspected
he was.
He had listened to me without speaking; but
once or twice I thought he seemed inclined to
laugh; and when I named the counterfeiter P****,
he could restrain himself no longer. He burst out,
not with a laugh of mirth, as it seemed to me, but
of scorn, bitterness, derision, as though he set
warning
and advice, as well as law and honesty, at
defiance
.
I was tempted to knock him down. It seemed
to me, as I turned to leave the room, in order to
call the landlord, that such a reckless villain well
deserved the state prison.
But when he saw me going, he checked his
laugh, and begged me to have a little patience, and
he would show me his box. He brought it
forward
,
and took out every thing it contained. He
then untied his bundle, and placed that, too, for my
inspection. And then he asked me to take a seat
at his table, and sitting down himself, he arranged
all his models before me. What do you think they
proved to be, Edward?
How can I guess? said Edward.
Nothing very wicked, I hope, uncle, said
Lucy.
Why, resumed uncle Thomas, taking a huge
pinch of snuffalways his custom when a little
vexedWhy, I never like to think of this part
of the affair, so we will pass over it as lightly as
possible. The models and drawings were those of
a machine for grinding tanners' bark, which
machine
the young man had invented, as well as made
some improvement in the process of tanning leather,
for which he wished to obtain a patent; and he had
been explaining all these matters to an old uncle of
his, in order to induce him to advance a sum of
money necessary to secure the patent-right.
I never felt myself less a man than when
looking
on the models before me, and then on the
animated
face of the youthful projector, where every
feature seemed now instinct with enthusiastic
honesty
,
as well as energy of purpose. And I had
judged him to be a base counterfeiter! Well, I
have one comfort. If I sometimes judge wrong, I
am always glad to act right. And so I made my
apology to the youth;not a half-way, cautious
apology, as if I were
`Convinced against my will,
And of the same opinion still.'
No, no; I spoke out heartily, and told him I was
sorry and ashamed of my suspicions, and
convinced
he was a good as well as an ingenious young
man, and I sincerely wished him success. I added,
too, that I should like to hear the history of his
inventions, and perhaps it might be in my power
to assist him. Ah! I wish you could have seen
him then, Lucy. His look of thankfulness and
joy went to my heart, for I saw I had touched the
core of his. The inventions of a projector are
dear to him as children to their parents, and to
hear them praised is like offering incense to his
idols.
The adventurer's name was Hugh Griswold,
and his story was a common one in our country
that of an aspiring boy, determined to raise
himself
above the condition in which he was born.
Monarchists may talk of rank, and how the
dignity
of high birth elevates human nature; but the
struggle to keep an honourable station is never so
hearty, so ennobling, as the struggle to attain one.
Let public opinion be virtuous and enlightened,
and let the free spirit have room to rise by its own
deserts, and you place before men the most
powerful
motive for improvement which society can
offer
,
I shall not relate the story of my hero very
minutely. He told me his father was a good man,
but sickly, and always poor. He died when Hugh,
the eldest of eight children, was fifteen. Hugh
described himself as a dreaming, wayward boy,
who formed a thousand dazzling schemes by which
he might become rich and great. And so loath
was he to learn a trade, that his father, who had
designed to put his son apprentice to a tanner and
shoemaker, never had prevailed with him to
begin
his trade.
But the tears of his widowed mother decided
him. He saw he must lay aside his books, and
forego his dreams of being a scholar, a poet, and a
gentleman, to prepare himself to assist her. He
went to his trade, but he told me, that even then
these wild visions of fame and greatness continued
to haunt him, and he had no doubt it was these
promptings, which, as he grew older and wiser,
took a more reasonable shape, and incited his
restless
ingenuity to construct experiments and plans
which had finally been successful in his present
invention.
`I had determined,' said he, `to succeed. I
laboured during the day, and studied my
inventions
through the night. For the last three years,
I was then nineteen, I have scarcely allowed
myself
common necessaries, because all my earnings
I expended on my experiments. My blessed
mother
bore with all my plans and whims, even
encouraged
my projects, and she shall now be
rewarded
.
If I can only go to Washington and
secure
my patent, I shall soon be independent.'
You should have seen him, Lucy, while he
was saying these things, to know fully how much
interest genius and enthusiasm can give to the
most common, or, as it is called, vulgar
employment
.
I thought, while he was talking, that
tanning leather
was an office of great and
dignified
importance. So much did I enter into the
spirit of his feelings, that, as I happened then to
be a representative in congress, I gave him my
name, with an invitation to call on me when he
came to Washington, and promised to assist him
all in my power. As an earnest of my good-will,
I offered to advance him fifty dollars then, if he
needed. My offer was, doubtless, wholly
unexpected
by him, for he had never found a patron,
and his old uncle, as I afterwards learned, only
lent him five dollars. His lip quivered, and it was
some time before he spoke; at last he thanked me,
and accepted my offer.
I saw him at Washington. He secured his
patent, and soon disposed of shares to such
advantage
,
that I had little doubt he might be a rich
man, if his poetic temperament did not hurry him
into hazards and extravagancies. I took the
liberty
,
in one of our confidential conversations, to hint
this to him. `Never fear me,' said he, blushing,
and half-hesitating`I am under bonds to be a
reasonable man.'
Under the bonds of the heart, I presume,
said I. He smiled, and we parted.
Ten years after that, I met him on the floor of
congress, a representative from New York. Our
recognition was, I trust, mutually pleasant. I was
not surprised to meet him there, for I knew he
had talents and energies which would make him
distinguished, if he only persevered; but I confess
the extensive knowledge he displayed, and his
perfect
gentlemanly deportment, somewhat
disconcerted
my old prejudices. I had held it to be
impossible
that one, whose early training was
neglected
,
could ever excel in liberality of ideas and
refinement
2 A
of manners, those who had had the
advantages
of a public and polite education. But
after he had introduced me to his lady, a lovely
and accomplished woman, I wondered less, as I
know well the influence of a gentle and intelligent
spirit over such a mind as Hugh Griswold
possessed
.
He told me he was rich, very rich, but he
valued his wealth only as it made him successful
in lore and fame.
Had that man been born in a sphere of
military
glory, he would have been a hero; or had
literary
reputation been the best passport to honours,
he would have been a poet. In our country, where
the skill that contributes to make life comfortable
has been hitherto more regarded and better
rewarded
than the talents which defend and amuse
it, he devoted his genius to the construction of
machines for grinding
tanners' bark!
But this
predominating influence of bodily wants will not
much longer enslave. Our people are becoming
rich. The rich will search for expedients to make
their wealth contribute to their renown. The age
of warriors and spectacles has gone by. Physical
strength must yield to mental power; and the
indulgence of the senses be considered poor and
vulgar, when contrasted with intellectual and moral
pleasures. Yes, Edward, the rich will find that
their surest, greatest, most durable distinction, must
be the distinction of superior intelligence. They
will encourage literature either from taste or for
pretention; genius will be exalted and rewarded;
and then, Edward, we shall have both Mcenases
and poets.
THE END.